[Daily Discussion] Tuesday, June 12, 2018 -- TITLE
#New post: [\[Daily Discussion\] Wednesday, June 13, 2018 →](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8qphc3/daily_discussion_wednesday_june_13_2018/)
[deleted]
It's been quite awhile since I've posted much of anything, and I do apologize for buggering off at such a crucial point in recent history. Life's just been pretty hectic and I haven't had the time to devote to trading/commenting on the market lately. 

In any event, here's what I'm looking at right now:

https://imgur.com/a/6qMcNPu

The consolidation triangle that the market was confined within throughout the bulk of 2018 so far broke down the other day. And quite violently at that. But not as violently as it perhaps should have — at least so far.

This is one of those cases where there's very little chance that the market will do anything but continue to decline. There could be a few weeks of chop within the $6,000 to $7,200 range, but ultimately I expect the market to drop below $6,000 (and probably stay below it for several months). 

The interesting thing about this decline is that, at least so far, it's mirroring the 2014 bubble pop quite closely:

https://imgur.com/a/zFUxj

In 2014, resistance broke, the market looked like it was going to continue to the upside, but instead it spent many months gradually riding the former resistance line down down down. 

I wouldn't be surprised if this is the path the market will take this time as well. A slow, relentless grind down with a few blips of "perhaps this time it's different" 

As for targets, the "by the books" technical target for this consolidation breakdown is $1,300. The triangle spans $5,700 at it's widest point (from $6,000 to $11,700) and the breakdown point was around $7,000.

$7,000 - $5,700 = $1,300

Do I think that's going to be the ultimate bottom? No, not really. But I'm not naive enough to rule it out entirely either.

I would assume that $3,000 would serve as very strong support in the near future, with the possibility that the market never makes it down below $4,000. But my approach is to avoid making firm predictions for events that could be several weeks to several months into the future.

As for the here and now, RSI is too oversold to rationalize hopping into a short. There should be a technical bounce in the near future followed by more consolidation like we saw between $7,000 and $7,800. At least there *should* be. 

If the market makes a straight plunge below $6,000, then I'll be shorting the breakdown pretty much regardless of what any other indicators would suggest I should be doing.
Dennis Rodman shilling Potcoin on the Trump-Kim meeting is max pain
LTC below $100 for the first time since December 
Shouldn’t have set alerts.

My golf game is now fucked as Ill just be on the course staring at charts.

#FORE 
What a shit show
Long $6500 with tight stops at $6395 in case $6400 breaks.

A bounce is due with dropping almost $1000 in the past 48 hours, and there should be strong support at $6400 to protect a double bottom, at least at the first couple of attempts.
What a beautiful bull market, I live for this stuff.
RSI oversold on most every level. Daily rsi below 30 has yielded some great runups recently to 11.7k and 10k
For Sale: 1 BTC

Only 6 months old. Asking 12k firm. Serious inquiries only.
RSI going to 0. No bottom
What a beautiful bounce, from $6440 to $6580, very strong, very bullish
Have been training a new group of people at work for the past 2 days, two kids that just started trading crypto a month ago are sure they are going to get rich shorting bitcoin to 0 on bitmex. Bullish sign.
Time to check in with our heros, it has been awhile:  https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/ClyXqInO-The-One-Coin-to-Rule-Them-All-Chapter-I/

Looks like either they took a wrong turn May 9th or decided to take the scenic route.

New chart pattern confirmed. 

Vomiting Stegosaurus: https://www.tradingview.com/x/GRIxdZf4/

Just some mid-day levity. 
This is how the most evil whale would plan the chart:

https://www.tradingview.com/x/MVZAWA9D/

Disclaimer: this is not where I think BTC will go. This whale would have to be put into a mental institution
Starting on June 18th, Wells Fargo credit cards can no longer be used to buy crypto. Probably insignificant in the long run
Why are people complaining because it's dropping? This is a trader sub, so volatility should be welcome, what am I missing? :)
I'm doing something I've rarely done this year, and that's enter a (scalp) long. Total shorts are inching closer to longs (27k vs. 29.9k), and this seems overdue for a bounce with dumps getting smaller. I doubt this drops straight past $6k within the next day or two without bouncing first, though I'm setting a safe stop\-loss just in case.

!long xbtu18 6458 5x 66&#37;

(EDIT: Slowly adding to it as we go down toward $6k, stops below that if support breaks.)
Looks like shorts are going to overtake longs soon, take that for whatever it's worth.
Today I learned that I'm really bad at scalping
FRACTAL ALERT:

July 2017 1 Day: [https://imgur.com/a/4nbxdWt](https://imgur.com/a/4nbxdWt)

Current 2018 1 Week: [https://imgur.com/a/KgjpRUW](https://imgur.com/a/KgjpRUW)

Kudos to griffin26 on tradingview for bringing this to my attention with this chart: [https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/tlo0V1AE-BTC-Capitulation-still-ahead-potential-reversal-soon/](https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/tlo0V1AE-BTC-Capitulation-still-ahead-potential-reversal-soon/)

Explanation:

Everyone has been comparing 2018 to the 2014 bear market because the charts are similar and price action has mimicked certain key events such as breaking the 50 MA on the weekly. However, most people also agree that this is a different market than 2014 and that an extended bear market should either not happen, or that it will at least be quicker due to S curve adoption. 

I think this smaller fractal from 2017 is the next most likely possibility. Let's take a look at the similarities:

1) The first capitulation (to $2,050 and $6,000 respectively) both bounced very close to the 50 MA and created identical hammer reversal candles. After that we had a rally to create a lower high, which formed a downtrend line.

2) After coming back to test the 50 MA as support again (and the support line which formed by connecting the two previous lows of $1,800 and $2,050 and $5,400 and $6,000) we then bounced up, breaking the downtrend line, yet failing to make a higher high. There is a slight difference in the two scenarios here, as in July we tested the 50MA/support line twice before breaking the downtrend line, while in 2018 we only tested it once. The general price structure is the same though.

3) After breaking the downtrend line in both cases we formed a rounded top and rolled over, doing a full retrace of the second bounce and hitting the 50 MA once again. Notice the similarities in the candle structure of this rollover, the July 1D looks nearly identical to the 2018 1W.

4) We broke the 50MA (on the daily in July, on the weekly now) and fell to the lows of the second bounce from the 50MA. 

5) MACD is very similar on both charts.

**What does this mean for the next few weeks?**

If this fractal continues playing out, we should see a pattern similar to griffin26's chart. We still need to fall to the 6200-6300 range and bounce back from there to test 6900-7000 as resistance (a breakdown of the support line). Then, we will slowly roll over again and make lower lows breaking all of the previous bottoms (including 6,000) only to stop at 5400 (which is the low of the previous crash before we went parabolic) and reverse from there. 


This scenario would fulfill bear theories that we need another capitulation, and also fulfill bull theories that a 2014-like bear market will not happen today. The charts match up, and I will trade accordingly. (Close some of my short at 6200-6300, re-short on a bounce to 6900-7000, close everything at 5500, long 5400).

Remember, this is playing out on a weekly timeframe! The next two weeks should be between 6200-7000, and the following two weeks should be 7000 down to 5400, with a potential reversal on the 5th week, which would also be a 9 on the TD indicator, just as it was a 9 on the 1D in 2017...

Eerie similarities here folks....


I gave up the dreams of a Lambo

I gave up the dreams of a nice SUV

I gave up the dreams of a nice motorcycle

I have up the dreams of a nice bicycle

I gave up the dreams of a nice pair of dress shoes

I gave up the dreams of a nice pair of tennis shoes

I gave up the dreams of wool socks

and I decided to walk to the store, barefoot, to buy my lottery tickets.


!short XBTUSD close 6550.5

With an average entry of 7577, it was a decent profit. I wish I had put in more, but it was my first short / Bitmex in my life :D

Expecting a short-term bounce here or around 6400. That high volume node is probably not gonna be broken easily
Wont lie. I consider myself an optimist and this is hard to watch. Makes me think of my friends who said they wish they got in at 10 dollars but what we need to realise that there were harder times than this that would have needed to be held through to get to millionaire level. It's not an easy road. No way I am selling here. Bitcoinmeister on YouTube is a strange guy but I believe him when he talks about holding at least until the 2020 halving. 

Question you have to ask yourself is will it be worth more then compared to now. If so hold and step away from the screen. It's summer. Enjoy life. Enjoy gains if you had held for a while and cashed some out at Christmas. If you didn't, don't sell at a loss. You will feel you earnt it when we get there. We will pass 20k by summer 2020. 
I won't give you that stat of how many day traders actually make money. Hold and come back in a few months. 


These 20$ reliefs are pathetic, better just go down at once and get it over with so we can restart
Coinbase's index fund is officially open for investment:

https://twitter.com/coinbase/status/1006679788545662976

This announcement coincided nicely with the small pump we just saw. 

Institutional money is right around the corner guys, next few days are critical, triple bottom confirming etc etc /s

This thing still looks pretty bearish to me, but a long from 6550 with a stop just under 6400 is a decent R/R right now with the RSI being under 30 and us being at a somewhat major support level around 6500
I sold 25% of my stash at aprox. 6700 and another 25% now above 6800. This basically wiped out my gains of the last month, but I felt I had to free up some cash in case we drop. I guess this reflects my bearish sentiment at the moment. I will probably sell the bounces now, even though I usually have a bullish bias.
While I understand the recent price movements are scary people seems to be reacting like we're already under 6k and dropping. The amount of panic is not proportional to the reality. We've been here twice before, actually. Nothing completely crazy seems to have happened yet. 
I was just saying to myself I wish I had entered a long when I closed my short at 6710 sunday. Although the indicators were telling me to buy, I was way too chicken to do it after the market crashing 900 USD then. And voilá, along comes a mini-dump that brings me right where I wanted to be. Well, I can't be sitting around lamenting that I didn't go long and then not do it when the opportunity presents itself.
/u/noeeel writes:

> I think when the 3D bbands get oversold the first time is a good time to buy.

I thought that was an interesting observation, so I decided to test it.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/WYcoeR0L/

That gets in the ballpark, but I want to select out my data more aggressively since we don't have a lot of data to pull from in the current conditions.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/bRMqqnZt/

It's interesting to me that we don't see a lot of clustering of flags outside of 2014 and early 2015. For 2.5 years /u/noeeel 's advice has been absolutely sound. The only time in Bitcoin' history where this advice was "bad" if you're trying to accumulate long-term happened when the market was in a terrible and extended multi-year correction. For short-term and day trading, it's a pretty incredible indicator.

Nice observation /u/noeeel . Much respect.
I observe margin shorts are increasing past 34 hours, margin longs are slowly decreasing, price is increasing slightly... I fully understand the euphoria of gains amongst the bears and the urge to gain even more by adding more shorts.
I haven't been trading much the last few weeks, basically stopped altogether once I started losing money in this slow, mostly sideways bear market.

I got back in with a 2.5x short at $7250 just in case [this happens](https://i.imgur.com/bwzbm3g.png). That ended up being a good hunch so far! I've increased the short to full 5.0x today at $6800 with the expectation that [this bear flag](https://i.imgur.com/svXWv1Y.png) will break down. Will scale it back if that doesn't materialize.
I walked away from the chart for 15mins and fuck me sideways look at that!

Time for the 6k retest is rapidly approaching... 
Pivotal place in the market and gonna be difficult to go to a party later tonight and not watch this. I keep not wanting to short the bottom, but on the other hand, when we fell from 20k -> 6k, 10k support held several times before its eventual final collapse of an additional 40%. So I still think going into the 4's is very much in play here, enough to where a breach of 6.4 is worth it to reopen a short, with tight stops just over 6500.

This is the part where the Shorter come latelys get burnt hands - Expecting a bounce between here and 6300 to high 6's
I will leave this here, an excerpt from "Mastering the Markets" about accumulation:

https://i.imgur.com/XQoKawZ.png

Yes, those highlights are my sweat and blood :D I don't think holders have been shaken out yet.
Anyone buy this? I'm going to buy this... knife catcher 4 lyfe.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/WhXwehAy/
Lot's of shorts opening on Bitfinex, currently at 26.3k

Edit: make that 26.5k
Not thinking we will see below 6.2K today but I think ETH and LTC going below 500 and 100 is very likely. 

Edit: There we go boys. Lol 
This is brutal across the board
Perhaps this is good moment to buy. Was back in April definitely, when we were hovering around 6.5k seemingly for ages.
Ethereum looks like wants to go back up, but Bitcoin doesn't want to let it out.  It could be interesting to see if the tail wags the dog.
I'm that guy still DCAing in. Remember, for every large selloff, there are people buying in. Big money can outwait small money. I had my plan to buy at specific prices and I am doing so. Believe that I am not the only one. 


Best of luck to everyone. 
 I'm not closing my $7320 til $5700.
Does anybody know the stat on how much fiat money it takes to move the price up?  i've heard its a 1 to 25 ratio.  So 1 billion of fiat would increase market cap by 25 billion
If you're feeling a bit down and want to feel bullish head over to Twitter. It's a RIP BEAR celebration over there that wick missed low by a few dollars so now bounce up. 
Can't wait for Tom Lee and the Pantera guy to get on CNBC tomorrow and tell everyone they pinky promise this time it really really really is the bottom and we're going straight to $25,000 in two weeks.
Shots fired in eth land. 30k eth in one 15 min candle, wick to 544. Maybe a failed bart attempt? Super bearish if eth loses 530 now. Btc barely moved, not sure what to make of it
So we have:

* 1) A bearish cloud front
* 2) Imminent bearish TK Cross
* 3) Price leaning towards lower BB/below SMA 20
* 4) Last TD Sell 9 below TD Buy 9 (That doesn't happen often)
* 5) Bearish leaning RSI + RSI below 60 for +35 periods (I'm experimenting with the latter metric)
* 6) Bear flag
* 7) Declining volume

Also, based on how the DeMark count has been unfolding, I think bears have let their foot of the gas to see how much buying power there is which is why you see TD Sell 9 well below the buy 9 setup; something that doesn't happen very often (usually sell 9 above buy 9). I'm not seeing capitulation by bulls; the move isn't violent enough. It's almost as if bears have walked the price down slow and steady; not even trying to force anything which is why you see a lack of TD Buy 9's on the chart (the last TD buy 9 was ~7500).

Just my 2c on what I see on the charts based on technical markers. Happy to hear other views.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/cMdMTus6/
If 6.4k falls we test a new low!
BTC came within inches of making a lower low. [The horizontal red line](https://www.tradingview.com/x/hTIRI432/). I would not be surprised if it just bounces from here like it did when it first approached the bottom of the triangle around 7050. But there'll be a lot of resistance at 6800, 7000s, 7200. 

If 6400 fails, [next target is around that box, 5900s](https://www.tradingview.com/x/dwCy0ZSO/), it's the horizontal of the "first bottom", S2 pivot and pretty close to the log down trend line from ATH (purple). There should be a ton of support there. 

*Next few hours are critical!* 

Good luck everyone.

Being 100% bear or 100% bull in the bitcoin markets is similar to being 100% straight or 100% gay but you are a sex slave and have to do whatever your owner says. In this case its the market. The market doesn't really care about your sexual preferences, it will go either way, and you might just get royally fucked. The best is to be bisexual, then you can win no matter what way the market goes. Good luck to all traders.
I gotta say, this is feeling like shorters are playing the same 'pass the hot potato' game buyers / longers were playing when we went nuts at $15k+. Back then it was, price moving up? BUY MORE! Now it's, price moving down? ADD TO SHORTS! 

Don't forget to realize some profits instead of dragging your CA lower and lower as we head into the depths, doubly so if you aren't just hedging a long-term stack with your short. So many people had excellent short entries throughout 2018 only to miss most if not all of their profits hoping for that magical capitulation down to $220 or whatever it'd take to make them actually take profits, don't become one of them. 

It doesn't look like we're close to getting a reversal here just yet, but if / when we do get one, there's going to be a pretty serious scramble for the corn. Don't repeat the bulls' mistakes and don't let arrogance and greed run your wallet. 
I've said in the past that if the meme triangle breaks down, I will become bearish and I am pretty bearish now. If we get another bounce here and complete Elliot wave E, I am getting out some of my hodl stack.

If 6000 breaks, the next target is probably a capitulation to 4800 and then bounce back to 6k and the price will remain in the 5k range for months. I just don't see 3k or 1.2k or whatever happening.

**Personal thought dump:**

I think 2014 bled out as long and as hard as it did because the the run up from 100 dollars to 1.3k happened in just a month with little to no correction. Its kinda how NANO jumped from a few cents to almost 40 dollars and has been correcting relentlessly ever since. There were no floors established during the bull run that led to the 2014 bear market because there few to no significant corrections. In contrast, the 2017 bull market was a nice extended parabolic move for over a year with plenty of cool offs/corrections in between. Things only really started to get crazy in Nov-Dec. I think this is the big difference (aside from stronger fundamentals) between 2014 and 2018 and why it's not going to play out exactly the same way. I know, "This time it's different"...
Bloody Sunday was two days ago. I was sat out yesterday but slowly coming back today.

Why was i out today? The meme triangle breakdown showed major flaws in my analysis. I knew it could happen and i had a plan ready for in case it did, great so far, problem is i didnt really EXPECT it to fall apart. cos i didnt expect it, when it happened i had a deer in the headlights moment. i didnt expect it to happen and it did, it put serious doubt in my plans.

it basically made me question my whole "system" so ive decided to shake it up a bit. I've had the Chart Guys course purchased ages ago and ive made some notes on it but this time, im gonna do my best to pick apart the course and their videos to try and adopt their "system"

Not currently in a trade as I have to re-evaluate so much but I am keeping an eye on BTC, think we're in a very delicate place. If we fall be below 6600, I don’t see 6400 holding and after that its 5k and 3k. Also think we will see some major volatility soon. As Sunday dust settles and people figure out their new plan, things could get pretty wild again.
A random question

There are many who write fiat (with an "I") and who write flat(with an "L"), as in I'm staying fiat/flat. I know the former, but is the latter correct as well?
Huge volume increase and much lower volume decrease. TA says the higher volume moves are more significant. But doesn't this just mean there were no buyers when the price fell? Any thoughts/experience?
----'Stokinator 0 points 3 hours ago'

Long at 6730, 3X. Very weak follow-through'----

So far it's holding, I'm awaiting the result to determine if he is a genius or a lunatic.

Place your bets!

I don't expect the price to recover this week since there is still downward pressure from sunday. I had shorts every $50 from 6750 to 6950, only the 6950 hasn't been filled yet. I'm looking at the 3 day and 1 week stoch rsi as they could start some upward momentum in the next week or two. The last two times we broke out of this range we relied on capitulation and the short squeeze acting catalysts for the buying pressure. I don't see either of those situations repeating now and I don't know what else could cause the price to go up that quickly.  
This week I'm thinking either sideways or more down. If we do start going up again after a week or two but fail to break 10k then I'll be ready to see sub 6k prices.  

we need some ahabs over here... 
Added 50% to my hedge. I wish I could add some reasoning here. It's a gut feeling. I'm fully aware this might just get back up.

!short XBTM18 add 6800 0.5x
Got reading on Triple Bottoms - below snippets from the chart school:

* Prior Trend: With any reversal pattern, there should be an existing trend to reverse. In the case of the Triple Bottom Reversal, a clear downtrend should precede the formation.

* Three Lows: All three lows should be reasonably equal, well-spaced and mark significant turning points. The lows do not have to be exactly equal, but should be reasonably equivalent.

* Volume: As the Triple Bottom Reversal develops, overall volume levels usually decline. Volume sometimes increases near the lows. After the third low, an expansion of volume on the advance and at the resistance breakout greatly reinforces the soundness of the pattern.

* Resistance Break: As with many other reversal patterns, the Triple Bottom Reversal is not complete until a resistance breakout. The highest point of the formation, which would be the highest of the intermittent highs, marks resistance.

* Resistance Turns Support: Broken resistance becomes potential support, and there is sometimes a test of this newfound support level with the first correction.

* Price Target: The distance from the resistance breakout to lows can be measured and added to the resistance break for a price target. The longer the pattern develops, the more significant is the ultimate breakout. Triple Bottom Reversals that are 6 or more months in duration represent major bottoms and a price target is less likely to be effective.
So now we have the key stand alone numbers to watch for...
On Binance at least.

- 6610 (not really that important just a good one to watch for todays current dump, the low from yesterdays fuckfest)
- 6430 (the 1st April low)
- 6000 (the big one, the Feb low)

Break that 6430 line and i'm sorry but even the most optimistic part of me can't see 6000 holding.




I'm actually really nervous to buy here but those shorts are sky rocketing right now so I'm feeling a bit of fomo for another BGD. We're almost at 30k shorts and holding 6.5k which is incredible. I mean, there's also the conspiracy that a whale is just taking a huge short position before dumping their coins which I guess is entirely possible. But you can make a whale conspiracy on any price movement and then you'll always be scared to enter a position. I think it's good R/R to buy now.
Haven’t made a trade in a few days.

I’ve been hypothetically making trades in my mind instead of actually trading and it’s 10x less stressful even tho I’m not making precious cash mullah.

I longed at $6650and closed over $6800 (hypothetically)

Shorted at $6850 and  closed at $6700 ( hypothetically)

It’s quite enjoyable. Try it sometime 
1k more shorts opened, this starts to feel like the late-March drop to 6800's. The more time we stay on this range without dropping (and shorts opening) the more bullish I turn.
Bill Gates was pretty fuckin right
So much for higher lows
Keep doing the opposite of what Mcafee and Novogratz say. You will do well.
That was good support at 6k7!
Pretty interesting, 3.7K BTC in shorts opened on finex in the last 48 hours while 1.8k BTC worth of longs closed. The same thing happened over several days just before the giant short squeeze at 6800 in april. If shorts continue to accumulate without another major drop that would actually be quite bullish to me.
It's ok guys McAfee says 15k by end of July /s
Shorts have to take profit at some point, and deep underwater longs are not going to sell once it starts coming back.  I don't know if this is the bottom, just saying...
Anyone else having issues with lending on bfx?  The bot I run returns successful api calls, but offers stopped working about 30 minutes ago.

Edit:  lending rates are now 10x what they were yesterday, so I can't be the only one
Took some 25% profits at 6500 from my short from 6820 and stops moved to 6650 in case this thing pops up. But holding off closing in case 6400 falls. I think we might have some bullish divs in the hourly if this takes a break to cool off here.



https://www.tradingview.com/x/sUoOgsNn/

Something to note, we have now 27K shorts to 30K longs on finex.

!short xbtusd profit 6500 25%
$243B aggregate crypto market cap is the '18 low thus far.

Can we get there?
That's OK. We still have the "double bottom" below us. And once that breaks, it's still OK, because have the "$5K round number psychological support below us", and once that breaks, it's still OK because we'll make something else up.
Apparently it doesn't come to mind to anybody here that if the 1D rsi has gone over 85 numerous times in 3 years it can go below 30 if it wants to...
It's a little nuts that the sum of USD borrowed on BFX's BTCUSD longs has almost stayed unchanged in last few months. Still around [$250M](https://api.bitfinex.com/v2/stats1/credits.size.sym:1m:fUSD:tBTCUSD/hist), which makes average (based on 30K+ BTC of margin longs) margin long base of $8,300 or so. I mean, it does go up and down a bit so I'm assuming their API isn't broken?
And to think, the last time we touched 7.7, I thought to myself "I should short this" but then decided "nah"
Closed my short too early last night which is a bummer but I'm gonna have to keep avoiding the temptation to short the bottom. That fucked me more than anything in the bear market.
You guys watching Bitfinex shorts RSI? . . https://www.tradingview.com/x/UiYLXcaF/
Bull div on the 4h [chart](https://www.tradingview.com/x/TpWHnMed/)?

edit: actually you know what? I wouldn't be surprised if I wake up and the price is back to 6.7-6.8k. This shit is way too low, friends.
Bubble cycles. Buy it, forget about it and come back in a few years. 
What happens when daily RSI has gone below 30?
Last time was in late March = 6.5k to 10k
Before that was early Feb = 6k to 11.7k
Before that was Sept 2017 = 3k to 20k
Before that was Jul 2017 = 2k to 5k
I could go on. ...  today Daily RSI is 29. Good day.
3d RSI got down to 22.5 in 2014 bear market.   It's still about 35 right now.  
Plenty of room for much more pain.
Remember just a few weeks ago when everyone in this sub was convinced the market had reversed and any slightly bearish post was downvoted?  
[deleted]
I'm getting that same vibe now that I had during the two-week failed rally at 7.5-7.6k: this is distribution in tailspin price action to mark the beginning of the end of this market cycle. Permabulls 'buying the dip' should be careful loading up bags too hard, this ship potentially has a lot more downside.
looks like it wants to paint a lower low today


the old local low was 6425 on Finex, we are 50 USD away. Bears should have the power to test a outbreak with this volume pretty soon. 
Pretty massive bullish div on the 4h. Opened a scalp long at 6495
I hate to ask this, but is there anyone here who bought below $5000 and has not sold any BTC since then?   
Unless the market swoops in (like everyone call grandma about the good price?) I don't see traders pushing this back any higher than the range of a technical bounce...

At least I'd sure a hell cover at least part of a long from here before 7k (resistance of the big previous symmetrical triangle)
bad news for bulls short term imo. I drew this possible bear flag channel last night when we were still holding over 6800 and it looks to be playing out: https://imgur.com/a/qBMBxku 
I'm literally throwing money at the screen!! Cheap crypto galore. Scoping up sum that 99 dollar litecoin!!
Picture perfect bear pennant https://imgur.com/NovxYiO
This feels like it's about to dump off a cliff.

edit: welp, that was quite the wick. I had a buy fill on sept at 6558. I'm closing that right here, as I think we're seeing the technical bounce stall out.
[This broke down](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8qfytx/daily_discussion_tuesday_june_12_2018/e0ja4f9/), it seems. EDIT: Stop loss triggered for the last two thirds of my long. I closed one third of it earlier today at the top of the pennant. I'm out of position and refurbishing apartment. EDIT2: That didn't go far. Support at $6700? 
Stopped out of my long from 6710 at 6650. Oh well. Btc bear flag broke down. Alts are crashing hard, should have seen it coming with ETH and BCH going through support lines like cheese.
Serious noob question here, If I want to get back on Kraken and start trading with leverage, but I'm in fiat, do I have to bite the bullet and buy BTC in order to start a margin long/short? My exchange doesn't support Tether.
My TA, for the record, is that we'll reject $6,500 and have a small retrace (close at $6,625) before continuing downward to test a new low.
[deleted]
Managed to close my long from $6,730 for a small profit yesterday. My buy order at $6,470 was hit but considering exiting at any sign of breakdown. Looking at $6,800 and $7,000 as potential targets to close and open a short on spot.

1d and 3d indicators looks bearish af.
Looks like we're in a small ascending triangle pattern (green lines on my chart). The technical target would be a little over 6700 if it breaks up, which would line up with the support line of our previous bear flag (red lines on my chart). That line is currently at about 6715. 

That said, I wouldn't be surprised to see us push higher to retest the line we broke on Sunday (purple). I have some adds to my short between 6900-7100 in case we go that high.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/M6dW5VN3/

Overall, there may be some scalping opportunity for a long here in the short term, but I don't see a lot to be bullish about on the charts.
Can mods see who votes on a post? I swear u/diydude has a bunch of alt accounts upvoting his terrible trade advice 
 LTC sub 100 USD, Monero sub 120 USD, ETH sub 500 USD substract 33&#37;  from those values and its time to buy  and hodl a month or so.
This confirms the triangle break. Now we bear flag until we test 6k.
Short squeeze! 
by the way, kraken 2kBTC EUR whale wall is back at 5250EUR (6100USD). It's the one that held us last time at 6400$ (crosses fingers)
Still trying to learn some TA.

If 6500 holds, this looks like how you would want a triple bottom to look, correct?  The triple touch on the horizontal, the time frame between the touches spaced out, and descending highs along the way.

What am I missing that I should be looking at?
When will we break ATH again
I'm sorry I couldn't resist: https://i.imgur.com/woPwDWJ.png

I'm so sorry.
Love the smell of fresh Money on Kraken :)  
Brought my Monthly and hold for > 1 year give a shit if we are now bottomed or not. 
CBOE and CME would be good they said
When everyone says short, time to go long. When everyone says moon, time to short. 
Hypothetically, if the major crypto exchanges got together and decided that they wouldn't allow the price to drop below the support of 6450 (previous low) because that would lead to a long\-term downtrend draining investor confidence and costing them hundreds of millions of $ in trading revenue, would they have enough capital to prop this market up from falling below support?
Is this Goblin Town I'm seeing?
Hi guys, just a lurker here and not a trader (so complete noob) \- looking too add some bitcoin to a longer term stack. I said to myself last month I'd add if we drop below 7000 but I'm just wondering how safe it is to buy now? Would it be safer to buy only after we have a break up past a resistance level?
When a local newspaper yesterday wrote about "bitcoin crashed 10% during  last week", I knew it was a possible sentiment time to buy. Same with "Is bitcoin back" I saw in NYT a month or so ago at 9400 :D

Listen to Ed Seykota  http://www.seykota.com/tribe/pages/2003_Feb/index.htm#Magazine%20Cover%20Analysis

>About the only sure thing is that there aren't any sure things. 
The Magazine Cover Indicator seems to work better, with very emotionally evocative covers.

>The May 3, 1999 cover bull seems dark and somber and relatively devoid of emotion. No fire is coming out of the nostrils. The bull below is radiant and seems a little stronger, yet still not much evidence of frothy ebullience.

But also remember, just an indicator
Did anyone monitor the tape prints and the order book during the 6430s today? Especially on multiple key exchanges?  (I was away from pc). If you know good sources of past data for tape prints and order book, pls drop a link, thanks a lot!
https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/U5ZP2CnC-Bitcoin-Issa-bottom/

Long avg 6450... adding down to 6300. 
[removed]
when BGD short squeeze
Remember when people thought we hit the bottom? LUL
The only bullish sign we have is that shorts are going parabolic and they are always easily pushed out.
Tone Vays has been predicting this drop for months, saying a bounce off 4985 is most likely.

Is he right for once?
Contrarian advice but I actually think we're approaching a good intersection for a short term long... this may take one more track down to $6.4k and then get a decent bounce. Watching the 4hr currently.

Mid-term I'm still super bearish.
Exiting my short with a miniscule gain.  There's obviously no follow-through on Sunday's dump.
Forget Bitcoin, move on to some new stuff. This is done and dusted for sure.
I corrected the mistakes, please reread before you downvote. Thx

In 2013 we started from around 100 USD base to 1100 USD (an x11) in mid 2015 we started form a 250 USD base to 19500 USD ATH (an x78). The time frame of the "2013 bubble" and the "2017 bubble" are very different.

I have a new perspective where I see the whole mid 2012 to end end 2013 as the first major Bitcoin bubble (we started from a base of around 5 USD to 1100 USD; an x220). \[x220 is much closer to our x78 (220/78 = x2.8) than the x11 to x78 (78/11 = x7.1)\]

The "2017 bubble" started actually mid 2015 (time span comaprable to the previous major mid 2012 to end of 2013 bubble). See this image to understand what I mean: [https://imgur.com/a/R5dYhi2](https://imgur.com/a/R5dYhi2)

In the first major bubble we had these minor bubbles which we had not in that form in the previous major 1.5 years bubble, only had those minor corrections on the way. But looking at the image tells me, it makes more sense to aggregate mid 2012 to end of 2013 into one major bubble and to compare it with the second major bitcoin bubble.

The result of this mid 2012 to end 2013 bubble was this extended bear market we had. As both major Bitcoin bubbles are now very much comparable I expect an extended bear market again. We dont know if it gets more worse of less worse. Just taking the same factor decline we should be "smart" to go back into crypto (as standard holding) when we decrease to the pointto which we decreaed after 2014. In 2014 we decreased from ATH to low = 22&#37;. 22&#37; correction would mean a BTC price of around 4300 USD.
So we have a fairly strong support range around $5800 - $6800: https://imgur.com/TLTCL8W 

How many of you are expecting us to break down through this within the near future?
Volume deflating, no buyers in sight. 

Will the bottom hold, find out tonight?

Edit: bye bye.
Purely hypothetically. Given that bitmex futures are dollar denominated can there ever be a situation where the total btc in short contracts exceeds the 21 million actual btc?

I'm not that bearish is just a question out of interest as to what would happen
here we go again
Someone who understand divergences: what makes a valid one? is it only the most recent highs and lows?

are any of these valid:

A: https://www.tradingview.com/x/03CpEyXh/

B: https://www.tradingview.com/x/Q3lDb6qA/
Dump 'o clock is back? Both recent dumps initiated ~18:30 CET. That voice from "Arrested Development" yelling *coincidence!*.
Is that a bearish pennant again? Keep adding those shorts at these levels... almost on\-par with the longs.
Long from $6,692, will post explanation later - somebody pray for me. 

Edit: I told myself if I had another shot at longing from anywhere in the $6,6XX I would do it, so here’s to sticking to the plan. This is a big (for me) entry and I’ll bail if $6,500 falls. 

Edit2: Well THAT was quick, uncle! Stops haven't hit yet but seems likely. 
You think this is pain, wait and see if $5k is broken... then you'll learn what real panic selling is.
This may be detrimental to adoption. Won’t somebody please think of the adopters!
Since longing the dip isn't working it's time to short and make money.
What's the sub consensus on what caused this most recent drop below $7000? I haven't been as active here as I would like to be because of boring school bullshit. 
[deleted]
Need 6k to capitulate.
Does anyone have a sense for scale regarding the total qty of BTC sold to get down here vs the total holdings from some of the larger players like miners?

The point/question.  How much BTC would it take for a whale to send us right back up to 7k+?  And how much does that compare to the wallet size for some of the biggest players?
Out of all positions...too many shorts to feel comfortable for me but will short another breakdown.
No way I am going to go long, so will wait to see if we get a bounce to open another short, after the fomo shorters get shaken out

Peace and good trading
Yall dont seem to realize that we're already so low... As if going lower only means more selling pressure. It's like the average commenter here thinks that if it goes juuuust slightly lower that its going to crash to 0. That's not how this works. That's not how any of this works.      
E: to simplify. trading 101: "buying pressure increases as a stocks value decreases"
The market is becoming very nasty lately and more impredictable than it ever was. Especially since early April with that huge green candle. We know the traders from traditional finance are entering cryptos. It's the end of the whales era. Now it's all about the sharks. Sharks will do everything to make us lose our shirt. I consider quitting all this Bart mess and stuff. It's pure gambling nonsense at this point...
Bears shouldn't get ahead of themselves here. One giant candle up to 7k will obliterate all these shorts, happened before and will happen again.
Lost  $350 the last couple of days. Thought I bought a dip at 7.100.  :-(

Panic sold now and staying out until 5K hits (hopefully).
[removed]
RIP BTC we knew it would happen.
dunno if anyone follows user100000 on tradingview but he just called this the triple bottom...can go as low as 6,437 before invalidating his count....
[Bearish](https://www.tradingview.com/x/saBAm1tt) RSI movement on the hourly and MACD turning downwards, and getting rejected by the cloud
6 week till 15k according to mcafee

https://twitter.com/officialmcafee/status/1005940089745297408?s=19

Don't worry guys, come July 6 we'll see a short squeeze of all those wall street bonus bought coins with tax return money sitting on the sidelines because BTC fundementals are better now then they were 3 weeks ago
Currently still [having this mind set](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8lywrt/daily_discussion_friday_may_25_2018/dzkhz5l) and after this last drop I was able to sell what coins I had left after getting rid of most of my 2014 BTC at 8k.

Again, if you are sitting on coins that you purchased pre October 2017, I woupdnt be sitting in anything other than fiat. Any one after that, I guess hodling is still a strong strategy but forget about BTC and come back in the fall, minimum.

I'll wait for atleast 4k, that's been my plan since selling at 8k. Remember having a plan is key, pick one and stick to it. As for the day traders, y'all have some giant kohones.

Happy trading yall
On Bitfinex you get 0.12 &#37; for BTC lending per day, that is effectivly a gain of 45&#37; per year.
The lower we go, the more bullish I am.
Double bottom reversal shaping up (6450 on Apr 1 and today)
Why boy, why? I just snorted a line, I didnt want to be watching these dumb electronic lines on a chart. I need a line that goes straight up my nose and makes me go electric. Im going to be making some wild decisions, thats for certain.  


Just went long $30k @ $6471 \-\-\-  S/L @ $6300.  


My basis for longing;  


Triple bottom signs, RSI going deep on 1D, so far horizontal support holding at the triple bottom level. Volume declining, I believe we are going through accumulation phase. Tell tale signs of a triple bottom with accumulation going on.  


Im happy that no matter what, I wont be feeling shitty tonight.  


I'll see ya'll tomorrow. Im out! Will not take one more look at charts tonight.
Dumb question - where do you guys enter shorts and longs? I'm a hodler but I hear you can actually make money in a bear market??
Is it just a short covering till $7000 or we can hope for Bitcoin to rebound even higher any soon?
Is there any stat out there, to calculate how much would the price drop if i were to sell 200,000 BTC immediately ?
Anyone getting rekt here worse than on Sunday's rekt?
upwards triangle on the 5m
BCH dumping, expect BTC to follow. 
damn, shorting is free money right now. Sooo good.
Soros has been sent to destoy you Bitcoin...
[deleted]
When this explodes downwards it's gonna be massive, like run to the hills kind of movement, 10x short, see you guys at 3k
Stopped out of my long yesterday from 6750 at 6790 overnight. That's 5 winners out of the last six trades, all long. Trying another here. Long from 6700 2x. One of these days, I'll be chasing an April-sized BGD. Last time we bounced around between 6.6 and 6.7 for a few days, the BGD followed. Expecting much the same here.
Long at 6730, 3X.  Very weak follow-through.  
A few noobs here and there asking advice how to short. There is only one possible outcome to this, eventually.
Anyone know if the BitMEX API is more responsive than the website in times like this? Can't get an order in without spamming the crap out of it and by then the price has obviously moved.
Disclaimer: I'm a noob.
[deleted]
No buy volume seriously?
u/justanotherlogin/, it seems PnL for short positions are calculated by (entry - currentprice)/currentprice when it should be (entry-currentprice)/entry

Am I not right?

Someone with a short entry at 9860 has 50% PnL right now when it should be around 33%. If BTC reaches 3000, his PnL would be like 200%
shorts jumped too high, will be liquidated. going long here
It's time to go long
Still no heavy rebounce, shit this is going to end badly.
Shorts are building up now. Think it might be time for a little squeeze/bounce to refresh the RSI before we go any further.
This is the real dip guys, dont miss it!
btc moved 20 bucks. stop looking at 5m charts.
Bullish me is trying to tempt me to add here.   
Bearish me is trying to convince me I will have much better oppertunity short / mid term  


For some perspective. Cashing out here would put my initial investment since i started crypto back to pretty much break even (few &#37; profit give or take, depending on all the fees)   


But the only thing on the line right now is realised profit assuming i DO sell my holdings. I could watch untill we confirm the failure of our current support channel which would confirm breakdown of our latest bottom. if this happens i don't even want to wait to see if 6k will hold because i seriously doubt that considering the current sentiment. It's way different then it was back in Jan & feb   


I'm not worried long term btw, but I don't want to miss the oppertunity to rebuy at 3k, because i'd consider it a verry plausible scenario when and if we break our current support channel.   

What was that about June Moon? 
"Higher low! Bullish!"

I left the market some weeks ago, don't like to gamble. Will enter on full capitulation or if i miss on confirmation of a new bullrun.

edit: My "7.7-7.8k max and then below 7k" -prediction was on point, thanks for your downvotes: https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8mw5vt/daily_discussion_tuesday_may_29_2018/dzrp4rb/?context=0
I hope people longing here are prepared if this floor falls out. You got stops bud? Will you get liquidated on a long wick? You must prepare yourself for any scenario. Nothing is certain in markets.


Same goes for you shorties. Where are your stops? Whatcha gonna do if this holds? Can you hold this short if we test the top of the major downtrend channel? 


If you aren't prepared for any scenario I can honestly say you are literally a shit trader. You might be a great gambler, but you are shit at trading.
Need some advice. 
I had a 10x short from 6747, FOMOed, changed and added it too a 25x short with an average entry of 6600. I just might regret that.  
Where would you guys put a stop loss in this situation?  
Right now I have it in loss @ 6680. But I'm wondering if I should put it in profits despite the chance of it triggering is so much higher.
only 2 blocks mined in the last hour, sellers without btc in exchanges are probably getting impatient lel
This is one of the hairiest longs (from 6600) I've ever been in, but I'm pretty sure it will turn green by Friday at latest. If not, I can afford to let it ride for a while. Also still looking for a good place to just buy to hold. Almost pulled the trigger at 6500 but decided to wait in case this long goes south for a little while. Pretty sure we'll see a couple more dumps. Just a question of how enthusiastically they're bought up.
another low in 3... 2...
8200, 7600 and now 6700 - respect !! :P
Capitulation is close.
litecoin under 100$.  So now remember at 9500 you were like wow if i could just get bitcoin a little lower so 6500 is here you should be all in right?



This comment section is just as bad as /r/cryptocurrency thanks to all these deluded moonbois. Market looking extremely bearish
I would like to take this opportunity to thank Dumpy for his sacrifice in making Bitcoin affordable to the working man and woman again. 

That being said, I'm closing my ill-considered long from 6700 this morning at a loss and buying back what I lost.

PS - I'd be really curious to know how many of you measure your trading gains and losses in BTC. I used to measure it in dollars, but I find it's more logical to keep track of in BTC since my goal in trading is always to get more of that.  If I wanted dollars I'd sell some of what I bought back in the day.
[The moment of truth?](https://imgur.com/a/rEaSyNZ).

Edit: I posted this more as a question than a statement, and I'd be happy to be proven wrong. 
We are at the bottom of a downtrend channel on my chart. We bounced off this line twice on 24/5 and 29/5 and RSI is shit in many TF so we should at least bounce here.

Edit: [Chart](https://i.imgur.com/Qmy1AgX.png)
[deleted]
is it preparing to bart??
If this is 2014 there'll be a pump to 10kish eventually in july or august, before the big drop, in that moment, I'm liquidating 100%, out of the markets
T minus 17 hours til weekly candle closes! Looks like it will close pretty well outside bottom support for the big pennant we've been drawing since 5k!
The surest trade in the markets is the triple bottom bounce-- expect price to bounce hard from this area.
[deleted]
[removed]
we'd be lucky to stop at 5k. if that doesn't hold, try 2.5k. 
Nothing feels better than watching the shitcoins bleed to death and hit all time lows.. Wish Bitcoin could decouple from the alts once this is over.. and the whole market goes through a clean-up
Recently, every time I take a "dump", the price takes a "dump" too. I've decided to just hold it in going foward. Maybe i'll drink lots of Pepto to keep it in. Oh man, that's gonna be one BRD when I eventually have to go again.
Cheap prices attracts buyers.
Down down we go. Drop and sideways movements will be the moto for 2018 and 2019
Will it test 6k7 again or bart up?
Looks like baggies are still in total denial and don't understand that bubbles don't correct 70&#37; or 80&#37;. Bubbles correct 95\-99&#37;. Those who were greedy, naive or plain dumb will pay the ultimate price. Enjoy your 1000$ BTC lol
Eta on the suicide hotline threads? I keep thinking it's the bottom but it never comes.
That ATH is looking mighty attainable if you look at the one year line either linear or logarithmic. It will take some time, but I have no doubt we will get there and beyond, even if this does dump down to $5K which I strongly doubt it will.
Hahaha, so happy now I sold BTC entirely few months ago. Initially I thought there will be nice summer rebound. Now its sadly looking like end is near. 5k here we go. 6k hold back in Feb, interesting to see, if it holds now
makes you wonder what the big insider whales know that you dont know eh. 
Can I post here? 

EDIT: woops I can. So. The subs are really reflecting the market sentiment. Jesus. 18 upvotes? 

Divergence in this year or the next one? 
[removed]
I still think we will see sub 1000 prices this year. I don't think we've seen panic dumping yet. Not even close.
Btc will drop atleast to 6000 before we experience a sideways movement for atleast a few months followed by a rise to 9 k and then another drop to mid 6k levels. Its gonna be a long, arduous journey back to 5 figures. I predict we.wont be touching 5 figures for atleast another year. The market has clearly spoken this year and all signs point to side ways momentum between 6k and 8k for the next 6 months atleast

Edit: just lol at all the moonbois downvoting me. 
It ain't the bogdanoff's! That's deflecting from the fact that Rothschilds, Rockefellar, and Soros are involved in crypto. Rothschilds alone is worth trillions of dollars and are the most weslthy family in existence. That's your bogdanoff.
Holy shit man, that's actually really fucking cool. O_O

How do you do this? Thought you were just a big math/finance guy, haha
I would hands down 100% make a poster/frame a picture of this and hang it in my bedroom. 


That looks awesome. Is it drawn + overlap chart over it?
Suggestion: make the unused (y-) axis reflect volume.

Edit Suggestion #2: Add clouds (real not ichmiku) at 6k? 
The Valley of Despair.
I would love to print that and hang it.

Is that the highest resolution you can do?
chewy pls my family 
its like watching stranger things and "eleven" (in german "elfie") comes back in the 2nd last episode. 
Was slowly starting to worry about you. Good to hear you. Sad you missed that break down :-(
I was about to tag you in a post to see where you were. I'm a little surprised you didn't jump into the bounce up to 6800, but I certainly get life being busy and getting in the way. That was me a couple weeks ago.

Excellent analysis as always.
I was laughed out of this forum and downvoted for offering the identical prediction based on 2014. We’re facing a two year bleed out to $1500 or so before the next halvening brings us back up. 
Link?
And finally that short that you recommended weeks ago turned green.

Worth it, I guess.
It's holding better than ETH. 
ETH ratio dumping today as well
Four K coming? Sell SEll SELL!
Right with you
Good trade. I'm in at an average of 6600 and looking to win 6 of my last 7. You almost can't go wrong with low leverage longs.
I've said it a few times, but the week timeframe hasn't seen oversold conditions since 2015. We're 12 points above it currently.

That would signal the phase of despair
Daily RSI got down to something like 22.5 back in 2014 bear market.  
We gave zero fucks about RSI on the run to 20k. I think we'll see the same for the capitulation.
Whats the mileage on that bad boy?
Is it a coinbased virgin?
Two questions: 

1. First owner?
2. What is the mileage?
Will you take 6730 for it?

You don't have to answer now, the offer is there until it's not (in case you change your mind).
 was it used for illegal purchases?
pretty sure it's a MtGox veteran.
    strcat(Crypto_Chad69.Posts,'\s')
Bullish.
what is this a pump for ants?
Never ever change
lol :(
/s? Lol
Really? Weak bounce considering the bottom was broken 
They'll get liquidated on a 5-10% bounce and lose their shirt and quit trading
It's certainly possible with high leverage...it has worked so far this year.  But yes, they will probably find some way to screw it up.
Rallies get sharp after prices fall a long way. The percentage is high even though the real amount relative the past trading range is small. You can see this with every single pumped shtcoin. Somewhere during the bleedout phase there is a totally pointless rally of 50% or something. 

As long as you are holding your short from the top there is nothing to worry about. If you get in low you can get smashed.
short it to zero....so at the end they're holding a bunch of worthless digital coins
One does not simply walk into Mordor. Its black gates are guarded by more than just Orcs. There is evil there that does not sleep; the Great Eye is ever watchful. It is a barren wasteland, riddled with fire and ash and dust. The very air you breathe is a poisonous fume. Not with ten thousand men could you do this. It is folly!
Typically followed by the market extinction meteorite formation
Oh shit, and there's blood in the puke and everything. This Stegosaurus about to die off.
I think he is shitting and vomiting and the same time.
Go home Stegosaurus, you're drunk
That's actually how I'd imagine a large descending triangle playing out from here (if the price were to pop up over 7k first)...
That is so perfect. 
What made you pick that path?
Bitcoin will outlast Wells Fargo
[deleted]
Debit cards are better. I don't know why anyone would use something that encourages going into debt... Not to mention going into debt to invest in a volatile, speculative asset. That's just plain foolish.
Yes one credit card is insignificant.  All credit cards is very significant and this is just another one to add to the already huge list.
That's just how this sub's been since ATH.

Also you can't have volatility if the price reaches 0, so plummeting towards lower lows is usually not a super great feeling :(
At some point it is kind of globally "bad" if your asset falls from 19k to 5k and below.  Hard to get people interested again, take it seriously (as a store of value no less!), and it takes longer to recover (even a chance it might never recover or be superseded by newer tech), in my opinion.

That would be disastrous if the asset you've hoarded and shorted and longed to get more of became worthless.  Something to think about when you zoom in on the charts too much and don't see the bigger picture. 
The permabulls who don't know what they got into haven't been shaken out yet.  We'll be back to normal in a few months.  Can't come soon enough imo
Many people here refuse to short....or even sell, for that matter.
Same, stops just below $5.900. I'm basing the trade on the oversold daily RSI, bull div on the 4 hour, decreased long to short ratio, horizontal resistance at $6.400 holding (for now), the sense of panic that is in the air, and just a sense that at least a small bounce is overdue. There are, of course, reasons against (it is basically trading against the trend), but... fuck it. It's meant as a scalp, stop is relatively tight, so I'm thinking the R/R is decent enough. 
It'll be fine, open more and bigger shorts ;)
Shorts are going to close and drop one way or another soon--but it could be to take bigger profits.
I'm agnostic on the shorts movement until it gets majorly lopsided, but I am a bit of a subscriber to a slow grind theory....starting to doubt a mega capitulation below 6k will happen without bouncing and retesting the upper 6's
Last time that happened BTC gained 15% in less than an hour. Shorts are going up fast. A bit too fast, it's a little concerning tbh
Did you try to scalp against the trend?
He still has money for lottery tickets!!

Dump some more!
would be ironic if you could buy lottery tickets with bcore-legacy.

Just wanna thank /u/Palmerstoned for sharing his idea. I couldn't have shorted this without your [chart](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8ontzj/daily_discussion_tuesday_june_05_2018/e051n7a/)

[Here's](https://www.tradingview.com/x/jsbLdnNi/) how I modified the interpretation:


Wow nice!  Your first trade is a 1k range!  Don't get cocky those are special!
Damn, good job dude. 
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtusd

* Opening value: 7,485.00

* Average value: 7,485.00

* Closing value: 6,550.50

* Leverage: 1.00X

* Stack: 5.00%

* PnL: 12.23%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


Well-played
It’ll be worth 20k if it’s something people want to use and not just a speculative gamble. 
not until all the knife catchers have bloody hands

Everyone thinks this is the best long they could do. It's kind of silly because the best long was the one last time we're here. 

Now that everyone thinks it's so obvious and free money I'm inclined to believe they're very late to the party 
minimum investment is $250,000. Seems to be targeting whales and institutional investors. Demand must be there for this offering
The problem with a stop under 6400 on BitMEX is that you won't be able to get an order through for some time when it breaks that level.  Although I guess you can place the order beforehand and have some slippage.  But that's the way to go and I just use too many mental stops.
this is really bullish news. you think Coinbase is going to allow big money investors to lose shit tons of money? they are the real whales who have money and one of the top exchanges in the world. they won't allow this to fail IMO.
> Institutional money is right around the corner guys

Been hearing this since 2013
> Coinbase's index fund is officially open for investment

Index fund consisting of BTC, ETH, BCH, LTC, and soon to come ETC. I mean, I know this is a well beaten horse but damn, this is like anti-diversification. 
how long you been holding?
If that is not a buy signal then what is anymore?
Doesn't seem so panicked to me.

Or at least not compared to the kind of panic I saw when I felt sickened from the price action like last february, or off 1K, or silk road (which didn't even turn out so bad), etc.  Like you say, nothing crazy, still within a familiar range.
I remember when the price touched 6000 in February. That was the actual panic. It was like walking an empty, foggy and desolated street stumbling upon bodies. Including this sub.

I am not sure if we are to see actual panic again. It's clear Bitcoin works in cycles. After a "6", it can do a "10", then another "6" and then we shall see. Secondly, it is not going away. If it lasted Q1 and now slowly creeping up on Q2, it is here to stay. Even if it get stuck in the Goblin Town, that's to a limit too. 

Basically, anything can happen. It's a given it will be back at "10" at some point, at very least. Sure, if  things really go wrong, it may take some time to recover, maybe months, but it will recover.
last like 8 new comments are bullish/about buying. I don't see much panic yet. We haven't even gone up yet either.

I'm consistently dumbfounded at the sentiment of this sub

people are happier to buy btc at $6k than see it go to $10k. imo not a good sign because it means the small fishies missed out on $6k first two times around. Now they think it's a bargain

This sub will go from being bullish about the price increasing to being bullish over price going sideways to being bullish that we're not tanking as fast as we used to lol 


The triangle broke downwards. After all that sideways chop, the market has chosen that downward is the direction we are going. Outlook is bleak. 
Last time we were here we weren’t chilling sideways on low volume.
Except that the rejection off 6900 and return to 6700 is indicative of a technical bounce, and you don't often want to long the second trip to support in a downtrend (a la 7300 on Sunday).

edit to add: But if you have a plan/strategy, it's usually better to follow it than to trade emotionally/reactionary. So good luck
Or it is a sign you made the right thing not longing since we are already back to the same place 
We've just been rejected from 6900. There's too much risk for longing anything more than 50 dollars right now.
> Well, I can't be sitting around lamenting that I didn't go long and then not do it when the opportunity presents itself.

Sure you can, that is the best kind of hypocrisy.
I think some are struggling to get this, looking at the comments. And maybe the market situation is not perfect now for this example. Remember last summer, the big sell\-offs when we were under 5k?  Traders were shaken out of their holdings. Big fish bought more at 3k, adding to massive stashes bought sub 1k. The accumulation was truly enormous, from 2015 until the moment bitcoin reached over 1k usd again. That is serious accumulation. I'm not sure we are seeing accumulation now. This looks more like shaking traders out of their money. Destroying them when they are long em masse, and when they are short em masse. When this bottoms, traders will have 3 ass\*holes each, no coins, and no money. And then it pumps.
we are not rising slowly. quite the reverse.
Good info.  So how do you know whether holders have or haven't been shaken out yet?

[Edit]  Let me rephrase my question because there is somewhat of an answer in the excerpt.   If there is resistance, then still weak hands, if it just flows up, weaks hands are gone.  Or let me change my question.  How do you shake out weak hands if you start with nothing?

[Edit2] you want to buy 10million worth of BTC (currently don't own any).  How do you shake out weak hands?  I'm a bit confused.  

-You don't want weak hands because they will sell during the price rise as you buy thereby lowering the price again. (article says this is bad, but why?)
-So you somehow eliminate the weak hands so that when you buy the price maintains its gains, but you have to keep buying at a higher price. (is this good? but the first part says this is bad)

If someone can pretend to be a whale and explain how to shake out the weak hands i would really appreciate it.

One of you will get the bottom and it'll be incredibly profitable. I personally don't think it's here but I'm perhaps not as good at knife catching as I am at getting the top

Good luck mate, really takes balls to call the trend's bluff

#respect 
Good luck!
And finally just beginning to maybe become parabolic on the chart, and RSI is really heating up now.
Sure. The fact that ETH/BTC are still so highly valued tells a lot about where we are in the bear market. ETH ~300 and LTC ~80 really wasn't too long ago and these prices were "great". Feels like 300/80 will quickly come back as support. What was BTC's price at that time? This is what we need to look at imo.
Not only are we at the same bottom price level as then, the Daily RSI is also the same
It has only been 3 hours.
It's a gamble as usual.

Pro buying: We didn't go straight to 6k. Support at 6500 or so seems to hold (for now). April so far was very similar, the futures closed, the weekend ended, there was a dump, and then an enormous BGD.

Against: This happened late at European evening, i.e. markets closed. It's too early for East Asia, it's at night for Europe, and it's past End of Business for the US. The questions is: how will markets react to the dump to 6500 when they wake up?
This time is different
7500 was good time to buy also apparently

Edit: the Dead Sea isn't as salty as some of you bulls in here lol. To be fair I should of seen the down votes coming.
ETH is also looking much healthier than BTC currently on the daily and 1 week time frames. ETH is well above the last low while BTC is flirting with disaster.
The hero we need
Ask yourself, do you think the number of weekly/monthly buyers is increasing or decreasing.  That should determine your long term trade plan.  I am on the increasing side.
Best is to DCA and save money on the side during bear market and chunk buy at the "bottom", don't DCA and just save money during bull run, rinse and repeat.
31.7% stop loss...that is pretty loose, but if you are going for a home run, out of the park with catching the absolute bottom, then I sort of get it.
There is really no good way to predict this other than look at the current offer book.  If everyone stopped selling below 10k, a $1 buy would put us back to 10k each.
Here play with this . . https://data.bitcoinity.org/markets/books/USD
It definitely takes less to push it up than it does to push it down. You can easily see that by looking at the volume on big candles -- less volume on spikes up than on Similac dives down.
Just because Tom Lee wears glasses doesn't mean that he's an expert.
To be fair, Lee has only said that 25k is not an unreasonable target for EOY. He's also said that 6k is probably our bottom, which we still haven't gone down past. And by the look of how many shorts there are it seems like pushing past 6k will be very difficult.
2 casualties/liquidations, 10 injuries/ SLs reported on BTCUSD Shorts front. Over.
Lately, when eth pumped but failed to drag Btc it ended up dumping again.
But i'm not shorting it since btc can rise and eth will rise more. 
On the 15 and 30 on bfx, this had as much volume as the first recovery candle around $503. If you believe in the Gartley/bat patterns, ETH made one starting from the bottom of the dip (visible on 15m-1h). But all of this sits inside a massive bear flag that is yet to be invalidated. For now, I think BTC still determines direction.
just sayin, eth is 529 now (finex)

with that many indicators you have got to be right
I think when the 3D bbands get oversold the first time is a good time to buy. 
I've found TD on 1H on bitcoin to be a bit noisy, prefer the 4H and 1D for the setups (though I don't think I've ever seen the next phase complete, but anyway my app doesn't show that).
I thought that was 6050?

Edit, why the downvote, we hit that in February?
I know I’m personally looking to get out around 7k. Don’t see any amazing news on the horizon and the market chose its direction as soon as that triangle broke. We’re going down and I don’t see much of a reason why 6400 should hold now after a bit of a bounce and then rejection.
Thank you- definitely agree with this.  As far as I can see, no new low was made on any exchange.  A very key level to hold.
it really is crazy how close it got! so lucky!! /s
You still gotta watch out for the ladyboys.
Interesting analogy... then the challenge would still be when to fuck an ass or when to fuck a pussy
Okay, but what does this have to do with being a sex slave? You took a left turn there, and I got lost.
your annalogy is weired/pervert
Probably goes without saying, but the best time to buy is when everyone is completely convinced it's going down and starts to question whether it will even recover. I don't think we're quite there yet, but most of the sentiment in this sub is bearish, and it gets more bearish the lower we go. Hah :)
Agreed... in my estimate we'll get a small bounce at $6.4k and a larger one at $6k which will sober the sell off.  Same old story - buy supports, sell resistance. 
Meme triangle was for people that refuse to think. It was 100% to break down. What could possibly create a floor for an asset as powerfully lopsided at BTC? Only an enormous scaling up of actual use demand. This takes years, or more likely, never.

2 year bear market unlikely I agree, 4-5 years is more in line with the time needed for the process to work itself out. 5k was just an impossible number a few months ago.
Why are so many on this sub so bearish?  I'm looking for reasons, not arbitrary lines on charts.  What would cause people to sell, not buy?  I'm not seeing any significant FUD in the news. The price hasn't been much under 6000 since early November so why would it go there now?  Not seeing it, guys.  Help me out here.
Which course is it?
Feel free to write questions as you go through and send them our way when done. 
flat means not long or (net) short. You could be 1x short on bitmex and be flat. 

in fiat means you're cashed out. it means you're not only flat, but you have sold your bitcoin and are not trading.

They're often interchangeable, since on spot exchanges being in fiat is no difference than being flat.

If you normally trade on derivatives like bitmex then being in fiat means you moved coins to a spot exchange and sold off. 

they're generally interchangeable though and I doubt most people use them strictly as I've described 
In my opinion, when we move on extremely low volume it’s 1-2 players causing a giant 5minute candle move in either direction. 

When there’s high volume, there’s an immense amount of people buying and selling so it could be viewed as “ more organic “. 
Position updated with success.

* Position: short xbtm18

* Opening value: 7,720.00

* Average value: 6,800.00

* Leverage: 1.50X

* Stack: 100.00%

* PnL: -0.13%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


Bot messed up the avg calculations... Need to check it later
4th bullet point is the key here.

Until that is present all you're looking at is squiggles on a chart in terms of a triple bottom pattern, it means nothing.
What counts as well-spaced? Are we looking for bounce/bottoms on the daily or the 4H?
>there's also the conspiracy that a whale is just taking a huge short position before dumping their coins 

I guess in a way, that is not only possible but logical / rational from the whale's point of view. I wonder if whales actually pull that often?
Buy OTC and dump on exchanges with shorts ready why not. 
Wouldn't it make more sense for this whale to do it at higher prices, rather than now, at year's low? He would get more $$ for the coins he's dumping and would meet less support when tanking the price.
Nah, I get all the relaxation I need on my hypothetical yacht. 
Eh, I find it's misleading because you'd probably not be so willing to let these positions go so quickly as a scalp when you are holding them in profit.  (or at least that's my problem)

Then again, your recent trades did start to have such a quick turnover, so looks like you've found a good strategy that works for you.
As long as you're honest with yourself, it's great for mentally backtesting strategies.
And the lower we drop the more bullish I turn. I turn more bullish regardless of which direction the price goes tbh. 
Imagine those people that are shorting right now to be right... Just stop looking at the shorts to long ratio. There was only one short squeeze. 
I agree. Failure to make a lower low and more shorts opening for a few days would turn me pretty bullish. 
I think he's the one who is shorting heavily ;-)
Tell him to use his shorting profits to fix Internet Explorer 
That's rat poison for ya
We got ouched
About bitcoin going down from its bubble prices or about bitcoin never getting a five digit price value?
What do you means? Price is still well above 6.4k
Novogratz being bullish AF on the news is a sell signal. Happens every time.
When people stop talking about mcafee is the time to go long. 
https://www.tradingview.com/x/j3RwhE5G/

That was good support at 7080! 

Sort of joking...but if we don't dump through it in the short-term, it could hold as the books fill up. 
Do you think it's an (inverse) Bart in the making? 
If i recall, shorts also doubled or tripled in size before the 11k -> 6k capitulation, so I wouldn't be so quick to call this a sure indicator.  Best case 50/50.
nah  it might be just that shorts had to pay 0,04 - 0,15% per 8hrs on bitmex, so they opened shorts at bfx where you can borrow btc for 0,01% per day or less
With crypto, I wouldn't dismiss it as an impossibility.
Getting greedy, 80 overbought on the daily. This is higher than the daily RSI has ever been on BTCUSD shorts (finex)
They won't sell once it starts coming back, they'll sell when the bounce turns around again :p
Could they have run out of funds to lend? Kraken has those issues sometimes
Well done.

Shorts are starting to take profit. Longs are closing too, though.
Nice, I've taken most of the profit from my same entry short at this point.

The rest is insuring a long of equaling it's remaining size. 

Got my stop on the short above 6700 though.
Position updated with success.

* Position: short xbtusd

* Opening value: 6,820.00

* Average value: 6,820.00

* Leverage: 10.00X

* Stack: 45.00%

* PnL: 4.44%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


Is it a possibility BTC can drop by 15%? Then the answer is yes.
we are on our way
The crypto market cap is a meme number that doesn't mean anything useful. 
Well, below $5k I'll admit defeat. Doesn't mean I'll sell or stop being bullish long-term, but on an intellectual level I'll admit I was wrong about what the rock bottom was going to be.
Just watch...once there is nothing else they can point to, they will start talking about the next halving.  It is all they will have left and I promise you will see it mentioned more and more in here.
There is such a thing as bearish exuberance....
Anyone who doesn't see how this bubble will correct a healthy 95\-99&#37; is a fool. Enjoy your 1000$ bags worth of shit.
Any chance you can do the same for the average 24K shorts?
Good observation, the average is about 32K BTC margin longs, so average price would be around 7,800 USD. Technically on average those margin longs are 1,000 under water. Before everyone starts speculation on a long squeeze.... Those shorting BTC on margin will be subject to more margin calls than those long on margin.  It takes a smaller price increase to result in a margin call on a short position, than it takes a price decrease to result in a margin call on a long position.
You'll get a better entry I'm sure.
ETH shorts also climbing.
Serious question: Does the RSI really matter on the amount of shorts opening? I find it hard to believe it does.
or have the balls to short the shit out of it
wondering if it will ever come back. huge difference than when BTC was below $1K. Almost anybody with a decent job in a 1st world country could afford one. Psychologically falling from $20K to $5K is much worse than $1K to $150.
What was the weekly RSI during all those time periods? 
I'm genuinely worried about the weird euphoria over low prices here. 

1d RSI being oversold is not a bullish indicator after consolidating and ranging  for 5 months. it is an indication that the new trend will be *down*. 

This is why TA is largely ridiculed. You are ignoring the context of the market conditions that allowed for such a pattern to exist. 

You are also ignoring the *new* pattern of 1d RSI turning down below 50 after bouncing off oversold. It hasn't done that for years. 

Imagine being bearish because the 1d RSI hit overbought for the 3rd time after breaking upwards out of a consolidation range. It doesn't make sense to me. 
Oversold is a condition not a buy signal

Indicators are correct until they are not. Always try to see the whole picture, right? Remember that most models, indicators and tools were designed for a regulated regular market, and their effectiveness on the crazy shit Bitcoin is, is limited. That's my position.

They are supposed to help you take controlled educated risks, not tell you what to do. You think it is going to rebound? Set a tight stop. 
Plenty of Bitfinex longs to margin call. Thousands of BTC to get dumped.
that's this sub 95% of the time

just wait, it'll happen again the first time we see a $150-200 move up in an hour
> Time to buy.
A lot of times these pauses are so that the bigger players can unload their crypto without tanking the price.

To what? 1k? 4k? 6k?
why would you warn " permabulls" if their action will make you more money? scared of a reversal?
Feels like a test of downward liquidity followed by a prop in order to fill shorts before kicking the chair out. MO on a number of these dumps the past couple weeks. We'll see. 
Don't think so, too many dip buyers thinking this is double bottom. This will bounce a bit here or go sideways for some time.
Why would anyone care about the exact number where it was last time? Kind of a statistical figure really. Could be a minor factor in "current price", nothing more. 
like this: [https://imgur.com/a/Hp4pYcu](https://imgur.com/a/Hp4pYcu)
My main stack was bought way below $5000 and 95% of them haven't been touched.  
Bought at average 450usd, sold a third at average 10k-ish

Hurts to see the other two thirds dwindle :(
Lots of us hodlers around here got in in 2013-14, our cost basis is like $400-$800.

I've never sold a single bitcoin, but I've been selling bitcoin cash gradually for the last 6 months.

Chewy ;-)
kinda sorta in that I bought back
avg. buy 600$ here. It was hard after 66% loss in value but thx to trading was only -30% in fiat. Sold 1/2 when we bottomed at 3k usd from 5k (-40%). Super panic sold xD

sold 2/3 total avg about 6,2k usd. Now have some BTC as margin for trading and few for hodling
Yep. My average basis was in the $700s, bought during 2016. In June last year I traded a little between $2500 and $4000. I haven't sold or bought any since then. Yup, this sucks... mostly because of the capital gains I owe for having sold some in mid 2017.
Spent everything I had on BTC below $300. Never sold.
most people here are traders so I doubt there is any. HODLers usually don't even bother checking the price.
Every time frame is making some sort of bear flag given the length of the drop - in short, all directions point down. Question is are we going to follow TA patterns.. 
Longs:shorts are nearing parity. I'm moving the stops on my large short (CA @ 6680) from b/e to profit. Leaving my futures position as is.

Also, I tethered the side project at 7100 on Sunday. So glad I bailed on NANO then. Yeesh.
It's more a descending triangle/wedge. You can see it better on eth 
Seems we've broken out of it now but not seeing much of a reaction so far.
Just waiting to see if BTC pushes ETH of the 500 cliff or if i buy there.

So far 6700 (give or take) is holding.
Sept wicked that low? Damn... And I was gambling on a long at 7.5 with $100 premium... Bad call...
It won't
No, Kraken allows for USD trading. You might have to buy crypto to send your funds there. I used XML since the fees were low and transfer times were fast.
No, you can use fiat a collateral for your margin position.
Bitfinex $6000.00  

Bitstamp $5920.70
Nice sharp entry, and still made a profit on your previous long? Talking about right timings...
who cares. like chad, they're parody accounts nobody takes serious anyway. 
Him and mysteriousbarber 
They are doing you a favour. And if someone trades on their advice they totally deserve what they get. Plus, stoki and do\-it\-yourself are totally comical, I upvote them always!
Why 33%?
poor XMRBTC ratio :(
Hahaha haha I bet you've been waiting to say this
BGD any minute now.
Cheers, rotoken, in what tool do you see the wall? or just on kraken L2 chart? Also, any walls on other exchanges?  Imho, a 2k wall just on 1 exchange can be easily sold thru by arb bots and other sellers.
People keep sharing this idea, and while it would be incredibly bullish if this plays out, you've got to be mindful of the fact that these three bottoms are forming quite a precise descending triangle as well. I wouldn't be comfortable holding a long on greater time frames until a breakout past the resistance of the descending triangle is confirmed.
We just took our first swing at the resistance line at $6,500, I would want to see us get strong rejection off support a couple more time before confirming a triple-bottom.
> What am I missing that I should be looking at?

A breakout through the resistance to confirm it. :)
Plus all the RSI are below 30... so we might be looking at a major bounce not waiting for anyone 
the most crucial part of a triple bottom...it needs to breakout...
It's triple bottom vs descending triangle. We'll see who wins. Get the popcorn, it's gonna be an epic battle.
we'll be near the bottom when potcoin isn't up 7% while the entire market tanks
2021
2020
In 20 years when inflation has made $20,000 worth about $3000 in today's spending power.
Early next year at latest. This market is a breeze compared to when 400,000 Gox coins were getting dumped in 2014-2015. This current guy has about 56000 to dump. He's probably halfway through. Nothing but a discount, baby. Don't over-invest, and be patient.
Should be next week at this rate
I chuckled, but theres no need for that m8. Trading is really tough atm
This will either be an all time great screencap or we'll reverse hard off 6730 and he'll be forever remembered as a genius.

I'm just honoured to have two posts immortalised in it...
Half of me thinks: that's not how you trade

The other half: YEE! Go get 'em tiger :) 
I don't even get why you mock him for it...he said his short made a small gain, and his fresh long is up to now not really underwater... he based his trade on the fact that the follow up is weak, which is somewhat correct so far... 
If you can't laugh at yourself, what can you laugh at? Oh yeah, other people!
Have no idea why you are being downvoted, if he posted his trades and was crushing, I am sure he would be gloating. 

I get the attention thing, but for the love of god, that was a funny sequence. If I would have done it, I would have posted it myself. 
Stokinator feeds off attention, not upvotes. Don't give him either, he's fucking with newbs heads.
Maybe count in halvenings. Next One should be around may 2020. Good luck!!:))
Me too. Love the smell of your money.
it smells like dust, sitting too long on the sidelines.
Wasn't BTC around these levels when futures were announced? So the big run up was either in anticipation of futures bringing 'institutional money' or a setup for a big short. Either way not much has happened if you erase the time between that announcement and now...
>moon
I don't see anyone saying sell/short here. I see about 5 posts saying they're going long. 
I don't hate the r/r of a long right here but can't quite pull the trigger
That’s not the biz of the exchanges. You can’t move markets. Markets move. Not even big countries can do that and they always fail to control their currencies value.
I guess they dont care about the price. What they need is transactions and margin positions for their business model. Transaction volume is declining right now, but the margin is in good shape for them. 
The exchanges make good money even in a bear market, that GRD a few days ago was probably the most profitable day that week
They can do it even without having the capital, they would only get in trouble if people even so kept selling and withdrawing the money.

Until then, its all entries on their database.

I doubt they would do it at such a scale, but it's possible. 
For them the most profit would come from a range bound price, where users kept opening and closing positions so they can earn fees to make up to that "investment" in case people really wanted to withdraw.
Exchanges don't care what the price of bitcoin is, they make money from fees. There is literally no reason for them to do this unless they feel like burning money.
still, i Think this is freakin amazing... i can remember buying last january in the 9xx, and Thinking to myself Maybe we will be above 3.000 by years end *moonshot* :))
Not quite yet, goblin town city limits just below 6000.
Nah, only $200 down, still nothing compared to that 7k6 to 6k6 the other days. rebounce here and will drop again to test 6k4.
> I said to myself

***ALWAYS*** follow the plan
If you look for safety, you might want to invest in real\-estate or bonds. If you are okay with taking risks, it helps   
 buy when resistance is broken. For max gain/high risk we buy the dips and sell the tops. 
Possible downside is to 3.5k, of you can handle that draw down you'll be OK.
Dollar Cost Averaging. Spread your buys out so you're not married to one price. 
Are you looking to buy and hold? Or are you willing to buy and then sell if a critical support level is breached?

If the former, it's probably more complicated and you'd do well to either scale in or perhaps wait a bit. If the latter, you might as well buy now and then, say, sell at $6399 to be pretty conservative about preserving capital (this would be a 4 month low), or sell at ~$5800 to sell if we make a new 8 month low. 

ultimately you have to make your own decision - it's your money. 
All the empty space in the beginning of that wedge tells me that's... Not a wedge. Also increasing volume.
when yacht?
when moon? when lambo?
They could still be right as there are still two lower lows post ATH
Yes will be a big bounce from $5000 to $5500.
hey is there a link you could share to see this?

I'd say that price not dropping from 6400 is pretty bullish too. We will see if it holds, next days are critical.
How do you know the WhAlEs aren't planning to dump thousands of coins while being in big fat shorts? 
He's right more often than people give him credit for. He's actually a pretty good trader, in my estimation.
No he wasn't necessarily right saying the price was more likely to drop than go up.  The time to decide if he was right or not is when he made the prediction, not now.

But a huge part of the market predicted this as well.  It was fairly obvious when the bubble popped.
my favorite pass time is watching his youtube streams, livechat comments/trolls, and his responses to them.
Tone only seems to trade on technicals and he has been right up to a point.

But Bitcoin doesn't just rely on TA though, the news plays a huge part in the price as well as whale manipulation.
While I do not necessarily disagree considering this shit is selling off like a madman, I wouldn't say it's contrarian. 

I think 9/10 comments here opening a position are opening a long. No one wants to short the bottom. It's even more embarrassing than longing the top 
you're not the only one right now thinking that. shorts getting a free ride rn

Juuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuust a bit too early.
RIP Stokinator :(
Brilliant timing :(
God that's just great timing
Heh, and I decided the opposite about no follow through for much more movement up. Just sold a tiny long from the lower area of this flag (only one order had filled), to pay for the funding on a larger short from the upper area of this flag.
...yet
lol 
LOL. Sorry are you bipolar? And the ~~million~~ billion dollar buy?  


EDIT: I will upvote you again. This is too good.
It ded. 
Some of the fastest trading profits are made during corrections, from both the long and short side.
Nice thoughts. I think the april 2013 parabola (which went top to bottom in 7 days) is best viewed as part of a larger bull market advance that started in nov 2011 (after a 95% decline from june 2011 highs) and ended in dec 2013 and contained two parabolic moves within it. 

ETA: Gox chart shows the best context imo: https://imgur.com/a/S9bfzaB
I don't know why this is being downvoted - it's a interesting analysis. But if true then we should consider that it rose higher (x220) vs our x78 and therefore we, in theory, should fall a bit less hard.
Comparing bubbles is pointless, they are all similar. This time the corrective cycle could be sharp and short (in time). If you subscribe to Elliott wave analysis maybe you see where I'm getting at. I'm no big fan but anyway, I made the counts. The accumulation period after 2014 is so vast that this has plenty of juice left. It's better to think of bitcoin as **one** bubble. Forget copy paste. You need to look at the indicator profiles and maybe there make some rough comparisons. History repeats, but it most probably won't be the same.TLDR; you are wasting time.
Seems overly complicated to me, just to reach the conclusion that the bottom might be around 4k. This is where the long-term log line is at, and it hasn't been violated since 3USD.

chart: https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/pmV1uLC7-Bitcoin-Longterm-update/

I like to think of these increases and declines are exponential on larger scales. The point of inflection was mid-2015 in the previous bubble, so there's a loooong way to go, sadly.
Yes. Agreed. I've been saying this too. 2013 had two parabolic advances but it was the same bubble. Similar to how ETH had 2 parabolic advances in 2017 but it was all part of the same crypto bubble (Bitcoin saw one big bubble, alts had two).

The first half of 2013 put crypto on the map for a lot of people. The second half of the year saw the manic blow-off top as everyone that heard about it piled on. Same story in 2017.

>I see the whole mid 2012 to end end 2013 as the first major Bitcoin bubble

2011 was the first major bubble. We fell from $32 to $2, everyone panicked about it going below $1. In 2014, we fell to $200 and everyone panicked about it going below $100. If we carry over that same post-bubble mindset, people are going to panic about us falling below $1000 in 2018. The next bubble, people are ging to panic about us falling below $10,000.
>2014 100 to 1100..

I think you mean 2013, and even that isn't accurate

But your central idea is right..where is the bottom
That's a big range. Might stay within that range for a month.

And regarding the triple bottom, I think third time's the charm.
Define "near future".
hello bottom my old friend
I checked TMZ (spoiler: nope)
short contracts always = long contracts, they are 2 sides of the 1 contract.  but to your other question yes the number of those contracts can go over 21 mil, there is no limit
obv yes. rsi weak yes if we close with lower price and rsi is flat. if rsi dives before close, chances of a bounce are better because it's very oversold. but i've seen cases where we have a \+1 day red before the bounce.   
bottom line: this might not play out as soon as you think, but it will soon enough. 
Seems like a good risk reward as long as you respect your stop loss
AMEN! it re-test 6k7 4 times already. You should not long here.
I agree with you... all news sign are turning green. Even saw a positive news about crypto and china.


Edit : link to the news as I am getting downvoted http://www.fintechcryptonews.com/the-chinese-government-considers-relaxing-the-ban-on-cryptocurrency-trading/

You guys are harsh when it comes to sourcing  ideas
Honestly just want to get it over and done with. 
Whoever hasn't sold by now, I don't think $5K will sting as much as the initial drop from $7600. I am rekt. Still have 40% fiat and have no plans on buying down here
Nothing hurts adoption..not low prices..not gov't regulation..not full gov't bans on buying crypto.  "This is Good for Bitcoin".
Longing the top didn't work so short the bottom?

That's risky now.
Just a continuation of the breakdown from 9.9 after ranging in the 7's for 2 weeks and failing to start a new bull run, nothing news-driven
Does there has to be a cause for every drop? And even if there was why would someone here know it? Focus on school :)
There is no consensus.


Bogdanoff
Bears
There is more sellers than buyers
Where was it more liquidity to profit from? Bid side above 7k or ask side below 7k? It was definitely the latter.
manipulation
I believe it happened shortly after reports of a South Korean exchange getting hacked of ERC20 coins. 
Wasnt an exchange hacked some days ago ?? 
Unqualified view here but if the only people trading are people shorting or longing the market (with leverage) it would be a bit of an opinionated standoff. The time we see big movements being when positions are closed instead of organic buying and selling.

I've found asking myself who is buying and who is selling outside of that. Also, while I'm here, if the Winklevoss twins decide to sell their stack how could they do it without totally crashing the market. It seems like their wealth is just a paper one because any attempt to realise it would be hard to do?
To shake us all out
Trendlines are approximations. wait untill it passes the previous low  to declare the triangle broken

Would you do that if you were a whale in fiat? No, they are looking for the same bottoms we are.
Opening shorts don't affect the price do they?

It's only the actual selling of the coins that drops the price.

I'm sure that opening a short is like betting that the price will go down.

Yeah some whales will open shorts and THEN dump actual coins, but I wouldn't be too worried about so many new shorts opening as they may well be shorting the bottom.

Shorting here can be very dangerous.

No technicals involved but I think we are going to have a green daily candle today, it's what's least expected. 
you apparently forgot that this entire market consists of people who FOMO bought this from $1k to $20k in a year. Why do you think they won't FOMO sell? 

People only buy high? No sell low? 

Really doubt it 

Also, there are so many people like you who literally dont have a plan for if this tanks below $6k because they refuse to acknowledge it as a possibility. 

denial + lack of plan is a great recipe for panic selling "low"

Once their paper profits are threatened and they realize they have to face the music, it will probably get very ugly.

I've asked *so* many bulls what they'll do if this goes below $6k and they quite literally refuse to acknowledge it as a possibility. "Why would it? It just won't.. it just won't go that low." It's a potentially disastrous situation. 

We're literally 12% away. We dropped like 12% in a day. The likelihood of it happening is the highest it's ever been and we still have people who don't have a plan  

And I'm not talking about Joe Schmoe who FOMO'd in at $15k. I'm talking about CryptoJoe who made 1200% since Feb 2017 and has never had to think about cashing out. you know, the guy who has way more bitcoin than Joe Schmoe 
Low compared to the last 8 months? Sure.

Low compared to the last 4 years? We're still in moon territory. 
Except crypto isn't stocks.

Crypto is based on speculation alone. 

With stocks you own a small share in a company, which generates revenue and hopefully profit.

With crypto you own an Internet coin with speculative value, buyers could very easily disappear in crypto as we go further down.
Yall dont seem to realize that we're still so high... As if going higher only means we'll have a bubble. It's like the average commenter here thinks that if it goes juuuuust slightly higher that its going to bubble to pluto. That's not how this works. That's not how any of this works.

I always wanted to make one of these.

"Low" is $1200, or the previous bubble ATH.
ML algorithms with a dash of information collusion.

Trade often & the odds are overwhelmingly not in your favour. Yet many think they're the unicorn.

Hold & get back to work IMO. 

Many seek adrenaline & connection via trading, to their detriment.


People are just used to trading the ridiculous intraday volatility. More like a regular market now. 

Also, trading a bull market doesn't really translate to being a good trader
impredictable

The market is the market. You need to get out of this mindset of “me vs. them”, because whales and manipulators are not the reason every time you’re on the losing end of a trade, or when the market does something you weren’t expecting. Every market has insiders. Trade what you see, not what you think. Insiders have to accumulate and distribute like everyone else.
It is gambling. I don't think the bear market will end until the market cleanses itself completely of all the people looking solely looking to get rich. I rarely ever see anyone discuss fundamentals of BTC. Everyone seems to just be interested in how much it's worth and when it will go up. There is also this expectation that it will go up again just because it has in the past. That alone terrifies me. Nobody actually wants to use BTC for anything but being able to sell it when it hits a new ATH again. I don't think the people calling it a massive ponzi scheme sound so delusional anymore. When you see twitter handles like ParabolicTrav and BTC1Millionby2020, you should be taking those as red flags...
I would think that at this point, even shorts from a few thousands up would put their stop loss at sub 7k.

Current longs I would expect to cover around there too.  Think it's gonna be a battle around there if it can't jump past it.  (can't remember what it is, but there is some literature/method about market movers in stock markets identifying these zones and creating setups to jump through them)
The liquidation price on my current short position is $8800.  No obliteration here.
Don't worry. I shorted 2x at 19.6 and closed that with a loss, lost more than 50% of my stack in a series of bad trades in Jan/Feb.

Made it all back.
I shorted 6900 in early April. Catastrophic stops hit somewhere around 7500. 
Don't worry too much mate. We've all made trades like that i'm sure over the past couple of months.

Most important thing is always the same, learn from mistakes and get those entry amounts and stop losses in the correct place.

You'll be fine after your next triumph :)
This instills confidence that the Bulls will be taking us to higher levels

Edit: /s
if this was triple bottom we would have a had a much bigger bounce 

its a $60 bounce of the monthly low, which to me indicates that more pain will be coming
I mean it could be. We won't know untill the price rebounds and the pattern confirms....

Or crashes through support ;)
Dudes been calling for a reversal since Feb. He’s going to be right eventually...
sounds like a smart guy
Link would be helpful.
Lmfao, in his last prediction, he said 15k would happen *IN* June. Is he gonna just keep pushing it off an extra month until it finally happens?
I think we all know that the time to buy will be when all these self-proclaimed crypto prophets on twitter have become silent. 
We all know why he's bullish. Little John starting to sweat. Dude's more blindly bullish than diy
15 week since 6k according to mcalendar
You forgot, we still gotta wait for the chinese new year to end.
We might short squeeze all the way up to 7k. lul.
So you've hodled through 2014-2015 bullshit, sat through the FUD and mania all the way up to 20k, down to 6k, up to 12k, down to 6k, up to 10k, and on yet another drop you finally decided to cash out at 8k, and now you're telling us about having plans and risk management and generally pretending to have a good opinion to follow on trades? I don't mean to be rude, but like... eh. 
What if it never hits 4k? What price will you buy back on the upside?
For pre 2016 coins the threshold to tether up can be considerably lower to protect holdings.
The rate has jumped since yesterday, it's been closer to 0.01 and lower for ages now.

Edit:  I like this site for looking at current and historical margin lending rates [https://www.bfxdata.com/swaphistory/btc](https://www.bfxdata.com/swaphistory/btc)

Last year BFX FRR (average) rate peaked at 0.7 in August. Since February this year there haven't been any peaks above 0.1, with FRR mostly around 0.01 .  
Unless they lose $72 million of customer funds again and arbitrarily steal a third of your money.
What are the risk other than giving an exchange control of your coins?
Will you turn into an actual bull at $1?
lets call it a triple bottom including the February one. We already called the Feb-April one a double bottom so better update our bullish narrative hehe.
Double bottom from April 1 would be "shaping up" at around $9k...not here. It would confirm at $10000+ 

What you're doing is calling the bounce from $3k to $5k a double top at $4900. You would have been incredibly wrong 

Just because the price hits the same thing twice does not make it a double top or bottom 
This is the kind of top quality analysis I come here for.
See you in an hour.
That's unfortunately an incredibly complicated question with a lot of answers. To be completely honest with you, learning how to trade is very likely not worth your time. 

It's a very time consuming and stressful "hobby" and you will likely lose money for a while before you begin to earn it consistently 

But are you new here? Because people give their reasoning for opening new positions all the time. 
People downvote this legimate question but talk below about Potcoin . . nice . . 
Long support, short resistance 
You may ask here and get some answers also . . good luck! . . https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinBeginners/new/
Short answer - BitMex. 
Hold just a minute, let me get some $1 limit buys in. Which exchange was that?
No need for stats. It would clear the order books.
There’s factors you need to take in account like if you were going to sell them all on one exchange (which doesn’t really makes sense) or spread it trough a bunch. And it doesn’t really make sense to market sell such a huge amount , best is to spread it in a longer time frame to get the most out of it 
http://data.bitcoinity.org/markets/books/USD
It won't. Market sell will clear the order books, but there needs to be a follow up to selling to drop the price cause order books will be filled by bots fast.

Of course after this kind of sell there will be a panic mode and follow up but technically the 200k won't drop the price.
Fell 1%, i don't call that dumping...

Edit: ok, it actually dumped a bit. My bad! But it only moved BTC 1% so small effect.
Ok, now it's dumping and ETH is also following. 

Even so, unless ETH breaks 500 this should be short lived. 900 seems to be a good support
Why?
Maybe they are taking profits to pump into BTC :) 
Soros doesn't understand that Bitcoin works against banks just as well at $0.01.
Calm down there money bags, we can't all make 0.0058% returns like that.  l33t Sc4lp3r pr0
Dude, again and again you are wrong and yet you sit here and you are acting as if you are making some AMAZING trades

Enjoy making $5 off the lunch money your mom gave you

Edit: LOL, another "great long" at 6700 that you are now underwater with

Edit2: okay, who actually up votes this guy? I swear you have a bunch of alt accounts upvoting your TERRIBLE trade advice
Adding at 6500.
In order to get a similar result we'll have to see many more shorts opened. We can still see a green candle, but I doubt anything like last time.
well.. i mean if it works out for ya then great but has some potential to pull your pants down and spit on your gooseberries 
This is a revenge trade, and I don't think it's going to go well. 
Ooops.
Why was this downvoted?
> Very weak follow-through.

It's only been 15 minutes since it broke down, too early to say that.
Can you send me a link to your grandfather's crypto facebook group? I hear there are like 50K members.
a few noobs here and there asking advice how to long. There was just one possible outcome to this.
Bull run confirmed 
I think it's the same, if you use the API the script can "click" for you tho.
It isn't
you responded to the daily instead of me :p

And yes, perhaps I should have been less factual, but I am incredibly sure that hodlers do check the price very frequently. it's hard not to
same, stops at 6400 tho.
This is called bad trading. Going against a clear trend. The time to short is once the bottom breaks which it did. The time to long is when there is a clear reversal. Which there isn't.
best time to go short was yesterday, next best time is today.
I agree
We don't *necessarily* have to have a big bottom spike immediately--could come after a couple of hours of waffling--but the ETH ratio continuing to dump when BTC is flat is a sign to me that reversal isn't near yet
end of March / beginning of April we were in that range for several days, then bounce
I expect a pretty big bounce once we get into the mid 5ks.
/u/Sloppysynapses will not be happy with the short squeeze comment
It moves 20$ on the 1H, 4H, and 1D too.

Just an FYI 
If you are in the US, like myself where you have to report every loss/profit off of a trade, might not be the worst move to sell right now or lower, get the get the realized loss and buy right back in. I'm planning to do this to offset my gains from earlier this year. 
If I remember correctly 6k was the moon when we were at September 3k dump.
Still can't stay away from here though!
My liquidation price is the only stop I need
Nah.  I don't get that same rush of endorphins if I've got stops in there.
This will likely bounce, people will call it the bottom, you'll wonder if you should even short again, etc etc. 

And then it'll dump 

In all seriousness you're in an odd position although not bad. Depends how big your short is. if it bounces here it could easily be a $100-600 bounce so. 

Set stops, follow your plan, and hope it tanks so your stops don't hit 
Reduce the size here back to a 10x here bud. I mean unless you're just gambling. That's fair too. I hit the casino occasionally.
If you're having second thoughts about your trade and you're in profit right now, just go ahead and make sure your profits are locked in
I'd probably take profits with 3/5 of it here (25x back to 10x) and set stops at 6660. Guarantees profit, leaves room for a bigger win. I have a hefty short on swaps as well, but my entry average is now 6685 so I have my stops right around 6660. 
well ive been waiting on coins moving from my cold storage to my trading account for an hour!!!
you've been the long the whole way down from 10k as far as i can tell

[deleted]
Coulda said the same thing last week about a 7600 position.
Just talking about different legendary support guys that lived and held before they were taken down.. why the hate.. 
nope! just be patient than you can see how capitulation can look
Unfortunately it isn't that close.  Capitulation will be when the price drops below $4000.  Then you will see the price plummet and quickly.  This is still a slow slide.
I'm buying my ass off.
I'm surprised it took litecoin that long lol. Chickun has always behaved really poorly, post-bubble. Perhaps the bear market is just getting started.
Dude, your flair...
Indeed, if you're one of the fomo degenerates who get more bearish the lower the price goes and more bullish the higher it goes. Good strategy for buying high and selling low.
Yes, they get more and more desperate and delusional the lower the price goes.  It's just basic human psychology for many.

I'm bummed about crypto slowly bleeding out like this, but I am able to face the reality and not construct fantasy narratives to pretend it's not really happening or that it's going to magically change soon.
Sorry for your loss, but sincerely suggest that you practice patience before closing and opening trades \- for e.g. in this case, you posted that you're closing and market made a move up slight albeit. One thing that helps me is as soon as I'm about to click, I start counting from 1\-10.. and look away.. lol.. and most of the time I don't execute the trade.
You gotta stop revenge trading bud. I saw you getting mad about an underwater long and that they were dumping, then I saw you short, then I saw you close that prematurely because things didn’t go your way right away. Take a chill pill bud you’ll trade much better. 
My goal is to have more money to actually buy things like food and shelter, etc. so my goal is more spending power, not a larger number of BTC.
I measure in BTC. I'm trading entirely with house money at this stage. I could lose 100% of my stack and have more fiat than when I started. 
Why not [this](https://imgur.com/a/ZdBBkHA) resistance line?

I still think we will go sideways some more in this range.
We already bounced.
my charts are showing a a decrease to under 6000
Think it's just a small pump before the daily closes.

But who knows with Bitcoin.
probably just the usual daily candle close pump.
Where the hell do you guys get this shit?
[deleted]
If we followed 2014 the market would be trading at near 60% ATH right now. $11.7k, actually. 

We're significantly below 2014 levels right now. 
Probably not gonna pump that high any time soon. And timing the exact top to step out is kinda difficult to pull off. 
I’d say it is more relevant to compare where price is based on long term moving averages. 

Check the parallels (2014 vs 2028) of where all the important moving averages cross each other and when prices crosses them.

Very informative.
Weekly candle closes 00:00 UTC on Sunday...we are already on the new weekly
Below $6.8k close would be the lowest weekly close since the beginning of November

e: jk our weekly closed below there already. Damn 
We heard the exact same line at $7000.
> triple bottom 

serious question - doesn't this look more like a descending triangle (bearish)?
Do you have any sort of reference to support this or are you just spouting nonsense?

Honest question
Don't expect it as a certainty. But expect it as a possibility. Too many people are expecting a breakdown here as a certainty. I see that as just as stupid as expecting the tripple bottom to hold as a certainty. Or anything in a market to be certain. 


I have trade plans in place for either scenarios. Ask yourself if you are prepared for either scenario.
I'd wager that's coincidental. No points of contact for 3 years isn't much of a trend. 
Generous black line you have there
Wishful thinking I think but who really knows
Been looking at the same line for months. It's tight.
I've always hoped that was like some sort of tilted cup and handle
Just wondering - which is it? You've said both that the futures will be canceled due to spoof trading and now you are saying that tether will blow up... you realize that the more wild rumors you throw out the less people will believe any of them?
Nothing feels better than watching a lot of people losing a lot of money until that's not me?
> Wish Bitcoin could decouple from the alts once this is over..

Be careful what you wish for. Unless you're in a very big short, you might not like the way Bitcoin would head if it were to 'decouple' from the cryptocurrency market at large. 
If anything ALTS are connected to Bitcoin, not the other way around.
have a blister of Imodium!
I found Kim Jong Un's reddit account! 
I'm afraid we're going to find out that echo chamber cheap is not that cheap in reality
I don't think you understand hype cycles...
Too bad, BTC is still outrageously expensive at the moment.
Don't forget that a bounce from $1500 to $2200 is about a 50% gain.  There will be more trading opportunities in the future.
Probably. 
I would love $1000/ btc
Bubbles DO correct 70-80%. In fact the most recent example we have, the dotcom bubble, was 78%. 

But you're too busy shouting fear to be concerned with facts. Imbecile. 
They are already appearing in /r/Cryptocurrency.
Are you joking? The price is in multiples of what it was a year ago. You want hotline? If it goes under 2k their phones will be ringing all day. And this sub will be become more toxic than ever. Also I'm going to downvote you because suicide is no joke. People getting rekt because they are naive and emotional is no joke too. Maybe they deserve it, but how about their families and kids. Honestly, no.
Not even close.  When BTC is down 90% from ATH, then maybe.
I disagree with your opinion, therefore I downvote you. That's what that button is for right?

/s
I'm guessing they know how to trade profitably.
Nope, just makes me respect cycles. 
[removed]
[removed]
Name checks out
Interestingly, when looking at historical bull/bear cycles, there isn't usually a panic sell period near the end like the hypothetical graph would show.  The emotion is more of a worn out despair.  So the path down from here may be painful and slow until we find the true bottom.  Sub 1000 prices are extremely unlikely, even just looking at the history.
I can confidently say Bitcoin is never going sub $1,000 ever again. Ever. Seriously, this is not even up for debate.  
Personally I'm waiting for the sub $1 range
[And you are basing all that on this TA right?](https://d1onfp38wq5pli.cloudfront.net/media/2014/01/crystal-ball.jpg)
Classic this joke gets funnier ever time you do it. The funniest part to me is that you keep being ironically bearish and you've been right every single time lmfao 
Bogdanoff sounds like a sausage brand.
This would be so good, you could maybe add moving averages in as estuaries. Haha.
Wow, never thought I could get spoiled this hard in this particular reddit thread
I've literally been gone a week, lol.
You and me both. But it's not the end of the world.

I'm fine missing a few 18% drops as long as I'm in position for the 1000% bull run sometime in the next year or two.
I had fully intended to actually. I popped open my phone yesterdayand saw that BTC was at $6,850 or so and though, "well this is probably a really good place to short."

Then I got pulled away with something important. 

Looked again before I went to bed and though "well, it'll probably still be inching upward when I wake up. I'll take a position with fresh eyes tomorrow morning."

Morning got away from me, and about an hour ago I was finally ready to open a position and come hang out with you guys for a bit...and plunge. 

C'est la vie.
He wrote yesterday he's waiting for a better entry than 6.8.  ;-)

I was waiting to add to mine for same thing, ended in adding just 50% today.
That's unfortunate. 

While I agree that past history does not always dictate future events, there's really no reason why the market can't mirror the 2014 bubble pop. 

I've been pushing the 2014 mirror possibility for awhile, and I think it's as good a model as any for making longer-term decisions. 
https://www.sciencealert.com/dennis-rodman-trump-kim-summit-marijuana-cryptocurrency-shirt-potcoin
Yea that one was mildly painful to hold...glad I didn't short a lot. I added higher on it but that made it even more painful for a hot minute...
just made a new low from its april 19th

FORE is the official warning you are supposed to scream when your ball is going "in a direction it may cause damage" (Foreign Object Reaches Emergency), like.... ah... a group of people ;) Happens Golf Balls can be quite... damaging to a human's health.
We're still a ways from weekly oversold. But daily is oversold and everytime thats happened this year has been the start of the bull phase.
Ouch 
5370
Probably, unless mined recently.  But most everything is illegal at this point, so doesn't mean it was used for immoral purposes.
I think I'm close to mentally capitulating Sloppy, how do we prevent that :( I won't sell, but we can't have the mighty Crypto_Chad69 turning bearish or even anything less than absurdly bullish...
Hey, don't question Chad.
Steve the Steg has seen better days. 

Someday Brian the Brontosaurus will return: https://www.tradingview.com/x/J1ELaAp8/
What is the support on that triangle? 6450?
I literally drew those lines in 50 seconds, imagining what would be a very painful trajectory to ALL YOU GUYS and.. me.

Plus, I took 'Inflicting Maximum Pain to Traders 101' in college. Got an A on that course
This.
Doubtful.  They will both likely be around for many more years/decades.  As long someone has 0.01 BTC worth 0.01, then BTC is still around.
Email I received


Cryptocurrency purchases by credit card no longer permitted

What is happening 

Because you may have used your Wells Fargo Credit Card to purchase cryptocurrency (such as bitcoin) in the past, we wanted to let you know about an important change. 


Beginning June 18, 2018, Wells Fargo Credit Cards can no longer be used to purchase cryptocurrency. 

What you need to know

Because of the market volatility and credit risk associated with cryptocurrencies, beginning on June 18, 2018, credit card transactions with known cryptocurrency exchanges will be declined.
This applies to all Wells Fargo personal and business credit card accounts.
Wells Fargo Debit Cards can still be used for these transactions.

well, when all you have is credit, and you think it'll make you rich, you'll do dumb things. add to that, they just wont pay it off. it's free money with no recourse to most of them.
Use credit cards, get points, pay off credit card.
this is good for bitcoin as it prevents ppl from getting rekt (buy btc with cc!!)
I think we may not see new ATH but until all the miners are closed BTC will have value. It will be >0, question is how close to 0 can it drop.
Ok but this is not exactly new in bitcoin. And after all looking at the parabolic rise it does not take a genius to prepare for a free fall... anyway.  


Edit: I would argue it's globally bad to go to 20k from 1k. Because it becomes unsustainable. But nobody was complaining during the all\-in long party. Especially since margin long = intention to sell before fees eat all my money.
Guys, don't fight :) Perma\-anything is not useful. But let's give something to the bulls: hodling through all that has been, until now, the easiest way to become wealthy from bitcoin. If you are not an experienced trader.
[deleted]
This is how smart money takes dumb money
i dont even know how i would short here in the US
Because shorting or selling is bad, it makes the price go down...
Maybe you can call them investors then. But not traders.
This is a trading sub. Shorting is something that traders do. This is not something to be ashamed of
same, I think it will be slow and painful, probably over a long time (1 year or something)
yep, I try to catch the bounce with a tight stoploss in case it dumps farther, usually doesn't work
uncage ze bear.

Lmao
I appreciate the thank you! 
Thanks, bud :D
Thanks DWP. This sub's tremendously helpful
Thank you :D
No I think the next big rise will be speculative again. I see it as more of an asset than a currency. If the tech gets there like LN etc at least it won't mean 50 dollar fee and 4 days wait when the next run takes off. Bitcoin has shown it's not a bubble. It's a cycle and the it's a bubble feeling fits in with the stage of the cycle we are in. I'm won't eat my dick but I think 50k is possible.
Could write a while post about the economies of the world especially USA. A recession starting next year would be interesting. BTC not tested in the circumstances that brought it about. And the supply halves. 
Or they are desperate and that is why they rushed it in the midst of the correction. And if they announced it now, insiders knew the date and time in advance. Where are the informed buyers? I call this bullshit. 
Yeah, hence the joke.
ETFs are going to start this year or 2019 at least. DYOR.
You are downvoted so be happy. Lots of emotional 'traders' that will keep paying you for years to come. Celebrate.
I have "diversified" into shitcoins, 0/10 wouldn't do again

Thier choices are extremely defensible
From 7k. Sold a bit above 8k. Those gains are gone.
Well, technically I'm still long, since I'm still holding half my stash. You could also say I haven't completely capitulated, so that's a sell signal too.
one random guy selling is not a buy signal.if it was you'd be buying millions of times a day...
It's not a given. In BTC Nothing is a given.
> . It's a given it will be back at "10" at some point, at very least.

That means 100% probability.  I would say the probability is far lower than 100%.  Maybe 70% that it will see $10K in the next three years.
> I'm consistently dumbfounded at the sentiment of this sub

Longs and holders are still in denial.  It is basic human psychology.  Many of them think $20K again is inevitable, or at least $10K.  They are absolutely delusional.

[deleted]
Man I can think of dozens of times I've seen this subreddit be dead sure that something is going to happen because of TA. It doesn't mean everything. It's useful, it's a guide. It's not gospel. 

Also, I am not saying the outlook doesn't look bleak. It does. I am saying that I want to see what happens because the reality is nobody knows exactly what's going to happen.
Last time we were here was April 5th-11th, and it was chilling sideways on low volume (relative to it's neighboring action)
actually in early April we were with lower volume and everybody was bracing for $5900 and below and then we got the BGD. I don't expect the same thing to happen twice but who knows
No doubt we're in a bear flag right now https://www.tradingview.com/x/xyKwh19Q/ so stops are where they would be when it would be breaking down.
Actually, since I am trying to apply Wyckoff model to the current range, and we have not left the range yet, the mini-dump would be a 3rd or 4th mid-depth Secondary Test closing to the end of the range. The writeup for the model suggest this could be a good starting place for a "risky long", although it is also suggested that a better place for a "safe long" would be above Automatic Rally and/or Resistance which in this case would be above 6895, i.e. after a Signal Of Strength breaking through the resistance. This would make his long an "educated risk". Will this work out? We shall see.

Note that we are 1:1 with what was going on at the beginning of April. Lower dump, then range, then mini-dump on that range, then break out up. Also it was right after the weened and right after futures' closing date.
We've also rejected anything sub 6700, too. Short term indicators look more in favor of a long from 6700 than a short from 6800, imo, although 1d/3d macd is preeeetty scary, and overall lack of momentum isn't a good sign for bulls for sure. 
What's at 6900?
Yep, just like the people saying they will get a second mortgage if BTC ever gets to $6,500 that are now saying BTC is going to $3,000.  The number autoscales down and they never buy more.
> When this bottoms, traders will have 3 ass*holes each

LOLOL
Yeah I can agree with that. Sentiment is really too optomistic.

Looking at the drop from 10k, longs can hope for a +10% increase if they catch bottom and sell the top. But that can be wiped out in 1 single day.

I think we have turned full bear. I mean we broke the support from last november and we have broken the Weekly 50MA. We are in bear country and shorts will not be squeezed easily.

I will even go as far as saying that the whales that people hope will come to print a BGD are actually the ones who are slowly building their short positions.
So invert the whole thing. It gives an interesting read (again).
I don't know for sure lol

I'm making an educated guess from the air still filled with some optimism and no real capitulation, the fact that we haven't broken 6k which is what everyone is afraid of, the huge volume of recent drops, and there having been no real noticeable sideways movement for a significant time period.

[Edit] With some FUD, boring endless sideways movement, many bottom fakeouts only to drop back down, scary low prices, getting people locked in terrible underwater positions so they become easily shakeable
Yes, good explanation thanks! And excellent question!
Not sure if my previous comment answers your question, but the whales' game plan is the same as us: buy low and sell high. They want to accumulate as quietly as possible because they don't want others to follow in their footsteps and increase the price, leading to a higher avg. entry price for the whales. Also, they want to pump that shiet as easily as possible without much resistance (i.e. without having to put a lot of THEIR own money to pamp that / absorb the annoying selling by the little shrimps)
One more dump to fuel them and make granny into shorting again.

Then you can squeeze them
Are there new people drinking turing-compete koolaid, while unaware of dao?
Outside of 3-9 months, I firmly believe BTC will be above 6.5k. Thus, I buy. I don't search for the bottom, because I am likely to miss it. Patience wins in this game. I am ~19-3 on large-scale trades and investments over the last year, I can wait. Check my post history. 
The crypto market is currently dominated by the tech-savvy ie. young people ie. risk-tolerant individuals. The room for growth in this space in the long-term is phenomenal. A few days of red and the "BTC to 1k" memes come out, but the reality is far different. The BTC being bought by many at these prices is not coming back into circulation (anecdotally) anytime soon. I am a trader, so I trade, but I believe one thing in totality:



***It is more risky to not be holding BTC than it is to be holding BTC*** 


We have to break $6k now. This leg down confirms the triangle breakdown. 3d candle is gnargnar and will be bigger than the last, we might even get a third, like the Jan 27th breakdown. I think $5700 is a reasonable early exit.
Also though, the order book isn't static.  90% will move out of your way.  I am also interested in the answer to this question.
The biggest factor in this is time too. Otherwise at the next halving the price would instantly rise 12.5x. I'm looking forward to seeing how it plays out.
cool thanks
I think that'd heavily depend on the support lines and how long they've been established and whether we're in a 'bear' or 'bull' market. It's quite variable, really.
interesting.  another person said it takes 50million to double the price, but that seems way too small
But he wears a suit too
Na that's just the latest version of what he's said. Not long ago he was saying 9k was the bottom and 20k by June.
It's looking though that they're starting to expand and might not get violated.  Surprisingly they never got breached in early April.  It did barely poke through on fuckfest sunday though.
I thought this was a really interesting observation, so I made this for you:

https://www.tradingview.com/x/WYcoeR0L/
Here's another version that trims out a bit.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/bRMqqnZt/
Thank you! So that bull div on the daily has been invalidated right? Looks to me we might form one on the 1H, maybe the 4H if it goes side ways for a bit, if I'm not mistaken.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/sttvOAOE/
Indeed. And how not to be the last person to enter one of those holes because you will get a fatal STD [getting short/long squeezed]
if you hold btc / trade it, the market does whatever it wants, regardless of your preferences. If you are enslaved and used for sex you will also have no choice in what happens to you. I'm not talking like kinky sex slave bdsm shit im talking like enslaved in 50BC Rome whorehouse
Just come out of the closet bro, it's 2018. Only someone who was hiding something would be bothered by a funny *ass anal*ogy [no pun intended] like this.
That's a pretty extreme mega bear scenario.
The inconvenient truth is that BTC is not worth $7K right now. The adoption rate and use case do not deserve that price as a currency or as a store of value, because it does neither of those well. This is not the technology's fault, but rather the environment (primarily tax, but also futures/margin trading). The technological fundamentals are actually quite strong, but the only reason people are buying BTC for $7K each is because they think it will be worth more later. 

This is a valid reason to buy, but this is speculation, and in order for a speculative asset to grow, new demand/interest has to constantly increase in the face of previous speculators taking profits. I think what we're seeing here is that the vast majority of people that bought since November have walked away at a loss. Volume is waning back to pre-bubble levels. We've now made three runs under $7K in the last 4 months, and there is an entire subset of holders that have not been tested since last September in the $3K-$6K range that are starting to sweat. 

BTC has substantial potential and very little current value, that's what makes it speculative. We may very well hold over 6K this time. I wouldn't be that surprised by an extended (6-12 month) wasteland of $6K-$8K. But right now, the number of people pouring  in off the streets to buy up $6800 BTC is extremely low. Even folks that said they'd mortgage the house to buy BTC under $7K are probably throwing $100 buys at coinbase instead.

It's not all doom and gloom. There is a lot of positive news around crypto, BTC's fundamentals are fairly strong and are improving, but the environment worries me. The two biggest hindrances I see involve some difficult questions to answer. Taxes require government involvement, which is usually disastrous, and the margin/futures side is not really solvable with an unregulated asset (which is the whole point).

I'm spending a lot of time most days trading to acquire more BTC, because I'm still bullish long-term. I'm not buying more with my fiat for now, though. 
I have done both courses and been a big fan of chart guys for a long time.  Very nice no nonsense approach that has served me well
There's a general one and a second crypto one.

Love them both, I've never paid for any premium group but paying for these courses is worthwhile imo. covers almost everything a beginner would need
Thanks for the awesome explanation Sloppy :D
>  it’s 1-2 players causing a giant 5minute 

And forcing margin calls on all leveraged traders.
Average here is ok, I updated manually yesterday and added at exact spot as my average :)
This. Until that moment arrives I don't care what anyone says about triple bottoms. That will be our defining moment 
hey what do you think of this triangle breakout? If I remember correctly you were drawing the resistance like this (green line):  https://www.tradingview.com/x/BO897gON/
>  lows should be reasonably equal, well-spaced and mark significant turning points. The lows do not have to be exactly equal, but should be reasonably equivalent

I'd put it as months: three lows over 3-6 months
Well the price shot up 18% in an hour when everyone was shorting and thought the floor was going  to fall through. Now everyone thinks shorts are going to be squeezed exactly like last time.

Who do you think is going to be on the wrong end of the trend again? 

You can clearly see in this thread most people are going long. Big players love liquidity. 

Redistribution and then markdown from $6-7k would be one of the most obvious plays we've ever seen, but no one would believe it because of the BGD and bullish narrative. 

People assume all shorts are created equal but I don't see noobs shorting yet, I see people buying into shorts that are going absolutely parabolic. 

I would be hesitant to long here. 
But then they can buy even more coins at cheaper prices after making lots of money on their short.
We're 10% above year's low.
I’ll bring some hypothetical Miami sluts.

Let’s rage^bitch 
Those 2 look like scalps. And he's right. This market best strategy is scalping now.
Building a long term position right now is a bit to risky for my liking. Scalping a 2-5% profit trade is definitely the move but it always comes with possibly getting chopped out.

I’ll most likely build a long term position if we bounce of $6400-6500 a few times and establish it as strong support for a second time. Otherwise, scalping has proven to be extremely profitable recently 
Definitely. Instead of just changing/tweaking a position in your head to help fit your trading narrative.


Username Crypto _Chuck Norris taken? 
technically, shorting here is likely wrong
It’s called Edge
https://www.cnbc.com/amp/2018/05/07/bill-gates-i-would-short-bitcoin-if-i-could.html
hmm maybe not for long 
I doubt it. Still has a lot more rooms to go down, but that supports at 6k7 across exchange was huge. I think it will go sideway here before another drop to test 6k5.
There is a large difference though, on Bitfinex you are trading actual BTC whereas on Bitmex you are just trading contracts.
right, this can happen in a day
I'm attempting to lend, and the offer doesn't make it into the books.  
Sometimes? Lol.
I'm thinking to add to my short around 6560 and 6570, trying to catch a wick perhaps. That'll put my CA around 6600 and then move stops around 6700. I have no faith on a bounce just yet. But if it does, I can handle that loss. But I rather have a massive short ready if 6400 breaks.

CC: /u/haserfauld as well.
It's among the most useful metrics IMO.

Big difference in market context between 200B vs. 800B
I like you, permabull. Please stay.
[deleted]
You can't really do that unfortunately. For longs, you can compare total USD borrowed vs BTC amount of long positions. But as far as shorts, you can only see how many are borrowed vs how many are in short positions, both in BTC. Which gives you no basis vs USD. 

Only short-related stat is sorta useful from that: Right now there are [27K BTC of short positions](https://api.bitfinex.com/v2/stats1/pos.size:1m:tBTCUSD:short/last), but total BTC borrowed is [19K BTC](https://api.bitfinex.com/v2/stats1/credits.size.sym:1m:fBTC:tBTCUSD/last). So 8K BTC are in short 'margin positions' as a hedge.


> Those shorting BTC on margin will be subject to more margin calls than those long on margin. It takes a smaller price increase to result in a margin call on a short position, than it takes a price decrease to result in a margin call on a long position.

Why is that? It should be the opposite, particularly if people are leveraging their crypto instead of fiat.
It could very well drop through here but I can't be chasing a revenge trade for closing early (still increased trading stack 30%). More prudent to sit out the rest of this dump and try to short a bounce or knife catch.

OTOH, if we break 6.4, 6.4 may be the best entry you get, so I'll probably open a small short there.
No it doesn't, it's basically a desperate attempt to find a reason for a bounce.

If longs panic selling close into shorts limit closing  then there won't be a bounce. As you can see with the 600 shorts closing and the price moving up $50. 

Shorts can close in profit after squeezing longs and it won't matter how many were opened. If they successfully get longs to close, they can easily close in profit. 

If you really think about it, there's nothing particularly special about shorts opening or being higher than longs. It just means people expect the price to move down. There's no real reason to think they're going to be wrong inherently 
I don't short, others here can answer that better but you see from the chart the amount of them isn't as high as 4/12 but the RSI is higher than that great day. Just an observance, that's all.
I saw it go from $50 to about $1200. I then witnessed a 2 year bear market and it slowly decline to about $200. People were saying exactly the same then. 

Nothing is certain, but if people stop fixating on the price, and take a look at the world around them, bitcoin is still absolutely ripe to disrupt. I couldn't give you a timeframe for that, but if you've got any faith in humanity, combined with the belief of power in numbers and wisdom of the crowds, then this thing should start to piss on every other asset class around it. 

I'm convinced what were seeing now is massive manipulation so that big fish can continue to accumulate. 
This worries me too actually.
Agreed, it is *just* another indicator and there's no rule that it should spring back upwards just because it's oversold. 

December was overbought, and stayed overbought on the RSI for about three weeks. Two way street..
Historical data is factual...one can draw their own conclusions.
already seeing it and price hasn't even moved up lol 
The target would be for everyone to hypothesize for themselves while cost-averaging in 
I've been tethered up for a while now in anticipation of the terminal dump. I want to just get this over with, so relief rallies are just a waste of time the way I see it now. I also don't want people to end up as bagholders if the bottom turns out to be abysmal.
The fact that we bounced fairly close to that level is not an anomaly, people are closing shorts and taking longs here in part because it is close to that support. People put stops at/below that level so we may see some momentum when it breaks. 

I'm roughly in the same boat.
Ok at least you sold some over $10K...not total madness.
Did you not even spend bitcoin?
Ok, then you don't qualify if you have sold some in the past year.
Lol, you're basically me. Hope you don't live in a jurisdiction that charges you hefty capital gains taxes!
At least you took some profits.  I have lost a bunch myself, but I'm still way up.  I took most of my losses this year during period of temporarily insanity (sounds better than lack of intelligence).
Ok I knew there were a few of you out there and at least you are way up, but losing money is never fun.
That is patently false. The only hodlers not checking the price are the ones intentionally avoiding checking because it's tanking. 

There are a ton of hodlers here who don't even trade but they like to read input to be prepared for possibilities. Which is very smart imo 
Well it could make any number of bullish patterns such as V bottom, inverse h&s, or falling wedge after a drop. Right now, it is potentially making one of the most reliable continuations patterns.
For the last 24 hours the lows keep getting higher so I'm hopeful the next major move is up.
Holy shit Nano is $2!

I owned it from $5 to $35 then back to $5 and finally said fuck this shit. So glad I did. 
~~Why'd the longs:shorts ratio make you wanna move that SL?~~ Nm, I read it wrong.

> 6680

Typo?

Yeah... I really should have tethered up that last bag on the bot.  Fucking NEBL, 35% loss currently.
Well it is *now* that it busted down and bounced early ;) (at least on btc)
Yeah it's finished and amounted to nothing.
Bitfinex wicked to 499
Heh, yeah. I closed it at 6660 and put the buy back in. 
Thanks! I'm on Coinsquare (Canadian) so funding options are pretty abysmal but I'll try to catch a local bottom entry to buy in and transfer.
Surprisingly yes! You establish a range of confidence as a trader and guess I'm better at longing and buying the dips, occasionally . I'm really terrible at shorting though. 

["Proof"](https://imgur.com/a/EVDICXF)
The difference is chad is actually entertaining where diy acts like some smug middle schooler even when he's wrong, but I guess your right on some level 
hes expert

33&#37; = pain 
big green dildo
I check on https://bitcoinity.org/markets (clicking EUR->Kraken on the top) and yeah you are right, I guess that a 2K BTC wall maybe isn't that relevant but it's still nice to plan an entry/stop around there just in case.
I guess I assumed that the descending triangle is part of what forms the triple bottom.  I thought that is something you would be looking for to identify accumulation.
So is your mindset that once you see a green candle that pops us out you're looking to go long in hopes that the accumulation phase has ended?

The RSI is so damn low, this has either got to go up or flat for a while in my mind.
this could be why http://www.thatsmags.com/image/view/201706/pjimage-7-.jpg
Thats a myth. The Gox coins **were not** dumped in 2014. They were stolen throughout 2011-2012 and sold off way before 2014.
bruh
According to you only last week we were about to 'fly through $10k' and that you were looking forward to laughing at all those who went short?

How smug you were then, still we can have a good laugh at you now.
I know I'm being an asshole :(

I couldn't resist..
Lololol at least it means the people on this sub are generally nice.. I bet they all chuckled though.

I think it may go sideways from here btw
me neither. This is a public forum, whilst not great for the guy if true, to post that the dump won't happen and then 5 mins later for it to occur with savagery is well... a little bit amusing. 

I hope his long works out though 
a small in between bubble is also possible just with an bubble back to 12k you can double you investment but thats theoretical   right now it looks like we are back to an bear market like 2014 to 2016 
To each his own. I'm not trying to sway anyone either way, just pointing out 70% of the time it works everytime.
They earn fees in % values. 

They prefer 100 0.1% fees @10000 than 150 0.1% fees @5000
compare the volumes in bear market and in bull market
We've reached the outlying suburbs at /r/CryptoCurrency 
I hope we get some nice memes when it happens!
https://www.tradingview.com/chart/?symbol=BITFINEX:BTCUSDSHORTS
> I'd say that price not dropping from 6400 is pretty bullish too. 

I'd call that just slightly less bearish, but not bullish.
We didn't drop from $6700 either for 2 days and we're only here for around 5 hours. We need to reject it by having a good bounce.
Yes, it's about whether the reasons he gave were right or not, not about him saying it's going to drop and it dropped.
Tone is saying bottom is 1300, or bottom is 4985, with a 50% probability of each.

What do you think?
*pastime
And buying at ath is always risky business, now that it's way lower it could be considered a good entry point. Especially if you missed out during 2017. So it's not only bullish considering the anxious shorter but also considering the investors..
Edit; honestly I don't think we are going up any where soon..
Right now shorting tops is the mode I'm in until we find the real bottom... but there will be interstitials where longing makes sense.  $6.4k makes sense right now as does $6k (if we get there quickly).  All these plays will likely take many days to manifest as I don't believe any real panic has set in quite yet.  I think next capitulation exercise happens if/when $6k breaks.  If this happens, I think it's likely we'll see another a few months later.... this unless the market shows some real signs of reversal.
It's a ~56K BTC dump. Dude will run out of coins by Friday at this rate. Probably the best time to buy since May 2017.
I was about to do that with my sept fill at 6680, too. Oh well. 
womp womp.
The billion dollar buy is happening.  It's just that bulls are smart and actually want the best price.  Why not buy into a dump instead of paying more than you have to just to inflate your ego and the price? 

Even though I won on this trade, it really shows me the futility of shorting.  Would have made more by going long yesterday.  A good gain from shorting is 15 percent. Do people actually do this with large percentages of their holdings? Seems crazy to me.\\

[Edit: damn, I closed too soon. Oh well. Will go long in a bit]
that is my thought as well, but I just took the "base" prices for calculation, with the wicks (wicks down to 150 USD in 2015) we felt even harder, so if you set a order now, it is quite likly that your order gets executed, if everything folds out in the same way.

(anyways, this is just one "1 dimensional" perspektive, as coin supply and other fundamentals changed a lot, that should be considered as well. my main point is that it is not so smart to always talk about "the 2013 bubble" and try to compare the last bubble to that bubble, as the increase and the time span are very different.)
yeah I clicked a bit to fast submit, corrected that
Third time is the charm to go up or down?
I've come to short with you again
That's the bit I don't quite get. Suppose I take out a 21 mil short at 10k / btc (I wish on both fronts). Btc drops to 1 dollar so my short in btc terms is now 21 million btc.

What happens when I want to close that short? I assume the answer is that my close is so big it drives the price up to a point where I own less than the total btc supply? 
Thanks, this was my thinking as well. Essentially, I want the market to really prove to me that we're going to tank from $6,700, and for me, dropping below $6,500 would be good enough reason to bail. Until then, I'm chillin.
Now it's retesting it as resistance. Interesting. 
Now all those bag holders can dump? ;-)
No sir, this market is like a sadistic serial killer.  It will kill your bags slowly over months/years if need be.  Bleeding it out little by little.
To add to this, we had a significant sideways action for the days before. There's one opinion that tightening of the indicator BB bands often leads to volatile moves as a followup. 

However, in context it was "only" a 11% drop. While that is unusually high for the last two months, that kind of volatility was more common before then.
I.e., this subs favourite excuse. 
my nipple nation
If a small exchange hack caused this drop,then another bitfinex hack is going to take us to $100, lol.
Personally I dont think it matters. To the media maybe because they are looking to murder crypto at every possibility they get. I think that if this news caused a dump it was due to whales dumping hard to get people to believe the news matter (which it doesnt) 
Remember 1800 bitcoin need to be sold every day from mining. So you need at least that many players everyday to keep the price even
OTC to large buyers.
Lol, no. 

Triangles are broken with closes significantly outside their bounds. The symmetrical triangle broke convincingly and the weekly closed well below its lower bound. 
Not without a plan, but with a plan? Maybe. Do you think BRD, BGD, Barts, Marge's are natural or attempts to control the price?
Assuming they are holding a lot of btc AND vested in the price staying profitable, I would think at some point they can't let it die.  If it goes too far to goblin town where you break people it will be harder to push it up to ATH again, which will be needed as the mining rewards go down.  With that being said, they probably have lots of time on their side.
Yes, shorting drives the price down. The market leader, Bitfinex, allows you to short at a margin of 3.3x leverage. It shows up in the order history as the same thing as selling a bitcoin.

You could effectively "sell" 3 bitcoin on Bitfinex by shorting 1 BTC at 3.3x leverage on Bitfinex. 
You can also short on the spot market by lending real coins to dump them (for example on Bitfinex).
Leave me out of this please...

Can't a guy capitulate in peace?!
> And I'm not talking about Joe Schmoe who FOMO'd in at $15k. I'm talking about CryptoJoe who made 1200% since Feb 2017 and has never had to think about cashing out. you know, the guy who has way more bitcoin than Joe Schmoe 

Bingo.

Lots of folks in that range have gone from "I can buy a second house" to "I can pay off my existing house" yet still held. Somewhere between "I can pay off my house" and "I can pay off my car" -- a number of them will get shaken out. 
i think the only people left trading this market are margin traders and whales. i've got a lot of friends that bought under 5k which still holds everything. i sincerely doubt that even a 80% drop from here can shake those people. most people invested what they could loose. 
i understand the stress of seeing big profit vanishing but selling at this levels or lower make no sense at all. they put N amount of money that they can loose and they are all in long term. 

they are like "fuck it, we saw what we can get, we just wait the next bull run".

i can't see the reasoning behind some people comments. like:
"i can buy a second house"
" i can pay off my existing house"
why those people should sell lower? we dumped from 16-20k to 6k and they still hold. what change if we get half from here or even 1-2k if they used money they can afford to loose?
You're saying your trading strat is based on panic sellers pushing through.. I guess man, seems silly to me.
My charts actually have 5.5k as a possible entry point lol
>  I'm talking about CryptoJoe who made 1200% since Feb 2017 and has never had to think about cashing out. 

Why think so low of CryptoJoe Feb 2017. He survived about four 30-40% crashes last year before the bear-market. He might survive a 70-90% crash. He might be more hard-core and long-term than you think -- he probably isn't, though :)

Also why you assume that there are many CryptoJoe's who haven't cashed out one dollar. That's pretty radical. I think it is reasonable to assume many have cashed out 25%, 50% or 75%. The people who didn't most likely are too stubborn to panic-sell.

It is also possible many CryptoJoe's sold some part and (wrongly or correctly) belief that if they re-buy lower they can repeat their mad 1200% profits in the future. There is very likely a lot of money on the sideline which will come back if a "safe bottom" is found.
Isn't owning a piece of whitepaper worth billions? I feel cheated...
This. Especially when some guys accumulated billions (see EOS) worth of coins from dumb crowd and have no any reason to hold it.
Validating transactions in a PoS generates revenues  
Because dropping more % wise than we did after Mt. Gox makes perfect sense.
But... this doesn’t work as it contradicts your point — lots of people *were* saying it’s going to Pluto at $19k and then it started going down.

BluApex is saying that in the same way sellers overtook buyer at $19k (despite all the moon talk) the reverse can happen now - and the further down from ATH we are the more probable it will happen.

A certain % of panic sellers have already panicked and sold. Every $ lower there are less potential panic sellers.


The problem is that everyone knows that BTC is dying slowly right now.   So if the price spikes higher, we all know it won't stay there.  All it would be would be easy money to open a short position.  So it's really not likely to bounce very high.  

The bounces are getting weaker and weaker and will probably be a -15% day before long, if not -20%...perhaps when we break below $6K.
Wisdom.
> all the people looking solely looking to get rich.

The point of investment is to get rich. And it doesn't contradict with wanting the tech to succeed and have real use. It is not that people don't want to use btc, it is that there is very few places that can use bitcoin. Hopefully crypto payment solutions and crypto marketplaces can change this.
I am here for the tech. ~~of making money~~
When Lambo?
> I would think that at this point, even shorts from a few thousands up would put their stop loss at sub 7k.

I somewhat doubt that. Anyone with strong enough hands to hold from 8K+ probably wouldn't have their stops under 7100.
Point is i'm not shorting/margin trading. Simply buying low, selling high on Binance. It worked pretty well until it didn't. ;-)
I lost around 10% of my stack and will take a break to recharge my batteries. I have confidence in my approach, but have to avoid "revenge trading".
You made it all back... in the constant bear market since??!
When somebody says 'i shorted and lost' I always say this:

I shorted 19.6, 2x, closed with a freaking loss cause freaked out when it pumped, 5 mins later it was at 19, and it's dropping ever since.

Beat. That. MF.
... in 8 months from now?
He's old school in here, used to post in here years ago. 
https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/bwxEGqUf-BITSTAMP-D/
What a jackass. If there's one person I wish would leave crypto forever. 
Oh man who could forget that!
Father's day is Sunday, don't forget about those bonuses.

Agreed, I should've sold at my predetermined price and I broke my plan cause of greed even though it was clear as day. Decided to make a new long term plan and that's where I am now. 
Good question. I have a couple key levels from the run up that showed resistance that turned support. If these levels come up and volume picks up drastically, I may DCA in. Also how long it takes to get to these levels plays a part in my decisions. 

In before the questions of my levels, I'd like to keep those to myself but it wouldn't be too difficult to figure them out if you looked back.
That is a real risk (e.g. Bitfinex getting hacked and your coins being stolen), so I personally would only put a small portion of my BTC into funding and on the exchange in general, no matter how tempting the funding rate is.

The other risk is if the market drops or rises too fast that the forced liquidations cannot be matched quickly enough to the orders in the order book, allowing margin traders to lose more funds than they hold in their account. This way the margin trader's/borrower's account would not be able to repay all of the coins that they've borrowed from the lenders. According to Bitfinex this has never happened, although it could happen.  I can't seem to be able to post the link here, but it's on their website (google this bfx article: "What are the risks associated with offering funding? – Bitfinex")
mamamamooooooooo
I will
I didnt say its confirmed or anything. But with the daily RSI oversold and price bouncing off the 6450 support on the initial attempt, its 'shaping up' as a double bottom (or triple)
Crypto has been my hobby for the last year. Finding alts that make sense and holding. Last year I traded a lot and made money... But I'm bit gonna fool myself. The whole market went up and even a blind guy would have picked at least one winner. 

Just looking to take a small % to play with. O appreciate the response!
And yes. New to this sub. I've been on cryptocurrency sub for longer than I care to admit. No decent info there ever though. 
-__- it's a question that you could write a book in response to. Not easy to answer. 

Don't throw me under the bus! I try to help all the noobs I can
People downvoting: just a hypothesis. I know it would never happen.

Seeing the bitcoinity.org chart, seems to me that it would take approx 35k BTC to clean the order book until 6000.

It's not like I said it will instantly drop at the same time.

I said expect it to follow.

I don't want this to drop as I'm long from 7k+ and holding.

I never short. 
[deleted]
It always happens, it's just the same when EOS and ETH lead the dump/pump.
[deleted]
Underwater again
Tbh we're in $200 range since the drop. Nothing is certain now.
Alright, thanks guys. Spamming the API would seem to make it worse everybody but I guess it's the best way.
Not always the case. 
People have been shouting short squeeze even when shorts were low, this time they're already quite high.
lol I don't mind, it could totally happen. I just want people to know it's not a guarantee. people here are using it like it's a literal indicator 
brilliant 
except this sub panics or jumps for joy on mico moves
Nothing beats a paper loss.
I did this last year! It's actually an awesome idea if you really are just trying to accumulate more coins and not concerned about the usd amount as much.
Can't you only offset up to 3k? 
The more I see your comments we're exactly alike.

I did the same exact thing. I've used each dip to rebalance my holdings at a paper loss. I've used it to strategically offset my paper gains.
If we're stuck reporting in FIFO this year though I think you might be stuck only being able to offset losses on future gains...  I'm not a tax professional but i'd look into this and make sure.
Look up wash sale rules and figure out if they apply to Bitcoin. If they do, you have to stay out for 30 days, or else you don't get to take the loss. (In that case, the loss is merely rolled into a reduced cost basis for the new lots you bought.)
Looking out for crushed hopes, dreams and the absolute pain.
I've said before here and I'll say again. Trading this market without stops is like fucking a hooker without a johnny. It's all a thrill until you catch a dose and you have to take your medicine.
So no shortcuts to Goblin town?  
I guess I put too much "value" in breaking 6600.
Thanks. But how do I do that?  
It says "the account has insufficient balance" when I push the 10x button. I'm in with 100%. 
Did this. Feels good! Thanks.
No he's 5 for 5 right now. Win rate means everything. Nevermind that taker fees are probably more expensive than his profits 
That's a really interesting point about the timings, hadn't considered anything like that.
Yeah that’s what I’m saying — we’re gonna drop hard soon. The drop will accelerate once we break $6500.
capitulation is when we crash below 6k
I had just spent 6 months educating myself and investing my profits in more mainstream financial instruments... I better not have to throw all that to the wind to load up on BTC again in the $3,000s as soon as this summer. You fickle bastards.  
canary lee sold the top and abandoned the project and the whole reddit was like wow buy more!  

He forgot he was calling moon last week. Maybe he forgot to switch accounts.
Bitcoin will have more buying power in due time. Dollars in the bank are guaranteed to have less buying power. That's been my experience. I'm like Stokingator tho. I don't see the point in trading BTC unless you want more BTC, and I take my gains (and losses) in BTC. 
Those two doesn't exclude each other. If price drops 50% and you'll have 300% more BTC because you short then in fact you have more money :-)
What line is that?
Aren't dailies in UTC by default? it means it already closed.
So far it has not
My interface, cryptowat.ch, shows "15:39:46" remaining for this candle on the 1wk BFX BTCUSD.

Pretty sure I'm not reading that wrong, am I?
yep. you seeing [this](https://i.imgur.com/8UYgt1E.png) too?
I never said tether would blow up, I said there's gonna be some great news regarding tether.

great news = does not mean a tether blow up
here it is! https://www.nytimes.com/2018/06/13/technology/bitcoin-price-manipulation.html?partner=IFTTT
Ha, I've lost plenty myself, but that's the risk of shitcoins - the reason you lose more is because you wanted more. 

Nonetheless, my lens was not $, but overall sanity of the space.  
Based on the votes, you are the echo chamber.
what's expensive is all relative to the market.
looks familiar to that 7k1. Tested it twice and huge dump the third time, and yes weak buy volume.
No you wouldn't. This is denial thinking that you will be saying "I'd love 100$ BTC" when it hits $1000 and crying crocodile tears of bagholder
[Dot.com](https://Dot.com) were actual companies and not imaginary internet beans
so you mean in a few days?


There's only been two macro bear cycles and they both bottomed on deep (-30%-50%) capitulative drops.
If it survived Q1 this year, it is here to stay. I don't think it will ever go below 3.5k, maybe higher. Likely if we survive the current "valley", it may never go below 5k either. 

Firstly, it became a huge industry. Exchanges, miners, all the 'egg heads' lecturing about it all the time. Secondly, there is a huge group of people who still have thousands of Bitcoins at their disposal, e.g. that guy from the Pineapple Fund. They like Bitcoin and I can't see how they are going to let it die, or even get properly shaken. At sheer will they may turn the tide, in the wallstreet's face, if need be. I truly think so.
I imagine the novelty alone of having some will keep it above that.  Like having a baseball card (hmm I guess they tried that with crypto kitties...)
Yeah that would be a 95% retracement. While it has happened once before in bitcoin's past, that was back in 2011 before the altcoins took a huge chunk of the market. I think it's possible the entire crypto market could do a 95% retracement, but not bitcoin itself.
These kind of comments are exactly why I think Bitcoin will go below $1,000. The problem is that at that point, it would be sort of a reverse feedback loop and then $200 is back in the cards..Scary but entirely possible. 
a bit to high for me , where are the 0.1$ boys at?
da wurst brand
Yeah that's a month in crypto time.
and we're down 18.5% since then!! I was wondering where the heck you were.

Hope all is well 
I'd like this year ;-)

I managed to jump into 6.8 short, small but still. More of a gut shot than anything. Or more like 'I'd rather go here and add higher than miss it completely'. It still may bounce like you said up to 7k before we break down but I think it's either up from here or we won't see 7k for a long time...
wow you bears really believe this will take 1 or 2 years to recover... fomo will kick your ass
If your goal is more BTC, then you're still flat from last week. Better than many folks. 

This isn't bouncing much. It almost has to somewhere, but it's feeling a little bit like that might be lower, up to retest 6500-6600. I've got a massive short on swaps from 6680 and a large short on June from 7505. Can't decide if I should just take the swaps win. Futures is staying open for now. 
sweet thanks. that is kind of hilarious. 
Same. It was nothing substantial but I definitely put the horse before the cart on that one.
Woosh
"every time this year"

Perhaps it's prudent to look at similar time periods like...2014. 

Old patterns may not work anymore because the market is different
*Dead cat bounce
Reading this felt worse than reading about China bans
I'm going to assume you're joking because a world where Chad isn't bullish isn't a world I want to live in 

(wait are you being serious, I mean it wouldn't surprise me since things look jusy a little bleak) 
Oh. My. God. 1st time seeing a human side of you
I don't want to live on this planet anymore :(
wow, yikes... I thought you were being serious, not capitulating /sarcasm

Hang in there, bro.
Feel free to mentally capitulate, it might even feel good, as long as you don't actually capitulate and sell, you will be OK in the end.
Roughly it seems.  Maybe 6400 as the *breakdown point, but support as high as 6600ish.
Cool! I'll snort a line to that.
Great, now all you have to do is convince everyone to stop buying and start selling!  Good luck with that!
Yeah I just hate Wells Fargo
better yet, use cc's for a business, get points, take free trips.
Yes it is Good for Bitcoin if you prevent people from buying Bitcoin.  If you started executing everyone who tried to buy it, that would be the Best for Bitcoin, but that is over the top and I can get my Lambo without that happening.


Does it look terrible to governments and potential users for bitcoin to continue its reputation of atrocious volatility? Has this volatility ruined many overexposed traders and speculators? 

Yes and yes. 

Will there be everyone from teenagers to billionaires hoarding bitcoin at these prices and all lower prices, eventually causing another major bull market? 

I assume so. 
Oh for sure.  Long term I'm a permabull on crypto... but that's 5+ year timespan.  Medium term I'm bearish.

Definitely no need to fight but... it is the interwebz
Right, they haven't been shaken out.  As the bear market goes lower, they will be and they'll stop posting
There have been plenty of traders who would have accumulated more wealth by just holding.
CME futures?
You would have to use VPN and use Bitmex or Bitfinex.
I don't get it either, but just talking about the reality of the sub.
I read the post at the time and admit, very compelling and very correct. Nice work. 
Lol. Heard that in 2013 too. Except it was supposed to start in 2014.
I am :)
Everyone is expecting the price to dump below 6k now, so if bitcoin does what it always does it will probably rise again from here :/ Lets hope your decision was right
[deleted]
You're correct. I didn't mean "a given" as in "surely 10". I meant, "likely higher than lower, especially long term". It can be 8, it can be 10. Who knows.

Are you seriously saying that people who think bitcoin can go back up to 10k are "absolutely delusional"? You're kidding me right? 
C’mon, it’s not THAT horrendous lol r/bitcoin is terrrrrrible
Is this sub really dead sure? because I don't see anyone shorting here. I see dozens of people longing/buying, talking about short squeezes.

I'm not going to lie I'm actually genuinely worried for the buyers here. I will almost be happier to lose some profits than see everyone here get burned 

Sentiment is through the roof considering price action. Massive red flag imo  

1d being oversold isn't a good sign, it doesn't mean we're in for a large bounce, it means btc is trending DOWN. 

As in we just broke down from our consolidation range and are now trending *down*. I don't see it as bullish 
> I've seen this subreddit be dead sure 

Dead sure is 100% probability.  Sure there are a few people saying 100% chance of going to $1000, but more saying it's guaranteed to see $10K again.


If you think the BTC behavior leading up to then and leading up now are qualitatively similar I would tend to disagree. 

Furthermore it sort of puts it into the hands of a MM who might choose between a big red or big green candle for whatever their preference is. 

Who knows, but short of manipulation the fundamentals and sentiment short to mid term appear overwhelmingly bearish to me. 
The smallest amount of sell pressure which basically stalled any further increase.
Exactly my opinion too. Too many folks that entered pre 1k are still condfident and have not sold yet. And they might realize (more) profits too, when price dwelling further down. Real panic has noz set in yet. Maybe sub 6k, maybe sub 4k. (I expect to see 2-3k in about one year and then bottom out for some month or  even another year.)
People are still going on about the dao? Talk about drinking koolaid...
>It is more risky to not be holding BTC than it is to be holding BTC

This is true in a bull market.  In a bear market its the opposite.  You will most likely be able to buy lower in the coming months.
It would but only for a few moments before all of the bots sell and dump the price back down
So does Trump. At least Tom knows how to wear a tie. I'll give him that.
"Fuckfest Sunday" has a nice ring to it. I heard bloody sunday earlier but I like yours better.
Yep, they're expanding again.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/WYcoeR0L/
Yes its invalidated.  Good find!  1 hour bull div can definitely work well for a trader if they are trading that timeframe just keep in mind its 1/24 as strong as the daily div.
Haha, yes... and what if YOU are the hole that gets screwed by everyone else? questions questions more questions. Guess nobody knows how this plays out.
Great post and couldnt agree more.
Good luck mate, I actually started the courses last night. Dan is in fact, the man. 
Appreciate the support and glad the courses are useful. Thanks! 
no f*ckin problem mate 
More likely stop losses for the majority, the moves aren't so big.
Ok then, i saw the opening value and thought this was the first add.

Carry on :)
Very bearish imo. The time scale of the formation leaves a lot of room for shakeouts in both directions as we go down though. I'm not going to try to trade that shit.

Wouldn't be surprised at an eventual return to that line in the coming weeks where we confirm it as support turned resistance. It's pretty horizontal so it's a line I'll be putting a lot of weight on.

Personally believe we're entering a longer term bear/stagnant market ala 2014 with one or two more good capitulation wicks on the weekly. Could see us doing anything from a brief capitulation to 2-2.5k with the majority of the time being spent in the 4ks to a shallower bear compared to 2014 and only briefly dipping into the 4ks while stagnating for a long time in the 5ks to this being an absolute fakeout and reclaiming that support line.

Given all those possibilities and how unsure I am of what's going to play out I'm entering a weekly DCA with the add amount being dependent on the price level/change since last week (and I'll probably add a great deal on a gigantic capitulation if I catch it). That's why I stopped using the bot - not going to call this trading as I'm building a long term position. No matter what I plan to be fully bought in when that line is reclaimed. If this market goes like I'm expecting, obviously not a sure thing, that will either be within a few weeks or won't be for quite a long long time.

And the line I had drawn was a little steeper than that. If you exactly connect the 6k and November lows you get what I had.
There's an argument that we're seeing our third bottom over a 3-6 month scale right now. According to the fourth bullet, to confirm the triple bottom you'd be waiting for BTC price to rise back above "the highest of the intermittent highs" - or around 11.5k.
I would tend to agree with you that things almost intentionally go against what most people expect. However, shorts are getting very close to longs in number. While I’m not expecting another BGD like last time, these shorts have either gotta close or get squeezed at some point.

While many people on this thread are going long here, overall more people are opening shorts than longs here. The shorts keep on piling up the longer we stay static here, which seems bullish to me as well. We are also in a slightly different spot than we were around $7k-$7.6k since the overall number of shorts was much lower then.

I’m not saying we necessarily bounce right here, but I seriously doubt we will break down from the descending triangle at $6k without shaking out some shorts first.
I get what you're saying but the evidence doesn't back you up. Longs have steadily been declining for days and shorts are up. They are almost on parity, actually. Also, funding for shorts on finex has tripled in the past 24 hours. Lastly, since longs are decreasing and shorts are increasing that means people are shorting into actual buys, not just longs. People seems to be buying coin here, not a leveraged position. Maybe here is not the best time to buy but if we get another leg down, especially if we get a new low into the 6.3's, I bet we'll see a lot of longs capitulate and shorts will increase further again while people shout for goblin town. I think that will be an excellent buying opportunity.
I agree. I wasn't saying that I think this is the end of the drop. I was just wondering why whales wouldn't make free money by using leverage and better liquidity at Bitmex, if they are not doing it already

I've closed my short and am flat (the word you taught me OMFG!), expecting a short-term bounce. If it bounces significantly, I will re-short :D
Yeah, less than 600 bucks above it, my point exactly.
Mhhhh 
Indeed, kinda wishing I had just scalped my short off at the bottom of this drop that has now mostly retraced.
Just responded to Vel below about my view on scalping/long term positions.

But yes, they are/would have been scalps. My 2 recently trades were Longs for a longer term position. First one I had option to close for a 3% gain but held on and wound up taking a small loss.

It’s a scalpers market for now 
The bottom is likely to fall out any moment? 


edit: like this moment

Welp, now we know who was behind those large short increases prior to recent major declines in price. /s
Well, Ill join your shorting party if that becomes the case
Gonna be annoying and tricky if sideways here repeats the previous few weeks and climbs up to 7k while making another fatty 1D bear flag.
I don't know about a day, maybe over the course of a couple weeks given enough enthusiasm.  You'll always have your profit takers.
Usually only the longs have those issues. Don't recall having issues shorting
I'm also looking for a place to add to the short, but mainly for the purpose of making the long bigger to insure it further (as it's currently too small enough and needs like a 500+ move for me to care, i'd like to hold it back all the way to the top of the big triangle resistance, but it'll probably turn into a scalp instead).
If you're willing to add at 6560, may as well add at like 6547, right?  Because the latter is almost gauranteed to hit IMO, but the former would be luckier (in the case that the floor falls out soon and it doesn't just chop up over another 200 range again over the next half day.
I don't know that we're going that low quite this fast. It's a R/R game for sure, but I didn't want my CA under 6650. Currently at 6680 with stops over 6650. What's your entry?
Except you won't. Because you will be one of those saying "I will be buying at 500$" once it reaches 1000$ and forever pushing goal posts like /r/bitcoinmarkets always do. You know this, I know this, everyone knows this. And also the bottom will be for such a brief moment you will not buy it anyway.
Hmmm, it is simple maths. I think best way to explain is via this very old and basic video: [https://youtu.be/IGGUrm\_siXo](https://youtu.be/IGGUrm_siXo)
If 6400 falls then yeah, it's a lower low and it'll be coming down hard.  
you got bullfudded mate 

Gotta ignore the noise here tbh.

Your close wasn't bad though. but if it capitulates here then it's awkward to short the bottom 
>  revenge trade 

Yeah don't do that. It ain't logical.

I been there doe. 
Exactly. Shorts were at ATHs a few times in summer 2014. One time led to a nice short squeeze that led to a 50% bull trap in April. They returned to ATHs after the 50% move and the price bled out for the remainder of the year. Most short squeezes *don't* lead to sustained counter-trend rallies, but they can produce really solid bounces that produce good shoring opportunities.


Shorts must buy back though. It's guaranteed buy pressure. You're right to say that they may not be wrong and the price could still be driven downwards, but you can literally quantify their buying pressure and add that to your R/R.
After hearing about bitcoin here and there and making headlines that it went to $1K, I created an account on CB and caught the knife sometime in Dec 2013. DCA'd for a few months and finally gave up. Lost interest altogether when I saw go below $200 thinking it was going to zero. Held and dispersed to ETH and shit coins during 2017. Ended up with a nice profit.

This time feels different in a bad way to be honest with you. There was nothing really going on for BTC back then so fundamentally there was only one way to go, which was up, albeit it took a while. Recently, BTC's fundamentals keep improving yet the price keeps going down which makes me feel like that parabolic rise was just a manipulated anomaly and we're going through price discovery now which could settle at who knows where. The fact is nobody is buying BTC at these prices so price will keep going down.

Everybody, including myself, is banking on the fact that we're just in going through typical post bubble market cycle but who knows. Blockchain will continue to integrate into our lives but who knows about bitcoin. 

Feeling bearish at the moment so my sentiment is negative but regardless I am not selling at these prices or below so no chance of capitulating for me. 
Market won't stay oversold as long as it stayed overbought but it's not at all difficult to reset RSI while going sideways/bear flagging. 

We went back to 46 RSI on a 10% bounce.

if we do that again, we'll get to 46 RSI at $7k, then dump another 16% down to $5900. 

It can repeat like that for a long time 
You are pulling data from a year where the price went from $700 to $20,000. 

You could justify just about any price movement you want into something bullish if you compare it to a pattern from 2017. 2018 has been *nothing* like 2017.

I highly suggest you take a step back and evaluate whether or not it makes sense to only look for historical data within a specific time period.
4800 it is. 
I do exactly this (and post once or twice a year in these threads).
Described me perfectly. I'm set where I am, made a total of ...3 or 4 trades back in March and haven't touched my stacks basically at all. I started back in April of last year so I'm up significantly. I read this to make sure I really don't need to jump ship and buy back lower or if it's time to cash out. Clearly more concerned with the former right now... 
This is me 
Indeed. I checked the price quite a bit last fall, and was able to take some profit as a result. 
Well, I agree that you should read input to be prepared for possibilities so you don't make poor decisions, but I don't know how you can blanket a group of people and declare it patently false. 

You know I agree and respect almost all of your posts. But nobody should declare something with certainty that they could not know. Unless you have some proprietary neck-bear scraping bot that I don't know about. AND, if so, please share. 
Bear flags should make higher lows and higher highs.

Usually when they start going down is when it's more probable they will break up.

We've seen a lot of that on the bull flags that Bart'ed down. They started moving slowly up before crashing
On the shorter time frames this statement is becoming less and less true with each day. Only until on the day chart when we make the lower low will people finally shutup with this argument 
Yeah...crazy man. 
Alts are in some trouble.
Now it's a flag on btc and nothing on eth :)

Stamp only went to 506.
It has to break and push through. BTC needed to go below 6600 for it to happen. 

Have a buy around 503 just in case a wick goes there and will bail (turn my long into a short) below 500 if BTC also keeps dropping.

Some time ago I used to keep those buy orders all the time, not many hit in bull market but it was instant profit.
You closed that second buy?

And I'm only 1.5x now... What I said about my gut feeling?
I rank them:

Chad - Pure parody; hilarious  
Binary - Ol' faithful permabull; amusing  
Stokinator - Aggressively bullish; willing to debate  
diydude - Condescending willful ignorance; always scroll past  
exactly one is funny and witty. the other one is just annoying. both to be ignored when it comes to trading advice
Triple bottoms don't always have to form descending triangles. I just wanted to say to be mindful, because triple bottoms and descending triangles can look eerily similar, and you don't want to get caught with your pants down. If you want to long here, I would just be careful to set stop losses in case you're wrong (I'm long here as well, but just giving a heads\-up!)
Well, if you play by TA rules, the idea is that a pattern is not considered valid until it actually confirms -- and confirmation here would be a breakout through the resistance. That puts us in a somewhat awkward position because there isn't really a good, clean resistance line to breakthrough, but it is what it is. 

Personally, I'm more of a degenerate knife catching shitcoiner noob and I don't really trade Bitcoin much nowadays aside from some short-term leveraged scalps, so I'm just looking to reload my alt bags, probably somewhere right around here -- actually eyeing some potential entries right now. 
Yea that's exactly why. But it's pretty bullshit lol what the fuck is potcoin 
Of course that's why.
we can all admit though, assholes are funny. Both varieties 
Let us all take ourselves too seriously! 

And yes sideways for sure. Unless it goes up or down. 

Edit: And I did not cry the other day when someone called me stupid, I said thank you for your contrarian opinion. I maybe drank a little more, but I did not cry.

Edit 2: Will drink one beer in the airport skylounge for each downvote, bring it on.
"just a little in between bubble"

lol
Good point, guess do do care a bit about the price... But I think the real cash cow is the margin premiums they collect without any risk.
They get a % of the size of orders. If someone buys $1 million of BTC, they get the same fee regardless of whether the price is $10 or $10,000 dollars. They get a % of the $1 million, not a % of the BTC price.
Lol
cool thanks looks like we have a little ways to go before fireworks
That's chance. It means jack shit.


so place 50&#37; buy order at 5k and 50&#37; at 1.4k and you dont loose money, if 1.3k happen we will se 2.6k for sure and if 5k is the real bottom we will see 10k for sure. 
Bottom on what time frame?    And that doesn't even make sense...1300 or 4895.   I don't make long-term predictions, because too many unknown variables, but I will be surprised if the price stays above $5000 for the net few months.  $3500 or so seems over 50% likely in the next year.
I should trade by my gut only. Hits like 90% of the time.
I went 10x short with 100% of my holding from 8310. I now have so much more holding.

Also, you closed a smidge early.
Well, we've gone up the first two time, didn't we? So the third time, the opposite's gonna happen.

It's just that the support is getting weaker and weaker (buying interest getting lower and lower) everytime we touch this bottom, that eventually it'll break
The exchange is rekt and you dont get paid out. There are like 8000 btc in the insurance fund so they have some extra money to cover the profits of shorts if we go crazy low, but not $1 crazy. In that scenario, everyone loses long and short
the people the other side of the contract always have at least 105% of the funds to cover your earnings. if their funds fall below that it will liquidate them forcing them to sell.  if there is no one to sell to the system will force someone in large profit and or leverage, like you, to close all or some of your position.

Have a read through the contract specs.  If it is too hard to follow do not use the contract, true for all things

Why would you dump to buy at a premium price
Got downvoted for missing /s maybe.

 From now on,  buy/sell/trade/open short/long should be read as attempt to manipulate the price of btc. Indeed any of the above does change, affect, I.e manipulate the btcusd chart
So some whale decided to dump a shitload of coins just to try to convince us that an insignificant exchange that got hacked was significant?  Really??  Why would the media hate crypto?  Financial institutions, maybe.
Every bear has been singing this song since long ago. In 2013 it was 3600 btc sold daily, need $1 million to sustain the high price.. Well i shorted big time,but the math calculations went kaput!
OTC is bad, not good. 

OTC easy profit is buy OTC without raising the price on exchanges, now when calculating a dump, you dont have overhead of the price you raised btc if you were to buy it from a exchange.

OTC BUY > LOAD UP ON SHORT CONTRACTS > DUMP OTC BTC. 
REBUY BTC CHEAPER, CLOSE SHORT CONTRACTS to cause price spike, Sell the rebrought btc or keep to unload higher.

Something along that.

Its a free market, no rules. Dont be suprised when wash trading, price manipulation, exchange cheating on own users get headlines later. 
Although this would still significantly affect the market. Whoever buys it would have an exorbitant amount of btc they would want to unload. I don't think anyone could handle buying all of their bitcoin, actually.  
Generally, all trend lines should be considered elastic, flexible rubber. Not rods of steel. I dont think we broke through it convincingly either, the volume was pretty normal looking at the big picture. What matters more is the horizontal support line we're hovering at, which has been the marker for the last 2 major dips before this one. Again, flexible rubber. These lines can be violated, only when you break through with extreme volume, it then becomes more meaningful. Its fairly possible that this "trend line" we broke through is insignificant in all ways when considering future price movements.
my arbitrarily drawn triangle is better then your arbitrarily drawn triangle 
BRD and BGD depend highly on Stop Losses, so often this becomes a chain reaction. Surely, a bigger player injecting or taking their funds can be a catalyst, but this never happens on its own.

But surely there are huge players who can simply throw 1000 units on the market at their whim and just turn the tide, or amplify it. Also clearly there is a correlation between what futures do and what happens to Bitcoin. At least I'd say so. 
Ohh right, I never knew that. 

I always thought that it was a prediction and betting on that.

See I never short because I actually believe in Bitcoin and want it to succeed, I know that you can make money in both directions in this market but I always think the lowest we could ever go to is 0 (something that would never happen) but there is no limit to the upside potential.

Thanks for the info. 
lmao
LOL sorry man 
Sorry! But you will be remembered forever
Sadly, you can already see it happening. Lots of people from early 2017 beginning to acknowledge the possibility. 

I remember the dread of having to choose between waiting for breakeven and selling at a small profit. 

I can't imagine what it'd be like for someone who bought at $4k finally acknowledging it could go lower when the paper wealth they once had was exorbitant


Those dips are only purchasing opportunities to stack more. Bitcoin isn't going anywhere and we need a global currency at least for inet purchases. 
Money is money and whether you can "afford to lose" it or not, that doesn't mean that you just throw it away, if it's not neccesary.
why would those people sell lower?

because the type of person to sit through a 65-70% correction with several very good chances to get out higher is the type of person to panic sell low

it's all the same, man. 

no one plans on panic selling...that's why it happens. 
He's not saying it will happen and he is trading based on that.

He is saying there is a possibility of that happening and people should at least consider it. Because if it indeed happens, getting caught with your pants down will be disastrous since emotions will rule your reasoning and bad decisions will be made
The entire buying strategy the past 8 years has been based around people waiting for other people to panic buy...

And no, it's not really anyway. No one needs to panic sell for this to go lower. I just think that's what will happen

Seriously though. Ask a bear what they'll do if we go past $10k. $12k etc 

"well I'll buy/switch my strategy" 

ask a bull what will happen at $5.8k

"it won't happen" (which is basically what you're saying here)

recipe for disaster imo but I know people won't agree because "it won't happen" 
I already have limit buy/closes there, might move em lower but am thinking of keeping at least part of it for the inevitable panic bounce
I don't think low of him- I just don't think he has a plan. Dude here yesterday named WolfofBinance or something said he's up 18x and quit his job and is living off crypto. Said he's depressed and lost a ton of wealth. 

No offense to that guy but I don't have much faith in him to hodl through. He literally doesn't even have a job. Asked him if he'd cash out and he said no, he lives off it but would never take it all out. said he hasn't even planned on it. says he has 1-2 years worth of crypto. we tank 25% from here and he starts desperately wondering how low it'll go, I'm betting he's gonna sell a big chunk 

I suspect there are still tons of crypto rich people who never cashed out. I mean.. We're still at $6.7k, an exorbitant price compared to $400 just two years ago. 
> and have no any reason to hold it.

You mean besides the twenty free 1:1 airdrops and selling it on the internal RAM market and the internal bandwidth market?
No, it generates more tokens which are not revenues per se.
Everybody take note: bulls in the thread will say this year is not like 2014, while also making comparisons between this year and 2014.
Btc slowly dying? Bear market does not = dead. 
Yes that day will be The Poppening.
Yea honestly I'm adding more if this goes anywhere close to $7k on anything but a miracle bounce. 
Ah yeah good point, it'd make a lot more sense to at least put it right above that line of course.
Doesn't matter. If you feel bad about a loss take a break, clear your mind, learn your lesson, think what you did wrong and get back what you lost. Worked every time for me.

Market is hard now. Lot of people oscillate around break even now. Follow the hall of fame, there are couple traders here who earned their respect by spot on reasoning, learn from them.
Revenge trading is probably the biggest problem and generated biggest loses for traders.

You will lose. Sooner or later. Nobody can be right every time. It's how you handle those loses is what makes you a trader.
I short a lot :-)

Like 50% of profits are from shorting this market.

And it's not you can't make money on longing. You just can't make long term targets.
I paid like .3 BTC for a year of VPN service way back when. But yeah, you win.
I shorted 100% holdings at 9950 15x, but bitmex price never got that high so majority of shorts didn't hit. When I got in, I closed way up high and got chopped on the way down. Held underwater shorts most of the way down actually, only to be redeemed last minute.
Thought I didn't need a /s but I guess I do haha
Really? I like the guy, he amuses me.
Not directed at you Sloppy, you are a one of the best here. I just get bugged when anyone downvotes legit questions, no one feels like answering, fine but no reason to be rude and downvote them.
You should be fine about this movement. Unless you see one of the big coins dumping more than 10% BTC should be good.

If BTC is testing support and clinging to dear life and another coin starts dumping, then you can start worrying.
This needs to be a wiki that we can link to when people oversimplify the push and pull relationship between these assets.
Can you show that "it" always happen? It's a pretty simple tradingview script. I'm surprised someone hasn't become wealthy off this already if it's true. It's so simple. 

* Assert a simple observation without providing evidence
* Trade on it
* ...
* Profit
Not always, ETH yesterday fell 4%, then climbed back 4% then dropped 3% and BTC didn't move more than 1%.

You need massive dumps with high volume to affect other coins. ETH today spiked to 547 and BTC didn't even flinch.
I've got you tagged as also correlating oil price dumps to BTC dumps.
Not true. Check out "velocity of money".
Sure if you want to just roll the dice you might get lucky but these contrarian type trades get rekt more than not.
Wow got down voted here. You'd have made a sick trade holding a short from 6500 to the bottom today :( shoot, I'd keep it open this isn't the bottom.
I agree that there might be a short squeeze. I've even closed my short. But not sure whether those increasing shorts are traders'. Might be a whale loading up shorts before dumping
I think you are confusing with being able to use past harvested capital losses towards your tax return if you have no capital gains. Meaning if you dabbled in stocks in 2017 and lost $10K but have no capital gains in 2018, when you do your taxes in 2019, you can only use $3K of the harvested losses. However if you have $10K capital gains in 2018, come next year you can apply the whole $10K loss from 2017 to offset those gains.
While FIFO was proposed in the revised tax bill, when it came out it was omitted so for now LIFO out is allowed until further notice. So are wash sales. Regardless a loss in a calendar year is a loss that can be applied towards cumulative gains/losses of the year. The way I see it, if I sell now and realize the loss for 2018, anything I plan to immediately buy back I will probably end up holding at least through 2019 anyway. If the price keeps going down significantly and somewhat of a sideways movement I will continue to do the same. The risk is if you try and time the bottom and it does a V pump and now you have to pay for more but I don't think we're out of the woods yet.

I know what wash sale rules and I handed this article to my accountant (who is very sharp and keeps up with the times) https://cryptotaxprep.com/wash-sales-what-every-bitcoin-investor-should-know/

She was comfortable with allowing wash sales after doing her own research. 

I'm already in the minority meticulously calculating and paying my crypto taxes so I will tread the line when it comes to certain things I can take advantage of until the IRS says otherwise.
And you're good in a few weeks and do it again? 
6400 is the lower low, that's the big one for now, 5900 after.
You close part of your position.
how many contracts? place a long order for some % of the contracts here, it will take profits and reduce your position size, from there you can scale back to 10x.
we are directly going into the 2nd crypto panic this year. that is the time where we see the 3d bbands go sub 30.
Yeah aka goblin town
Smart man...that's the way to do it.
No he keeps role playing as a bear. I think he just wants to know what it's like being right sometimes 💀☠️
> I don't see the point in trading BTC unless you want more BTC

How about having the freedom to never work again if I don't want to?
> Bitcoin will have more buying power in due time.

I am talking about the real world, not your fantasy world of what you want to happen in the future.

And if you "don't see the point" in trading BTC to have more money, then good luck to you.  It sounds like you really need it.
I never suggested that it did.  I just try to have more money.  I don't care if it's 1 BTC at $10,000 or 10 BTC at $1K each or 100 BTC at $100 each.
No where in particular, just lines up perfectly with the first bump on the drop to these last spikes.

EDIT: I think i see where yours comes from, but in my chart i have it a bit higher, being touched by that last wick. 

It closed 3 minutes ago according to the charts I'm watching. 
Cryptowatch is just fucked. No other charting sites use wednesday as the close. Use tradingview.
Your comment could be directed at people in bitcoin vs traditional assets too 
You're not wrong about that. I don't think we're done dropping, but there's plenty of room for both your possibilities to happen. 
Oh, I thought we were talking about bubbles throughout history WHICH YOU CLEARLY WERE JUST TALKING ABOUT. God damnit you are dense. 

You can argue that the crypto bubble will fall harder then other previous historic bubbles, but if you think this is going sub 1000, you are frankly delusional. The Data does not support that view. Every day more and more people are flocking to crypto. Coinbase doubled its users since January, Binance quadrupled its users, more and more developers and companies are building on platforms like ETH, and adoption for crypto is taking off like crazy. Now I admit, crypto used solely and strictly as a store or transfer of value like bitcoin isn't all that useful imo, but all the Ethereum-like platforms will have tremendous use cases. 
Agreed, I see 3k as the absolute bottom, but I think there's a good chance 5k holds. 
No, my comment has no influence on the price. $100,000,000 per coin is more likely than $200 at this point. You have no idea what you are talking about, you can feedback loop yourself up your ass, BTC is staying above $1k
>These kind of comments are exactly why I think Bitcoin will go below $1,000.

Well thanks for letting us know that your view is supported by nonsensical reasoning. 


That doesn't even work on a thoeritical level, if I believe the price of x is y, I'm going to believe that y-1 is less likely and that y/1000 is near impossible and that y=0 is impossible. Confindence that a price won't happen increases to infinity as it apporches zero.

If I ask everyone to place odds that anything would hit zero you would have evidence that everything will hit zero
$4 Bois are over at /r/buttcoin.
Bitcoin doesn't 10x every other Tuesday.
TBH I'd think about switching to Sept from June and swaps.
Lol yeah, man its been like what 3-4 weeks?

My liquidation was 0.017 actually. got to 0.01670...

LTC charts look probably the worst out of most big alts/coins. It's just a monstrous descending triangle since January 
*This time it's different*

Edit: *sarcasm italics*
Yes I posted elsewhere in this sub today that 3d and 1d RSI has dropped to around 23 a couple of times in 2014.
It's good rr to scalp a long here...
Because dead cats are totally worth $6500 apiece, amirite? 


Yea, I'm getting some crisis of bullishness today, actually starting to think we might dump below $6000. If that dumps, I'm still very confident $5000 is the bottom, with maybe some short wicks below it, but to expect a new low is absolutely unthinkable for Chad...
I think I'm going long... YOLO long.
I hate all of those evil fucks, which is partly why I am into crypto.
> Yes it is Good for Bitcoin if you prevent people from buying Bitcoin...

With money the can't afford to lose, with debt, ...etc
[deleted]
Why would anyone expect that? The price was just under 6K for about five minutes in February and hasn't really been under 6K since Oct-Nov.  Why would it go there now?  What reason is there to expect this beyond that powerful bear brand of hopium?
Did someone just say 'oh snap'? Ultimate confirmation!!
> I meant, "likely higher than lower,

So "it's a given" to you could mean 51% probability of that event occurring.  Weird use of that term, but ok.

> It can be 8, it can be 10. Who knows.

Some of us know the difference between 80% and 100% (and 50.1%).
Difference between "can go back up to" and "is inevitable" 
"Inevitable" and "can" are your two words to look up today
> "Inevitable" and "can" are your two words to look up today


[deleted]
I have made some profits from recent drops, but would rather see crypto recover at this point.  It's sad to see it die like this.  And some will say "dead" means $0.00, but being down 90% from ATH is going to be close enough.
Yeah the leadup is different than before.  (yet still so similar of how people thought at 11.7 vs 10k, and on the numbers side there are some similar fractals too)

And we've already done sideways here, so maybe that means it's time for something different, whatever that is.
There are so many people who haven't taken any profits yet and just hope it will bottom out at $6k. I think people fail to realize this is unlikely to go higher until old hands have cashed out - the sell pressure from them when they get a chance to sell higher will be too high. That's why we've seen lower highs over and over, the OGs and people from the first half of 2017 and before that realized they needed to sell to lock in profits
So i guess this 'shaking out' of the weak hands is done by the market and if you are a professional, you just have to wait until you think the weak hands are gone.  The article gave the impression that somehow the professional has to shake out the weak hands themselves before entering.
If someone entered in 1k and have not already taken profit, there is no reason not to take profit now. Why would they wait and only to panic when price drops lower?
Why should what happened with the DAO no longer be seen as a warning? It's still the same eth with the same people and the same hyperbole of fantastic promises.
trump doesn't wear glasses though.  he has true vision unlike bcore-legacy.


Nice chart!  I could see those projections playing out, though I'd probably tilt them clockwise a few degrees to slow them down and make the accumulation part more of a bleed.

Wonder if we'll ever bounce off the top of resistance that triangle again (I mean before it's apex)
Thanks, I never thought of it that way, being 1/24 as strong from the daily. Which makes sense. But I still haven't found any info on how to gauge how much a div will play out on the price. I guess it might not be something measurable like when you have a pattern and you can have a possible target. 
I've opened with 10%, added yesterday around 6.7-6.8 another 90%, that's why CA dropped so much.

Plan was to add when we break around 7k, but I missed that moment...
They can close lower if the price goes lower. 

Who's shorting here? I'm genuinely not seeing *anyone* shorting here. Seriously go through this daily and find me one person who said they shorted under $6.6k. 

It's a big red flag imo. Someone is accumulating a billion shorts while all the traders here long for the r/r. 

It's the perfect liquidity pool for redistribution and markdown. 

I mean, even aside from all this, I'm not really spooked by a BGD again. Shit looks bearish as all hell.

Your premise hinges upon the idea that the shorts adding here are small players that need to be shaken out. "Shaken out" is only for weak hands and people who don't move the market. If someone is planning on moving the entire market down, all of these shorts could be theirs and they could be preparing to mark it down. No need for a shake out. 
What evidence contradicts what I said?

I don't even necessarily mean shorts *have* to close into longs closing. Although how is that not happening? Longs going down, shorts going up, is that not what I said? 

Anyway I generally agree. 

I think if this dumps again another 10-20% it will be time to go long. Basically when people stop seeing it as free money and start capitulating. 
just got my first successful (so far) knife catch! long @6450
That's what I was thinking yesterday: https://www.tradingview.com/x/xKIkaYYX/

1d bear flag + confirming triangle support as resistance... crazy short opportunity. Would be too easy wouldn't it?


Realistically yea but in crypto, a $10k bump in BTC wouldn't even surprise me at this point. Especially with all the big boys ready to get in 
After trying to go all in on 5x lev at 3k bounce hitting buy like crazy I finally made order go through at 3.7 only to get info that they got out of funding...I stopped using them.
hahaha I actually had it first at 6544.5 and decided to move it up. I think depends how much sideways we have, that climb yesterday to 6800 makes me think it's doable to add higher without going over resistance.
Right now around 6700 but 1/3 of my stack. Which might've been premature, just couldn't resist locking one of my medium term goals profit wise. That's probably why I'm feeling a bit at ease with a higher risk.
[deleted]
Depending on the exchange, the variables and formulae can differ though. The video calculates w/ the underlying asset for both shorting and longing on margin is USD. For example, BFX a while ago had quite bit higher initial margin for BTC-based longs (though that gap is a lot closer now).

Also [their how2margintrade FAQ](https://support.bitfinex.com/hc/en-us/articles/115004555165-Intro-to-Margin-Trading), suggests an equal 15% swing in either direction liquidates you, long or short at max leverage ^^^^^\(unless ^^^^^im ^^^^^missing ^^^^^something ^^^^^really ^^^^^obvious ^^^^^here) .

To invert their example, shorting 13.333BTC @ $250 would still require initial equity of $1000. If price rises up 15% to $287.5, that would take the net balance likewise to $500, the margin requirement.


Bullfudded indeed. Think I'm gonna open a short if it breaches 6375 with a stop above 6500.
It's guaranteed buy pressure in the same way that longs are guaranteed sell pressure. While 30k shorts is a lot, it's not enough to move the market unless they literally all close at once. 

But it's eventual buy pressure...it could be at $1k for all we care.. Obviously it won't but you don't know when those shorts will close. If the market moves down to $5.5k before they close, the buy pressure they provide won't really help you with an underwater long from $6.9k. 

Maybe a bit...but not a lot. And like I said, that's *if* longs don't panic sell. If shorts can squeeze these longs, the buy pressure from the shorts will be negated by longs closing. Not to mention spot buying and selling not on margin severely affects price as well
Feb and March were 2018
I am just incredibly skeptical that hodlers don't check the price frequently. I've read thousands of comments on crypto subs and very rarely do I see a "I don't look at the price" post from a hodler.


They're all like "I don't even trade but I can't stop looking!" 
What happens if BTC goes sub 6600, ETH goes sub 500, and LTC goes sub $100 at roughly the same time? Yeesh.
Yeah, all my buys on sept hit and I closed for 15% ROE (10x buys). Wasn't a big amount.

I did add heavily at 6700, though.
[deleted]
Word.  Just trying to learn how to not tunnel vision and what others are looking for/at.  Thanks.
It's actually one of the OG shitcoins, I had it back in 2014 back when everyone would buy on names and this was going to be "big" in the cannabis industry lol. 
DOGE 2.0 . Just wait till there's a NASCAR.
Potcoin isn't anything new.  And it was one of the best performing coins in 2016, I think it was.
:)
They would love a high volatility range bound price to create the interest in positions being constantly opened and closed. Every now and then faking out some movements to liquidate some positions and back to the same again.

The higher they could pull that off the most profits they would reap.

You have a point there. So they would need price constantly going up so they could get more money when they sell.
Would they not force close before that point then? I know they can force close high leverage contracts without your agreement 
Because they were banned at 4k, they can still sell in profit
I did not downvote you
 Why would the media hate crypto? Financial institutions, maybe.

This is the same, if you look at the owner structure of most MMM.
We did need 1 million to maintain the price but we got it we got more than it and the price went up a lot.

I never said whether we would get it or not this time, but currently we need about 10 million every day to enter the market to keep the price stable
well that's no reason to sell just randomly. you have to factor in if current prices are sustainable in terms of people buyin that many a day. 
That's a really good way to describe bart activity. 
If they own 200k coins, they can go on exchange and unload them in 1 month without moving the market.

If they want to unload fast they can find a buyer. That I meant saying OTC. Sell them off the counter to someone that wants to hold for a while, not to someone who will unload it on exchange at the time of transaction.
It doesn't have to be one buyer and they don't have to unload them all at once. Some people probably would like to buy and hold here and unload after some time when price goes up.
What? The volume actually *validated* the break. Volumes been on the decline since Feb and we just saw a daily volume spike, which is a characteristic of the triangle breakout. Bulls are still defending their higher low argument so volume will really pick up on a break of 6.4 (our previous low) and then start accelerating below 6k.
I don't see how it can be arbitrary when the lines and points correspond to the same values across multiple people's charts. We were in the symmetrical triangle, now we aren't. That isn't really open for interpretation, especially given that we closed the week well below the lower bound. Something like 4-5% below.

Sure you can re-draw it as something else, a descending triangle or something else entirely, but you can't claim that the big symmetrical triangle broke to the downside. That much is irrefutable.
Yes, eventually reality will come crashing in that their huge profits are really gone and if they hold on, their small to moderate profits could be really gone...then they would start taking a loss.
I rest my case /u/SloppySynapses
dunno maybe im missing something. the noobs i know of (i include myself, despite the fact that i bought in 2013) have bought 1-5k dollars worth of bitcoin mostly in later 2017. they don't even look at the price ticker anymore. all of this noobs aren't even traders or have traded something in their life. my friends barely know how to send coins from one wallet to an another. 

So, the ones to get shaken out are the ones who put a lot dollars they can't afford to loose that are so dumb that they waited 4 month before realizing that, maybe, its better to sell?
there are a lot of theese people around? i mean its common sense to sell if you need the money.

dunno, you probably right but the ones that i know of barely know how to send coins to an exchange. their interest towards crypto 
 and their holding right now its zero. they doesn't need to sell those coins now, and thats what they are doing, disinterested holding.

i think that people who trades stock or whatever aren't the majority that bought this bull run. the people who bought like my friends are different noobs.

maybe im just thinking that the majority its like my friends but who knows. thanks anyway. im lurking since febraury and i like this sub even if i have not traded that much during this years. studing for the next year i guess
I have a theory that "bears" are really just traders. Very few of us that are shorting actually *want* the price to plummet, and even fewer want BTC to fail. We just trade the market. Bulls that refuse to short/sell and get riled up about it aren't traders at all. 
!RemindMe 1 year
I am not bullish short-term, but by no means do I think we're setting up for a drop larger than the one we experienced when an exchange overseeing 70%+ of all Bitcoin volume imploded. That's as crazy as those who expect $50k by the end of the year.
My new wife is not like my old wife.

Yet I can still compare them ;)
I didn't say it is dead. I said it is dying.   And Bitcoin being dead doesn't mean that it doesn't exist on the earth and not one person is holding it or transferring it from one address to another.  It means it has failed and is effectively insignificant in global finance.
Bubble already popped at just below $20K, but taking awhile to fully deflate.   But Capitulation Day will be quite a sight for sure and I just hope I have a healthy short position on that day.

Actually, it will probably coincide with more bad gov't regulation news.
It's where mine are :P
I'm a noob trader so I'm scared of shorting because that involves margin trading (leveraging the risk!!!) but shorting seems so full of promise. Should I just say fuck it and risk it for the biscuit anyway? Like maybe 3x shorts could be safe enough?
In case you're not sure. Short was a hedge on swaps for my 4x long from 18.5, plan was to close hedge when 20k breaks convincingly. I closed that long with a loss also.

It was perfectly prepared trade which I perfectly f...cked up by doing every single thing wrong instead of keeping to the plan.

So... I know, I didn't lose 40 BTC on revenge trading, but 99% of 'i lost' here is just small bump that people should get their heads around and keep on going.
Yes, this. Many people where helping out last year this time and posting in bitcoinbeginners to help out. 

There are very few names left posting regularly from last year this time, it would be great if the cycle of coaching knowledge can continue.  

And yes, Sloppy is a good one. The question asked was a bit broad.
Oh okay, and yes it bothers me too. I would help anyone who messages me. I do my best to respond to everything I can 
We'll see what happens... If I'm wrong I'll hold my hands up.

If I'm right then I'm right, I'm sharing info that I can see.

No need for tradingview to see the obvious. 
Pumps actually. 
There's always that possibility. Only thing is, whales don't generally short the bottom. Look on the 30 minute shorts chart: [https://imgur.com/a/nIssUGT](https://imgur.com/a/nIssUGT)
Fuck yeah I didn't know that - thank you. 
What did your accountant say about FIFO vs. LIFO? That’s my dilemma, currently. It seems that for stocks, it must be FIFO unless you worked with your broker prior to sale to specifically sell *NUMBERED LOTS* of shares. But those laws only seem to talk about stocks/securities, which Bitcoin is not.

So it makes me think I can LIFO it as if I were buying and selling gold or water or some other measurable, fungible, finely divisible asset. But, can you LIFO those things? Curious what you did, and also... who your accountant is. I would not mind picking her brain. Is this something you can tell me?
Not if it's bad Aids. :\-(
Thank you!
What is your recommendation at that point, buy?
Exactly my approach.

People come to trading sub and say we're doomed at $1k.

No. We're not. We trade here.
> I think i see where yours comes from

It's a [bear pennant](https://www.investopedia.com/university/charts/charts6.asp). Don't know TA too well, but it seems to fit the definition. Was hoping to hear some of the pros chime in on this. Possibly, it's on a too short time frame to be valid.
\>adoption for crypto is taking off like crazy.

\[citation needed\]
There is nothing barring bitcoin visiting a price it was at a mere 15 months ago. I don't think it'd happen quickly by any means but refusing to acknowledge it as a possibility is a bit short sighted. 

99% of people who have ever said "bitcoin will absolutely never do this" has been wrong. 

It's a 100% purely speculative asset. There are no guarantees, anything can happen in the long run. $50k is just as likely as $1k 
I’ve been around markets way too long and have seen many things “that were never possible” happen. Markets have a way of shocking people and really testing emotions. People thought last year that passing $10,000 was a long shot, a pipe dream...guess what, it hit $20,000. These types of shocks work both ways.
I'll probably just hold June till settlement if we don't bounce. No real incentive to move that position. Swaps was intended to be short-term, and I *just* paid funding on it. I should have closed it sub 6500 half an hour ago if I'd been keeping an eye on the time. Might as well hold it a little longer.

I hate september. Liquidity is so low comparatively. Slippage actually can effect me on those books. I know it'll pick up all the liquidity off June in a few weeks, but yeesh. 
Mine was above .018 and I wasn't too concerned. 

Alts all look pretty bad, imo, but it's hard to know how to trade their ratios effectively in the midst of this, especially on MEX of all places. Hindsight is truly 20/20 sometimes with the alts. I reckon EOS is a pretty good shitcoin to ride down though.
Wrong. This time it's almost exactly the same except that $6500 is what happens after a "crash." 
Maybe, I don't fuck with scalps. This thing is ready to trend and I don't really want to get in the way. I'll scalp/close when the knife catching stops
Have a plan in case it happens
never.  break.  character!!!
> maybe some short wicks below it,

wicks in the yearly chart?
Yup, same
Yes, what would be best for Vegas gambling is if they prevented people from gambling with money they can't afford to lose.
no this is patrick
> Some of us know the difference between 80% and 100% (and 50.1%)

Do you mean you are able to give an accurate prediction about the price and market situation in the future? Can you with certainty rule out seeing Bitcoin at 8 or 10 in the future? You can't. You know as much as I do. I am just being a bit more optimistic.


In either case, I wouldn't call that "absolutely delusional". That 10k or 20k is inevitable isn't a view I personally would subscribe to, but I wouldn't characterize it in that way either. 
I'm genuinely, unironically a bit worried about the euphoria here over low prices. I really hope this sub doesn't get burned. Maybe I'm being a party pooper but high sentiment over low prices is completely ass backwards. 
We will see!
Old hands have played this game before, and sold what they needed to at 10-20k. The OGs can hold to Kingdom come.
Damn, you seem a little naive :D

> The article gave the impression that somehow the professional has to shake out the weak hands themselves before entering.

They do. What do you think has been happening during the last 6 months?

>So i guess this 'shaking out' of the weak hands is done by the market

The professionals control the market. Even the media
Maybe not those holders who entered at 1k and never sell. It wouldn't even matter to the whales because they sure wouldn't sell after some mere 100% bounce from the lowest bottom.
Yes, you BCashers are welcome to take Trump on board. All the unintelligent on one boat. 
It'll do something different, that's for sure. The range of possible outcomes is huge at this point if stability isn't going to keep improving.
/u/SloppySynapses I think you are the most objective one here lately. props.
It could definitely just be whales accumulating the shorts here before they drive the price down further. However, nobody wants to be publicly seen as a bottom shorter, so the trades could be opened but not shared. Additionally, there are many less experienced traders not on this subreddit.

I’m just not sure I trust reddit comments as much as using the raw shorts/longs ratios as a measure of sentiment.
Do you have recommended reading material on Wyckoff? 
Well, maybe it was in your other comment. You have stated that, "everyone is longing," but longs are on the decline while shorts are increasing. To me, that just seems contradictory. How can everyone be longing when they are decreasing? It seems like everyone is shorting.
Good job! I'm still waiting for mine because I think the real dump is going to happen in the next four hours. But I'm not very sure
Yeah, adding to this short yesterday was really ideal.  I was surprised I could build a position so high in the formation.

So, I'll put half and order there and half an order a little bit above.
If BTC dies, crypto dies.
That's fair. I would argue conditions are different now still since

1. we have broken downwards below the tightening consolidation range
2. 1d RSI is not bouncing off 30. It's going below. It bounced off 30 before. 
3. we crossed below the weekly 50ma at $7.7k, an indicator that hasn't been crossed down since August 2014. 
Well, you are probably right. But you sound a lot smarter when you address any situation in probabilities based on evidence, as opposed to just claims as facts. Which you are very astute. 

Minor nit. Just like my opinion, man. 

Edit: God dammit, at the airport. Thanks for the heads up. Stop posting from phone!!! 
Add BCH going under 880 that also seems to be their support...

They are all at the brink of breaking major support lines (it's not that strange since they are pretty much in sync except for pump & dumps)

I'll short ETH since it's the one i'm more familiar with and has greater volatility than BTC.

I have support for ETH around 410-420 so that's a nasty 20% fall. (Unless you are shorting it and it's a move from heaven)
less than 1% for doomsday and counting

Well it just happened!
I'm still playing safe, didn't want to over lev in case it bounces. :-\
I like Chad. Its like watching the Colbert Report. Just not sure if he is in on the joke (but I think he is?)
Lol is it really? Dear lord. that's kind of funny then, excuse my ignorance 
these type of comments are how i know the market still has a ways to go down
I would be very surprised if that happens every now and then... as that would kill their business immediately when this comes out \- not very sustainable.
Yeah, it would probably get autodeleveraged even if you want to leave it open. This happens when the insurance fund runs out. So if we crash straight to $1 all longs will be liquidated at like 4-5k and the0 insurance fund would run out 3-4k and shorts would not profit from the remaining 3-4 thousand dollar drop. 

So everyone is rekt and the exchange is rekt. Longs no longer have any coins, shorts have all the coins but they are worthless.
$10M per days sounds about right if big money want to accumulate a few billions in a year.
Once they sell otc, it’s none of their business what the buyer will do.

Unloading 200k in a month without moving chart prices?? Minus wash traders and minus futures market volume. How much real buying is there to buy that 200k of coins

Just spot buying only, I haven’t done the numbers myself but I be surprised.
No I just mean the winklevoss twins own like 200,000 coins or something. 1% of all bitcoins I think. dudes couldn't really sell if they wanted to...

actually I just realized they totally could, nvm. 200,000 isn't that much. I mean it's a lot but they could def cash out if they wanted to
Sure it, validated it (if you believe in the triangle and that line), but we have a clear reason for higher volume due to the break and it does not reflect anything other than the fact that people have stared at this line for quite a while. I also think that all the signs point to that ascending line to be insignificant, including the drop and volume and so on.  I personally never paid attention to that line as horizontal support/resistance levels are usually better, in my view.  I personally believe we are in Wyckoff Accumulation phase, either schematic 1 or 2, whether or not the "spring" will happen that is left for speculation, obviously. We are currently hovering at a horizontal support area that has worked as support for many months already. I think its the significant level, not the breaking of that weird triangle that everyone talks about. Again, I could be totally wrong. I dont claim to be an expect, Ive just tried to analyze the situation for quite a while. When you perform volume price analysis on the "break" out of the triangle, you can clearly see heavy accumulation happen during and shortly after the drop. And we all know, you need a good amount of selling to load them bags up. And its been going on for half a year now. Clearly, this all fits my narrative very well and thats the issue here; It could just be bottom buyers jumping in, taking chances, perhaps theres nothing else going on. But Ive seen multi year accumulation happen in stocks, done in a very nice way. But yeah, combining the ATH descending trendline and the horizontal support line, we are looking at a descending triangle and thats certainly not the best of signs for the bulls. I know nothing.
https://www.tradingview.com/x/wnLv7V0Y/


I was a noob last year and it was all money I could afford to lose, I said. And it really was. Then, the amount became much larger  and I was much less interested in losing it. I'm sure there are multiple versions of this, but I bet most people have a breaking point, regardless if they want to admit it or not. 
Yes you are right that the ones who get shaken out invested more money.  It doesn't affect the price much if your buddy who put $10 in it just lets it go to $1.  But someone who invested $10K is more likely to sell and cause the price drop farther and faster.

There are a lot of those people around who still haven't sold.  But the pain will increase to a level when they will and then the floodgates will open.

I personally hope that, by some miracle, $6K holds, but got to think that is only 15% probability at this point, at best.
Last time I talked to you here bitcoin went from the low (that you had shorted again then)  to 9k.
I will be messaging you on [**2019-06-12 18:48:54 UTC**](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=2019-06-12 18:48:54 UTC To Local Time) to remind you of [**this link.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8qfytx/daily_discussion_tuesday_june_12_2018/)

[**CLICK THIS LINK**](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8qfytx/daily_discussion_tuesday_june_12_2018/]%0A%0ARemindMe!  1 year) to send a PM to also be reminded and to reduce spam.

^(Parent commenter can ) [^(delete this message to hide from others.)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Delete Comment&message=Delete! e0k2zld)

_____

|[^(FAQs)](http://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/24duzp/remindmebot_info/)|[^(Custom)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[LINK INSIDE SQUARE BRACKETS else default to FAQs]%0A%0ANOTE: Don't forget to add the time options after the command.%0A%0ARemindMe!)|[^(Your Reminders)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=List Of Reminders&message=MyReminders!)|[^(Feedback)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBotWrangler&subject=Feedback)|[^(Code)](https://github.com/SIlver--/remindmebot-reddit)|[^(Browser Extensions)](https://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/4kldad/remindmebot_extensions/)
|-|-|-|-|-|-|
Pretty bold claim, given its history of resurrection.

Fuckharvey is the only person to state any semblance of a compelling argument in this sub, that I've seen. If you are going to make the claim, tell us why 'this time its different.' 
What's the difference between 1x long and 1x short if you trade to USD?

If you scared don't leverage. Go 1x or 1.5x. I started lev trading after hitting 50% profits. I moved over 2x when I hit 500%. I usually trade with 2-3x, sometimes when the time is right I go beyond that.

Just know your risks. It's not like you have to go 25x just because you margin trade.
Buy signal. Thanks.
Both apparently.  I had missed your more recent pump post. [1](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8js25g/daily_discussion_wednesday_may_16_2018/dz2dvho/) [2](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8ontzj/daily_discussion_tuesday_june_05_2018/e05k3y2/).
Dude, no image :(
Ohh.. so you're saying they would have already loaded up on shorts..
Sorry if this is obvious, but that's a 30m chart of volume of shorts over time??
I crossed checked FIFO and LIFO between bitcointax and cointracking (paid services for both), submitted both to my accountant and told her my preference of LIFO since it was a pretty big difference. She said the LIFO was fine since the FIFO rule was not included in the final tax laws. 

As far as your other questions; I don't know and unfortunately I can't share with you who my accountant is. She's an old timer who's not really looking for new clients and wouldn't want to be bothered.
yes buy now so that you lose money when the panic unfolds. 
Well the danger of going down to $1K is that eventually most of the traders leave and the volatility dries up and then we can't trade profitably.  Plus the market is so manipulated that it is arguably more difficult than ever in the past.  

But if you can short it down to $1K and not lose too much (or gain), then perfectly fine if the market still stays active.
Lmao! Oh, you're going to ask ME for evidence after I already refuted your false claim about bubbles historically popping 95-99% which you provided no evidence for. Lol GTFOH. DYOR and stop spouting off shit you clearly know nothing about. 
Gonna have to agree to disagree. In keeping with the technological adoption S curve, there are prices BTC will never revisit. Just like it left behind the single digits and the double digits. I believe at this point it has left behind the triple digits and anything 1-2k
You can slowly move from swaps to Sept, if this keeps going down you'd wish you've moved that. Premium will be going down hard.

I'll be probably moving my hedge there tomorrow and leave rest on June.

This is actually the moment when I feel attached to my short and don't think I'll close it soon....
Dude I shorted  0.0019230 on EOS...-_- 

Guess the contract size? 1 EOS lol

I wss too scared to short it for real. 

My upnl is 0.0003 btc 😍
I can't babysit right now so I won't, but I would if I could.
Yes, the only timeframe that counts
What is "Vegas gambling"? a credit card company? a bitcoin exchange?
I mean what I said, not anything in your imagination.
I would say with bitcoin, calling anything inevitable is delusional. btc does whatever the fuck it wants ya know 😅
Not if you want to buy it isn't.
I'm sure some did, but I really think there's a lot of people sitting on paper wealth...there's people who entered in 2017 sitting on a lot of money and those paper profits are being threatened
Well explain how you do it then.  You want to buy 20million in BTC.  Show us how it's done.

[Edit]  "Shake out weak hands" advice is sort of the same as "catch the bottom".  Yeah, no shit.  But how do you actually do it?
He's got more money than you, and he's President of the United States, but sure you're smarter.
Thanks. I could totally be wrong though lol and I'll just look like Charlie from It's Always Sunny in the mail room. 

http://i0.kym-cdn.com/entries/icons/original/000/022/524/tumblr_o16n2kBlpX1ta3qyvo1_1280.jpg

If I'm right I'll look like a genius but who knows. 

It's just a theory based loosely on Wyckoff stuff. If it plays out I wouldn't be surprised to see it take another week or so. 
I mean it's possible, and my theory is possibly a stretch, but go check the daily back when we were here last. People were terrified of longing. Now it's like candy. 

Price stalls for 15 minutes and everyone's positive we've bottomed out. Like I said, perfect liquidity pool. 
Same thing happened in $7-8k. 

I'm surprised people don't recognize the pattern. Big sell off, ease up on the selling to let price rise, set limit orders. then sell off but higher low, then ease up etc repeat over n over. Distribute. 

Let it sit near the top. Dump. You've now distributed with very high liquidity and have marked down the price. 

With this many coins distributed, shorts closing would pump the price exorbitantly. Those shorts will close when the market is convinced the bottom is much farther down, that'll be the accumulation phase, when the price sags downwards on low volume rather than upwards but ranges. 
https://static1.squarespace.com/static/54fed56be4b0b8a1d3d33918/t/558090a1e4b01a827bd89c51/1434488993915/Wyckoff+Schematics-+Visual+Templates+For+Market+Timing+Decisions.pdf

This is the one that got me thinking about distribution here again. Someone suggested it was accumulation but after reading the definition for accumulation I realized $7-8k was quite literally the opposite. 

I can't find the excerpt I read but it basically explained that market makers pick up on accumulation and distribution quickly and mark up/down the price accordingly, so "professional investors" (as they're called) accumulate and distribute within a range over an extended period of time so as to avoid driving up/down the price...

to do this, they sell or buy aggressively into liquidity, wait until it builds up again, and then repeat. it works because they're generally the only ones buying/selling. Once they stop buying/selling, price sags/crawls upwards. at $6.5k last time it sagged. Because once the accumulator stopped buying, there was no one else buying. Here, once the distributor stops selling, there's no one else selling. That's why the price so often drifts upwards after large sell offs lately.

The key here that I'm observing is that not many were extremely happy at $10k. Seriously, wouldn't you have expected the sub to be a bit more bullish? Most people were longing the top, so they were happy on the push to $10k but after that failure it wasn't particularly chipper. 

Now that we're back down here they're getting a chance to buy. So they're *happy* about it. And they're not selling here because we've been here before and they think it won't go lower. They see it as a pattern they've figured out.

These people will sell if/when we make a new low. Distributor knows this. (s)he will use these liquidations and stops as fuel for the markdown. Their low sentiment will likely provide liquidity for accumulation after markdown. 
Sorry, I should be more clear. My distinction is between the majority of people and the market movers. As in whales/big players

Clearly people are shorting. But how many people? is it one individual? From what I see it's not many smaller players. They're buying. 

there will always be an overlap and it's not going to be 1 whale vs 10,000 fishes. But from sentiment, this sub, crypto Twitter, etc, it seems most people are either buying here or waiting for a new low to sell.

It's a great recipe for distribution and then markdown. 
Small correction: it didn't bounce of 30, it closed at 30. February dump was way below 30 at some point. 
Fair enough, I will try to temper the confidence. But to be fair look at the responses to my comment :p 

I do wish I could ETHUSD rather than ETHBTC. No desires to margin trade the ratios. 
> BTC goes sub 6600, ETH goes sub 500, and LTC goes sub $100
> 
> Add BCH going under 880 that also seems to be their support...

All 4 just broke under at once.
I agree, Stok at least tries to back his posts up a little. I'm completely neutral on binary, buy diy just annoys the hell out of me.
there are always ways to go down and i see it the same sideways or down for the next 12-24 month.  
Small bubbles on good news are always possible we had it in the past even in the last bear phase small bumps to the upside.    
As long Bitcoins is in 5y higher than today i'am fine with it :)
I don't believe one bit they would do it, just stating it could be done.

They would need to have the major exchanges on it or the arbitrage bots would crush them.  This is Tin Foil Hat raised to the cube at least :)

Aliens doing it would be more probable :D
Cheers. It was one of those hypothetical which was bugging me! Not exactly something that is likely to happen but I was wondering how you had infinite contracts on a finite asset! 
[deleted]
BTW, drawing a line from Nov bottom to Feb bottom makes it go at 6.5 here. I don't know how people drew it that it's continuation of the triangle we broke down. Thinking if this is a proper way to draw it. If so then that could actually explain how we stopped right here.
:)
Is this supposed to be a rebuttal? Why would you ever choose such a low resolution scale for something that moves as quickly as Bitcoin does? Weekly, but more-so daily is the way to track a ~6 month pattern, not months.

Clever, but it should also be noted that that's not much of a symmetrical triangle either. I would think you of all people would understand triangles.

Nice try!
I took a pretty big hit on the 4/12 candle. Read that one wrong. I didn't see that massive buildup of shorts, and I set stops much too wide. My trading stack is 300% what it was after that since then, though, almost entirely due to shorting the rejection of 10K.
He probably didn't cover at 9k.  If he shorted a low, he probably took a small loss and reshorted higher.  That is called trading.
Different from what?   Do you mean why there isn't likely to be  another bull market to take us to $50K next year?   That is obvious and has been stated in this sub hundreds of times.


Also, what are good position sizes for margin trading? Do you go all in 100% of stack, or only small % of it?
Okay, well guess the down voted comments in this sub seem to be correct more times than the up voted comments.

I don't just stare at the BTC charts having a cry wank trying to figure out why the price is going the way that it is.

I look at other charts too and find correlations. 
sorry fixed
Yep, shorts have been building while bitcoin has been moving sideways at 6500. Meaning whoever is contributing to this increase in shorts as been shorting at the current price, which is the current bottom.
Thanks, understood. I'm trying to gauge what others have done. LIFO is a lot less tax for me as well. It's looking like the treatment of whatever kind of generic "property" bitcoin is is left open enough that I should give it a shot.

I totally understand about your CPA wanting to keep to herself. I probably would as well, were I her. Thanks for your brains!
I think going to $1k will only let some bigger players to get more coins.

Tbh, couple of whales could move this 10x up just to sell with profits on the way up.
\> DYOR and stop spouting off shit you clearly know nothing about.

"Ok, convict, what is your defense?"

"DYOR and stop spouting off shit you know nothing about judge!"

See how that sounds? ;)
technologies do not last forever nor do they all ultimately succeed simply because people believe in them. Nothing right now suggests bitcoin is going to last forever. It's been like 9 years and it's hardly even being used. I am tentative at best to believe that it will follow the entire S-curve


Keep in mind the S-curve is for broad technologies, not specific software. 

Blockchain tech is following the S-curve, bitcoin doesn't have to. Not to mention blockchain tech is struggling to find a purpose 9 years into its existence 
I'm more concerned about the position exit than the entry when it comes to liquidity. I'm not working with *that* much BTC. I'll exit swaps on a break of 6600 or on the next leg down and look to move to sept on the bounce. 
Casino gambling in Las Vegas, USA.
This isn't 2017 where every dip resulted in a new ATH though. 

Oh well, good luck. Honestly. 
[deleted]
Ah, my reading of old hands is pre 2013, sure 2017 vintage will be seating it.
Dude, what kind of answer do you want? And why are you telling me what to do lol

>With some FUD, boring endless sideways movement, many bottom fakeouts only to drop back down, scary low prices, getting people locked in terrible underwater positions so they become easily shakeable

Even after all of this, in total, they end up buying more than selling. They don't make it obvious and drop the price in a straight line. I mean, just look how we got from 20k to 6k to 12k to 6k to 10k to 6k again..

When the price goes into the range they're satisfied with, they start buying. Not all at once to hide their intentions
You equate money and power with intelligence, eh?
Lmao, I would wager almost anyone in this sub is more intelligent than Trump. The guy brags about not reading and treats a teleprompter like he's effectively illiterate.


Who gives a shit that he's president? What does that have to do with intelligence? He's a con-man who hijacked the lowest possible denominator base, using racism as a wedge. The fact that he happened to capture a majority of electoral votes has nothing to do with his intellect or lackthereof. 
Thanks for your replies. I know this is a late response, but I got distracted earlier.

I just wanted to say I agree with you that this isn’t the bottom. I am fully expecting a sub-$6k drop over the next few weeks. My thoughts are, the game of accumulate+pump->fomo has been less effective each time we have revisited $6k. There doesn’t appear to be much upside left, so I doubt we see any big pumps from here.

However, I’m scalping a low leverage long from about $100 below here for a small bounce like we saw from $7k to $7.6k last week. I am setting stop losses in case, but I just think we’re too oversold at the moment to see another $1k drop without a bit of a bounce first. I think we have generally agreed on every point on the way down from $10k to here, I’m just trying to keep my overall bearishness in check and try to profit in both directions.
Yeah, and that's kind of what I stated in my first comment, that this is some whale conspiracy. But there's absolutely no way to prove that. We really have no idea how many people are buying/selling, whether it's a lot of small fishes or whales. I try not to buy into any conspiracy so I'm going to say this is normal market movement and no one has any hidden information.
Okay that's true, too. So if it bounces to 30 in the next 13 minutes then the pattern holds :P 
Right, but those that dont check would likely not be visiting this sub and commenting.

Either way, just pointing out that absolutes in investing lead to bad results (holy shit Tesla and 'smart investors' ), as does group think and confirmation bias. Same applies for today as December. 

Probabilities, risk /reward, all about it. 


Yeah, ratios suck. Very low volatility. 
Yep, all in sync. This means we now have 4 major coins under support turned resistance probably...

I shorted ETH and will add if BTC drops bellow 6400
i am sure it will be
There's two of them, so 200k.
That would also mean continuation of the triangle should be up, which would make sense because the long term trend was up. 
I personally don't care for diagonal lines, I care about the market context which causes patterns to appear, and what those patterns represent. So you'll need to excuse me for being ignorant over your rules on triangles.
Here's to hoping for a big red dildo this time!
Different from the 300 times also declared dead, as documented easily on 99bitcoins. 

I am not disputing a bear market, nor a multi-year bear market, nor that we hit $1300 (doubt the last two, but I don't know). But I have no idea how anyone can say that it will forever insignificant in global finance with 99+% certainty. 


>  Do you mean why there isn't likely to be another bull market to take us to $50K next year?

What about in a decade?  Two decades?
Does it matter? If you are a noob as you say, how are you going to determine the entry, the exit, and the stops? Do you understand the difficulty of the short trade?
It depends on your strategy. F.ex. 90% of my trades are 100% but low lev. Some prefer 10% but high lev.
Didn't mean to criticize one way or the other.  I thought your suggestion about oil was novel so I noted it.

I try to ignore all the votes around here, it's poison.
Exactly. To be honest, its such a grey area that you will hear different opinions on what's safe. My accountant will not put her name on anything she doesn't feel comfortable so that was my green light but many on reddit were telling me FIFO is the "safest" route. 

Good luck!

If that kind of manipulation is still permitted in the future.  It may become illegal and actually cracked down on, thus discouraging its use.
Considering its the prosecution and not the defense that has to do all the research and provide all the evidence to the court to decide , your point is complete shit. Lol. 

I love how you just conveniently ignore all my other points though haha. Ignore how coinbase and binance have a much bigger user base now, that's one signal for adoption. Also blatantly ignoring my rebuttal of your ignorant shit comment about historical bubbles popping 95-99%. Lol. Yeah, its apparent you didn't "dyor" You didn't do any research at all. 
True! ... but it is also the market leader by a clear margin. If it ever loses that position I think then we can talk about the possibility of it losing all value, and even then it will only be the beginning of the conversation. 
Gonna disagree again. Bitcoin is the heart and soul of crypto. If bitcoin fails, every crypto fails. There is no other crypto that is better than bitcoin. They all sacrifice decentralization or security for their extra features. Bitcoin is king and will always be king.
I don't work with that much BTC either, but it's the first time when I'm really concerned about my stack value. I'd rather keep only hedge on Sept and scalp on others than close it completely.
It doesn't need to result in a new ATH if you are accumulating for long-term cold storage.

I'm not buying yet personally, I'm just saying that it makes sense to have a positive outlook on lowering prices if you intend to accumulate at some point in the near future.

Edit: I will admit however that it does hurt to see my crypto value plummet, and I do wish I had at least sold off all my shitcoins at an earlier time.
If it broke down more, would you add to your short at any point?
I never said anything about buying now, I was saying if one wants to buy, that high sentiment over low prices isn't ass backwards.

I don't know about y'all, but I'm prepping for the next move up, even if this one craters down to 2-4k and stays there for months/years.
And your achievements are...7 year redditor 👏
Run for President then genius.
I'd wager that the dumbest president, CEO, or general ever to live is smarter than 80% of people on this reddit.  By any yardstick.

Fair enough! I don't do shorter term positions much or at all really, so I can see the appeal of going long at some point here
That's fine, I like to factor in sentiment to my trading- it has served me well so far. That's where I'm getting the jist of my "who's shorting here?" from.

Regardless, I'm not particularly worried about another short squeeze. The charts look incredibly bearish and are signaling more downwards movement over time. a short squeeze to even $7.8k would suck but wouldn't stop me out. I have quite a bit of room to work with. 


It's probably going to stay oversold for a couple of days this time I guess. 4H RSI was at 12 and it hardly bounced. 
Haha well he said hodlers *usually* don't check the price. I just believe that's incredibly false. I guess I could be wrong but I would bet I'm not :p 
100k is for the ETF. And why would they sell ? They are very long term hodlers.

No, triangle was ok, I'm talking about new support line that I didn't see earlier.
Gov't regulations are making it more and more insignificant.  Those will only intensify.  If BTC adoption somehow grows, the regulations will pound it down even harder.
If you want to speculate with a 20 year price horizon,then go for it.  But that's not trading, and I have no interest in it here.
Ok I see what you mean. There's a lot I don't know, thanks :)
Just have a look for yourself.

Open the BCH chart alongside the BTC charts and watch.

It takes less money to move BCH up or down and BTC will do the same, especially at this price level.

Unless we get a big BTC sell-off, that's when it doesn't work.

But in slow moving times like today it does work.

Strategies change on a daily basis. 
Look at tulip bubble. It popped 99&#37;. Also, binance and coinbase users mean shit because its pajeets trading with pennies. The real ICO scammers and early hodlers are selling to these pajeet loser baggies right now    
Well, my point is that crypto as we know it could fail. We can agree to disagree though.

I'm not even saying it will fail. I'm just saying it's totally a possibility that it does. 
Probably not. I would add on a bounce. If the 1d RSI hits near overbought again in 2018 I will probably add. But hopefully I will have closed far before that. 

I will probably short $6800-7300 here. 

I may not even add though, I'm generally fine with the size of my short now. 

No need to be greedy in the middle/possible end of a move. I have been very right for a while, I suspect I'm in for a rude awakening eventually. 
Lol, do you really not distinguish between intelligence and success? How stupid are *you*?
Wow, great argument! Maybe I will.
~~"out" as in "completely out"? Do you truly think that is it and the best is to get out?~~
Saul Goodman.

Minor nit. But, people did vote you a know it all a few weeks back, which i defended. Just a little bed side manners.

But whatever, buzzed on airport cocktails, what do I know! 
Fine, I'll bite.

You can say with 100% certainty that the Chinese government has not been accumulating btc and will unban it at some point?

You can say with 100% certainty that Square will not begin opening LN nodes for all operators of their devices in the next 1-3 years?

You can say with 100% certainty that swamped by a global debt crisis in the next 3-10 years that the world does not move back to a commodity backed global peg instead of USD and that they don't adopt a virtual currency as that peg?

You can say with 100% certainty that not wanting to stifle innovation in its borders that the US does not encourage btc growth, including a btc ETF and try to force the world to recognize this as the new global standard peg in the next 3-5 years?
Lmao. Of course you would reference the Tulip bubble, of which there is little recorded price data AT ALL and happened CENTURIES ago. Of course you wouldn't reference any remotely related bubbles that happened anytime recently. I dare you to find a bubble that burst 99% in the last couple centuries where there is actually SUFFICIENT data. 
Sounds good, just interested in what you're thinking.

Thanks!
gypsy you're outclassed by a lot of people here.  I think you'd do better in a normie political forum.

But you got potential brotha.  10 years.

Hmm? I'm confused. I was merely talking about where I'd close my short.
Okay you're right I need to cool it with the tone. Thanks for keeping me in line, you're a good friend :) 

You're right that I should go easy on the "False." stuff. 😅
I haven't said anything about the future with 100% certainty.  I don't do that, unlike many people here.

Congrats if it is only 97% certainly that China won't unban BTC.

I am dealing with current day reality, not fantasies of the future.  
Thanks. I am becoming slowly paranoid by hearing "it goes to zero" all around all evening. Trying to remember "they will want to scare you out of your position" but there are darker moments.
Alright man, well saying btc is dying is the same as saying its going to the moon, as far as I am concerned. 
It's not going to go to zero, lol. If this thing goes low, it'll take years. You'll have plenty of opportunities to get out. 
I didn't say it would be dead tomorrow.  It is slowly bleeding out.  And this is mostly due to gov't regulations.
Oh I don't want out, despite all the nerves this costs me. Thanks for getting back to me on this.
Ok, if you want to be more specific, fine. But I have mostly seen positive government news lately. It was a market cycle, hope that you made some money then or can get in your short now. 
Yes the permabulls have an "interesting" take on gov't bans and restrictive regulations.
